title,company,job_location,job_state,date,site,job_description,salary,url,applied,search_term
Frontend Developer,"Arch Systems, LLC",Remote,remote,2025-06-19,Indeed,"Role: Frontend Developer
Company: Arch Systems
Client: Federal
Location: Remote
Type: Full-time
Prior experience working on Federal government projects is mandatory for this role.
Summary:
The Frontend Developer will lead the development and continuous improvement of user interfaces for SAMHSA’s public-facing data tools, including the NSDUH Small Area Estimates (SAE) Visualization and Quick Statistics modules. This position is central to enabling user access to national behavioral health data via modern, interactive web experiences that comply with US Web Design System (USWDS) and federal accessibility standards.
Key Responsibilities:
Develop and enhance frontend components using React.js, Node.js, JQuery, Bootstrap, and D3.js for the SAE Visualization platform and Quick Statistics tools.
Integrate dynamic web interfaces with backend services via REST APIs built in Express, Django, and Rserve.
Implement visualizations using GeoJSON, TopoJSON, and GDAL-prepared shapefiles.
Ensure full Section 508 and WCAG 2.1 compliance across all visual layers.
Support web containerization and builds using Docker, Webpack, and Nginx.
Participate in Agile sprints, including code reviews, unit testing, and stakeholder demos.
Align all UI/UX with SAMHSA branding, USWDS, and HHS/OC coordination
Job Types: Full-time, Contract
Pay: $95,000.00 - $110,000.00 per year
Benefits:
401(k)
Health insurance
Vision insurance
Work Location: Remote",N/A,https://www.indeed.com/viewjob?jk=f581cc8ac105e273,False,frontend developer
Senior Frontend Developer,Magnolia International,Remote,remote,2025-06-19,Indeed,"What will you do?
This role is available for applicants based in Europe!
Magnolia is building up Frontend expertise with engineers focusing primarily on evolving and innovating our user interface! Are you an experienced Frontend engineer? Do you love JavaScript/TypeScript and web technology? Are you able to ideate and create new frontends for large-scale applications? Do you enjoy working and collaborating across the department and helping guide the architectural direction of the product?
You will:
Re-work our UI integration, expanding a design system, and enabling us to take our UI & UX further.
Use your JavaScript expertise to build performant, decoupled, testable, and maintainable front ends
Implement an amazing user experience that is a joy to use
Use your excellent collaboration and communication skills to:
work closely with our Design Team, PM team, and technical experts across the departments
collaborate with other teams on cross-department initiatives
Use your customer-centric approach to build the right things
Create and maintain smooth integrations between Magnolia and popular frontend technologies
Drive the future of our Frontend:
Use your technical expertise to drive the architecture and specifications of the new UI initiative
Be innovative and push technical boundaries
What do you bring in?
Technical know-how:
Expertise in Frontend technologies & architecture in large-scale applications, preferably in React, Next, or web components
Expert comprehension of core web and browser concepts
Worked either on or with a Design System and Storybook js
You know how to build secure and performant Frontend systems
You know how to deploy your stuff and understand how infrastructure works (i.e.CI/CD pipelines)
Operational experience, such as performance metrics and analytics
Excellent written and verbal communication skills
Love to make things
So, who are we?
We are a fun and open-minded bunch of colleagues spread across the globe.
Aside from work, we are parents, gamers, bookworms, athletes, adrenaline junkies, philosophers, and so much more
Constant learning and knowledge sharing with some of the best professionals in the industry
Lateral and vertical growth opportunities
Flexibility, flexibility, flexibility
Remote-friendly vibes
We are for you if you like to...


Take charge: You are in the driver’s seat and set the direction according to what customers, colleagues, and cultures need. No matter the roadblocks you see ahead, you take charge in (re)shaping the destination
Connect: You never drive alone. Building meaningful connections means creating experiences together that form a foundation of trust so next time there’s a bump on the road, you know someone else has your back.
Be you: Choose your own ways and means. You make every perspective count so that everyone feels safe enough to follow their purpose and at the same time pursue one common goal. Your way of growing is to mutually question yourself and others
Department
Engineer
Location
Remote
Workload
full-time
Job ID
(2132883)
Magnolia: A Global Leader in Digital Experience Management
Magnolia's blend of enterprise DXP capabilities and headless agility empowers brands to move swiftly and remain adaptable. Its global presence extends across five continents, supported by over 200 Magnolia-certified partners worldwide.
Join our dynamic team and enjoy a vibrant work environment with flexible work arrangements and remote-friendly options. Pursue your professional growth in a supportive and collaborative culture.",N/A,https://www.indeed.com/viewjob?jk=867fac96f1109cff,False,frontend developer
Jr Web Developer (Entry Level),"Planned Systems International, Inc.",Remote,remote,2025-06-19,Indeed,"Overview:
Planned Systems International (PSI) is an Enterprise IT services company who focuses on designing, building, securing, and operating cutting-edge software solutions that drive mission success and operational excellence for Federal Government organizations. PSI is currently seeking a dedicated and detail-oriented Junior Web Developer to join our dynamic team.
Essential Functions and Job Responsibilities:
Successful candidates will provide website design, development, testing, management and support of the hardware/software infrastructure for a web-based portal for our government client. Essential functions will include, but not be limited to:
Performing all aspects of the development tasks, including front-end, back-end, and database development.
Managing resources to ensure timely and successful deliveries.
Working with clients and review panels to identify recommendations for the appropriate technical, business and human factors solutions.
Commitment to clear and quality communications between team and client product managers.
Commitment to promoting a collaborative work environment with team members and customers.
Develop and maintain web-enabled capabilities and custom applications.
Lead staff in defining and tracking project requirements, plans, and schedules.
Commitment to delivery of quality products.
Minimum Requirements:
Bachelor’s degree in Computer Science, Engineering, or closely related field.
Strong understanding of user interface design principles, with proven track record of creative web site development in accordance with the design specifications, user interface style guides and established usability standards.
Must have strong experience working with a variety of technology and the ability to multi-task between different projects and workflow stages.
Must have experience communicating directly with end users and the ability to gather requirements.
Experience analyzing business product needs, recommending, then possibly implementing, effective software solutions in a timely manner.
Experience analyzing core standards for software development, and maintaining an effective process for support.
Experience providing guidance and leadership to other developers and development teams.
U.S. Citizenship is required. Candidates selected must be able to successfully obtain and maintain a Public Trust security clearance.
Desired Qualifications:
Currently holds a DHS Public Trust Clearance.
Certified in Lean Software Development, Kanban, Scrum and other Agile processes.
Department Homeland Security (DHS) Experience.
Company Benefits:
PSI offers full-time, benefits eligible employees a competitive total compensation package that includes paid leave, and options for employer sponsored group medical, dental, vision, short-term and long-term disability, life insurance, AD&D coverage, legal services, identity theft, and accident insurance. Flexible spending account and health saving account options offer pre-tax savings for qualified medical, dental, and vision expenses. The company sponsored 401(k) retirement plan has an employer contribution match that is immediately vested. We invest in the professional growth of our employees through professional courses, certifications, and tuition reimbursement programs.
EEO Commitment:
It is company policy to promote equal employment opportunities. All personnel decisions, including, but not limited to, recruiting, hiring, training, promotion, compensation, benefits, and termination, are made without regard to race, color, religion, age, sex, sexual orientation, pregnancy, gender identity, genetic information, national origin, citizenship status, veteran status, protected veteran status, disability, or any other characteristic protected by applicable federal, state, or local law.

Reasonable accommodations for applicants and employees with disabilities will be provided. If a reasonable accommodation is needed to participate in the job application or interview process, to perform essential job functions, and/or to receive other benefits and privileges of employment, please contact Human Resources by emailing HRDepartment@plan-sys.com, or by dialing 703-575-8400.",N/A,https://www.indeed.com/viewjob?jk=19515c1f1a6fae5f,False,frontend developer
Senior Frontend Developer Games (remote Europe),Booming Games,Remote,remote,2025-06-19,Indeed,"About the role

You will complete our Game Development crew of 14 lovely and skilled people and report to the Team Lead Frontend Games. Your passion for online casino games combined with your technical knowledge allows us to bring the best slots to the market.

Responsibilities

Game Development & Implementation
Translate game design documents (GDD) into HTML5 game presentations.
Break down GDD features into a Work Breakdown Structure (WBS) and create JIRA tickets.
Ensure tasks are manageable within a maximum of one workweek and align with team estimates.
Implement game features and functionality using TypeScript (latest standard).
Follow best practices, ensuring well-typed and well-documented code.
Use JavaScript (ECMAScript) only when necessary, documented with JSDoc.
Version Control & Code Management
Work with Git (GitLab as the central repository).
Commit code at least once per working day to feature branches.
Follow semantic commit conventions, including (JIRA or similair) ticket ID.
Submit merge requests (MR) when work is completed and defect-free.
Address feedback from MR reviewers and escalate disputes to the Architect or Engineering Manager if needed.
Ensure code adheres to Secure Development Principles.
Visual & Audio Effects Implementation
Integrate static art, animations (Spine), image sequences, and particles.
Use libraries like PIXI.js for optimal rendering performance.
Collaborate with Tech Art to optimize assets for efficient implementation Code Quality & Optimization
Code Quality & Optimization
Ensure clean, well-documented, and tested code.
Use browser developer tools to track FPS, memory, CPU/GPU usage, and draw calls.
Prioritize and fix bugs with utmost urgenc
Maintain unit and integration test coverage, ensuring communicated line coverage is not reduced.
Remove dead code and optimize project assets.
Game Code Building & Delivery
Utilize Webpack for efficient bundling, minification, and optimizat
Optimize images, text, and assets for a production-ready build.
Understand and enhance GitLab CI for efficient deployment
Ensure games are optimized for HTTP/HTTP2/HTTP3, WebSockets, and other network communications to enhance player experience.
Collaboration & Development Process
Work closely with Game Producers, Art Directors, and QA to ensure smooth development.
Conduct game demos for Product Owners.
Address QA-reported defects with highest urgency.
Follow structured development milestones:
Alpha – Game functions as per specification (even if assets are incomplete
Beta – Full asset implementation; game ready for QA testing
Requirements

At least 3 years of Game Development experience and 5 years overall development
Fluent in Typescript and Javascript (ES6) and HTML5/CSS3
Highly experienced with PixiJS, Phaser, or equivalent
Complete fluency in English, written and spoken
Strong communication and teamwork skills
Experienced with Git, JIRA (or equivalent Issue / Project tracking software), and GSuite
Attention to detail, problem-solving, and multitasking skills
Experience with Spine animations, including optimization
Nice to have

Experience with WebGL or other graphics programming API.
Casino slot player.
Creativity.
Background in statically typed languages.
Good to know

This full-time position is on an indefinite freelance basis for contractors within the Central European Timezone +/-2.
Why Work for Booming Games

Founder led. Impact driven. Employee centric.
At Booming Games, we're reshaping the iGaming world with our remote-first approach. Our rhythm? Thrilling slot games with captivating features and stunning designs released every two weeks - no exceptions! Here, it's all about co-ownership and real growth. Dive into a diverse team where your input powers every game we craft!

Our perks

We’re a 100% remote-first company, offering a best-in-class remote experience
Competitive package
Dog friendly offices in Berlin and Malta
Family friendly policies
Career growth opportunities
Zestful working environment
Knowledge sharing opportunities
Dynamic culture surrounded by industry experts
Company social events for team bonding
Contact

Recruiting Team",N/A,https://www.indeed.com/viewjob?jk=380d1e73e4211eb4,False,frontend developer
Junior Web Developer,Caravel Academy,Remote,remote,2025-06-19,Indeed,"We have many opportunities for experienced application developers who can design, create, deploy, and sustain enterprise solutions. We are excited to invest in capable and focused people who bring a positive attitude to every situation that they encounter.
Responsibilities:
Produce well designed, testable, efficient code by using best software development practices
Build application style/user interface by using standard front end practices
Utilize data from various back-end services and databases
Collect and review specifications and requirements based on technical needs
Prepare and maintain software documentation
Maintain, expand, and scale out web based software applications as assigned
Keep up-to-date with emerging technologies and industry trends and apply them into operations and activities
Collaborate with clients and designers to match design intent
Requirements:
3 years experience of working as a Web Developer or Web Programmer
Significant experience with at least one of the following programming languages: Java, PHP, ASP.NET or Javascript
Deep experience with relational database systems, Object Oriented Programming and web application development
Excellent knowledge of how web applications work including security, session management, and best development practices
Excellent knowledge of modern HTML/CSS
Experience with network diagnostics, network analytics tools
Understanding of Search Engine Optimization process
Strong problem solving skills with a creative approach
Strong organizational skills with a good ability to prioritize tasks
BS in computer science or other related area
Job Type: Full-time
Pay: $122,301.00 - $159,765.00 per year
Benefits:
401(k)
401(k) matching
Dental insurance
Flexible schedule
Flexible spending account
Health insurance
Health savings account
Life insurance
Paid time off
Tuition reimbursement
Vision insurance
Work Location: Remote",N/A,https://www.indeed.com/viewjob?jk=e0de40529a9c7e6f,False,frontend developer
Frontend Architect,Steer,"Remote in Boston, MA",remote,2025-06-19,Indeed,"Steer offers a suite of software tools for today's automotive repair shop. We combine a mix of software tools that a repair shop needs to run a highly profitable shop, in one user-friendly, cost-effective platform. Through the Steer CRM suite, we allow the shop owner to get back to focusing on what matters, and to stop worrying about marketing and customer retention.
Steer began as an online directory for drivers to find a local mechanic. Fast forward to today, Steer has launched a complete Customer Relationship Management (CRM) marketing suite, complete with text messaging, email automation, direct mail integration, reputation management, appointment reminders, declined/recommended services, and many other features. We are always innovating and we are proud to be a leader in the automotive repair industry. In August 2024 Steer acquired AutoOps - the leader in modern, intelligent, and fully integrated scheduling software for auto repair shops. AutoOps allows customers to smoothly schedule through a shop's website and Google Business Profile.

About the Role
We're looking for a hands-on, code-first Frontend Architect to lead the evolution of our user interfaces and frontend infrastructure. You will play a pivotal role in shaping the technical direction of our platform's frontend - ensuring scalability, performance, and maintainability. This role combines hands-on technical leadership with the opportunity to mentor fellow engineers and shape best practices that promote high-quality code and continuous improvement. If you're passionate about building exceptional user experiences with modern web technologies and enjoy collaborating in a dynamic environment, this is the perfect opportunity for you.

This role can be remote out of the East Coast (US) or hybrid in Waltham, MA.

You Will:
Technical Leadership: Define and drive the frontend architectural vision and strategy for Steer's products.
Code Quality & Standards: Establish and enforce frontend coding standards, best practices, and guidelines to ensure high-quality, consistent, and maintainable code across the team.
Collaboration & Mentorship: Work closely with product managers, designers, and backend engineers to translate requirements into robust frontend solutions. Mentor and educate other frontend engineers on new technologies, architectural patterns, and best practices.
Design System: Champion scalable and reusable frontend components and libraries that bridge between the design system and customer experience.


You Have

Must Have:
7+ years of professional frontend development experience, with at least 2+ years in a technical leadership or architectural role.
Deep understanding and hands-on experience with React JS and the React ecosystem.
Solid grasp of HTML5, CSS3 (including preprocessors like Sass/LESS), and core JavaScript (ES6+) / Typescript.
Proven experience designing and implementing scalable and maintainable frontend architectures (e.g., component-based architecture, state management patterns, module federation, micro-frontends).
Proficiency with frontend build tools (Webpack, Vite, Parcel), package managers (npm, yarn), version control (Git), and testing frameworks (Jest, Cypress, Playwright).
Excellent communication and English fluency, with a proven ability to collaborate effectively with cross-functional teams and mentor other engineers.
Nice to Have:
SaaS experience.
Familiarity with backend technologies (e.g., Node.js, Python, Ruby).
Understanding of UI/UX design principles.
Experience with CI/CD pipelines and deployment methodologies.

Interview Process
Initial Screen (30 min)
Hiring Manager Interview (45 min)
Technical Interview (45 min)
Leadership Interview (30 min) + Career Journey Interview (60 min)
Product/Design Interview (45 min)
Reference Checks

We Offer:
100% employer paid medical insurance
Flexible PTO with 15 days minimum
FSA and HSA options
Generous Parental Leave
401k
Learning Stipend
WFH Equipment
Chance to work with the latest technology
A collaborative and innovative work culture
Opportunities for career growth and development

Why Join Steer?

At Steer, we align our mission of transforming the auto repair experience for shop owners and their customers with your passion for growth, innovation, and excellence.
Here, you'll find opportunities to expand your skills, take on career-shaping challenges, and contribute to the future of the auto repair industry, all while enjoying comprehensive benefits and flexible work arrangements to support your well-being.
Join Steer to be part of a forward-thinking, flexible, and collaborative culture where you are empowered to do meaningful and impactful work.




We value diversity and believe that forming teams in which everyone can be their authentic self is key to our success. We welcome applications from those with diverse backgrounds and industries.
Our hiring process looks beyond just credentials. The school you went to at 18 doesn't define your potential to thrive and enrich our culture. Even if you don't meet every requirement, we invite you to apply.",N/A,https://www.indeed.com/viewjob?jk=60703c9c677c06e2,False,frontend developer
React Developer,"Amwins Group, Inc.",Remote,remote,2025-06-19,Indeed,"Job Title: React Developer
Job Summary: We are seeking a skilled React Developer to join our team. The ideal candidate will have extensive experience in developing user interfaces using React and TypeScript. This role will primarily focus on front-end development but will also require some knowledge of back-end technologies such as C# and .NET.
Key Responsibilities:
Develop and maintain user interfaces using React and TypeScript.
Collaborate with cross-functional teams, including marketing, IT, and customer service, to deliver high-quality software solutions.
Work on the Doc's UI project, which involves creating a single-page application using React and TypeScript.
Utilize libraries such as React Query, React Testing Library, and Kendo UI React Component Library.
Manage data grids and handle large sets of data.
Perform unit testing and ensure code quality.
Collaborate with the back-end team to integrate front-end components with the back-end system, primarily using SharePoint.
Required Skills:
5+ years of React experience
Proficiency in React and TypeScript.
Experience with C# and .NET is a plus.
Knowledge of React Query, React Testing Library, and Kendo UI React Component Library.
Strong understanding of performance considerations and best practices in front-end development.
Experience in unit testing and ensuring code quality.
Ability to work well with cross-functional teams and understand business needs.
Excellent communication and collaboration skills.
Preferred Skills:
Microsoft Azure
Experience with React Native for mobile app development.
Knowledge of enterprise development and working with large data sets.",N/A,https://www.indeed.com/viewjob?jk=e2c22e198e2a0f03,False,frontend developer
Junior Backend Software Engineer,Deep Reef,Remote,remote,2025-06-19,Indeed,"Overview
We are seeking a motivated and detail-oriented Junior Software Engineer to join our dynamic development team here at Deep Reef. Based in Colorado, you will be able to perform this role fully remote. In this role, you will have the opportunity to work on exciting Warehouse Management, Enterprise Resource Planning and Ecommerce-related software projects, contribute to innovative solutions, and enhance your technical skills in a collaborative environment. As a Junior Software Engineer, you will assist in the design, development, and maintenance of software applications while gaining hands-on experience with various technologies.
Responsibilities
Collaborate with senior engineers to design and implement software solutions that meet project requirements.
Write clean, maintainable code using languages such as Go, Java, Python, and JavaScript (depending on the project).
Participate in code reviews to ensure code quality and adherence to best practices.
Assist in the development of database schemas and queries using SQL and MongoDB.
Support the integration of APIs and services using technologies like AWS.
Troubleshoot and resolve software defects and issues as they arise.
Document software designs, processes, and technical specifications for future reference.
Stay updated on emerging technologies and industry trends to continuously improve skills.
Qualifications
Familiarity with database management systems including SQL and MongoDB.
Understanding of web services and protocols (WCF, SSIS).
Experience with JSON/XML for data interchange is a plus.
Strong problem-solving skills and attention to detail.
Ability to work collaboratively within a team environment.
Excellent communication skills, both written and verbal.
A degree in Computer Science or a related field is preferred but not mandatory.
If you are passionate about software development and eager to learn in a supportive environment, we encourage you to apply for this exciting opportunity as a Junior Software Engineer.
Job Type: Full-time
Pay: $60,000.00 - $94,000.00 per year
Benefits:
Flexible schedule
Schedule:
Day shift
Work Location: Remote",N/A,https://www.indeed.com/viewjob?jk=8a83d91ae3287b4a,False,backend developer
Junior Web Developer,Caravel Academy,Remote,remote,2025-06-19,Indeed,"We have many opportunities for experienced application developers who can design, create, deploy, and sustain enterprise solutions. We are excited to invest in capable and focused people who bring a positive attitude to every situation that they encounter.
Responsibilities:
Produce well designed, testable, efficient code by using best software development practices
Build application style/user interface by using standard front end practices
Utilize data from various back-end services and databases
Collect and review specifications and requirements based on technical needs
Prepare and maintain software documentation
Maintain, expand, and scale out web based software applications as assigned
Keep up-to-date with emerging technologies and industry trends and apply them into operations and activities
Collaborate with clients and designers to match design intent
Requirements:
3 years experience of working as a Web Developer or Web Programmer
Significant experience with at least one of the following programming languages: Java, PHP, ASP.NET or Javascript
Deep experience with relational database systems, Object Oriented Programming and web application development
Excellent knowledge of how web applications work including security, session management, and best development practices
Excellent knowledge of modern HTML/CSS
Experience with network diagnostics, network analytics tools
Understanding of Search Engine Optimization process
Strong problem solving skills with a creative approach
Strong organizational skills with a good ability to prioritize tasks
BS in computer science or other related area
Job Type: Full-time
Pay: $122,301.00 - $159,765.00 per year
Benefits:
401(k)
401(k) matching
Dental insurance
Flexible schedule
Flexible spending account
Health insurance
Health savings account
Life insurance
Paid time off
Tuition reimbursement
Vision insurance
Work Location: Remote",N/A,https://www.indeed.com/viewjob?jk=e0de40529a9c7e6f,False,backend developer
Jr Web Developer (Entry Level),"Planned Systems International, Inc.",Remote,remote,2025-06-19,Indeed,"Overview:
Planned Systems International (PSI) is an Enterprise IT services company who focuses on designing, building, securing, and operating cutting-edge software solutions that drive mission success and operational excellence for Federal Government organizations. PSI is currently seeking a dedicated and detail-oriented Junior Web Developer to join our dynamic team.
Essential Functions and Job Responsibilities:
Successful candidates will provide website design, development, testing, management and support of the hardware/software infrastructure for a web-based portal for our government client. Essential functions will include, but not be limited to:
Performing all aspects of the development tasks, including front-end, back-end, and database development.
Managing resources to ensure timely and successful deliveries.
Working with clients and review panels to identify recommendations for the appropriate technical, business and human factors solutions.
Commitment to clear and quality communications between team and client product managers.
Commitment to promoting a collaborative work environment with team members and customers.
Develop and maintain web-enabled capabilities and custom applications.
Lead staff in defining and tracking project requirements, plans, and schedules.
Commitment to delivery of quality products.
Minimum Requirements:
Bachelor’s degree in Computer Science, Engineering, or closely related field.
Strong understanding of user interface design principles, with proven track record of creative web site development in accordance with the design specifications, user interface style guides and established usability standards.
Must have strong experience working with a variety of technology and the ability to multi-task between different projects and workflow stages.
Must have experience communicating directly with end users and the ability to gather requirements.
Experience analyzing business product needs, recommending, then possibly implementing, effective software solutions in a timely manner.
Experience analyzing core standards for software development, and maintaining an effective process for support.
Experience providing guidance and leadership to other developers and development teams.
U.S. Citizenship is required. Candidates selected must be able to successfully obtain and maintain a Public Trust security clearance.
Desired Qualifications:
Currently holds a DHS Public Trust Clearance.
Certified in Lean Software Development, Kanban, Scrum and other Agile processes.
Department Homeland Security (DHS) Experience.
Company Benefits:
PSI offers full-time, benefits eligible employees a competitive total compensation package that includes paid leave, and options for employer sponsored group medical, dental, vision, short-term and long-term disability, life insurance, AD&D coverage, legal services, identity theft, and accident insurance. Flexible spending account and health saving account options offer pre-tax savings for qualified medical, dental, and vision expenses. The company sponsored 401(k) retirement plan has an employer contribution match that is immediately vested. We invest in the professional growth of our employees through professional courses, certifications, and tuition reimbursement programs.
EEO Commitment:
It is company policy to promote equal employment opportunities. All personnel decisions, including, but not limited to, recruiting, hiring, training, promotion, compensation, benefits, and termination, are made without regard to race, color, religion, age, sex, sexual orientation, pregnancy, gender identity, genetic information, national origin, citizenship status, veteran status, protected veteran status, disability, or any other characteristic protected by applicable federal, state, or local law.

Reasonable accommodations for applicants and employees with disabilities will be provided. If a reasonable accommodation is needed to participate in the job application or interview process, to perform essential job functions, and/or to receive other benefits and privileges of employment, please contact Human Resources by emailing HRDepartment@plan-sys.com, or by dialing 703-575-8400.",N/A,https://www.indeed.com/viewjob?jk=19515c1f1a6fae5f,False,backend developer
Frontend Developer,"Arch Systems, LLC",Remote,remote,2025-06-19,Indeed,"Role: Frontend Developer
Company: Arch Systems
Client: Federal
Location: Remote
Type: Full-time
Prior experience working on Federal government projects is mandatory for this role.
Summary:
The Frontend Developer will lead the development and continuous improvement of user interfaces for SAMHSA’s public-facing data tools, including the NSDUH Small Area Estimates (SAE) Visualization and Quick Statistics modules. This position is central to enabling user access to national behavioral health data via modern, interactive web experiences that comply with US Web Design System (USWDS) and federal accessibility standards.
Key Responsibilities:
Develop and enhance frontend components using React.js, Node.js, JQuery, Bootstrap, and D3.js for the SAE Visualization platform and Quick Statistics tools.
Integrate dynamic web interfaces with backend services via REST APIs built in Express, Django, and Rserve.
Implement visualizations using GeoJSON, TopoJSON, and GDAL-prepared shapefiles.
Ensure full Section 508 and WCAG 2.1 compliance across all visual layers.
Support web containerization and builds using Docker, Webpack, and Nginx.
Participate in Agile sprints, including code reviews, unit testing, and stakeholder demos.
Align all UI/UX with SAMHSA branding, USWDS, and HHS/OC coordination
Job Types: Full-time, Contract
Pay: $95,000.00 - $110,000.00 per year
Benefits:
401(k)
Health insurance
Vision insurance
Work Location: Remote",N/A,https://www.indeed.com/viewjob?jk=f581cc8ac105e273,False,backend developer
Backend Developer,mCards Inc.,Remote,remote,2025-06-19,Indeed,"BACKEND DEVELOPER
MCARDS
mCards is growing and we are looking for a Back-End Software Developer to join our team. mCards is a Co-brandable Payment Card that removes the limitations of traditional credit and debit cards, connected to an ever-expanding marketplace of fintech features. The mCards app features the wide array of services provided by our partners, which can be added within the mCards app.
ROLE
We are looking for an experienced Backend Developer with minimum five years of experience, proficient with Ruby-on–Rails, to create scalable, well-designed features for our mobile card platform and its supporting backend systems. Responsibilities will include developing server-side logic for web-based applications, database development, application integration, and API development to build a foundation for efficient and effective web applications.
DUTIES & RESPONSIBILITIES
Develop and maintain server-side logic and architecture for mCards’ web application.
Construct and manage database schemas and their relationships.
Write reusable, reliable, performant, and high-quality code.
Develop and fix defects independently for medium/large features, while mentoring junior developers.
Helping to make strategic decisions about the backend technology stack, including best practices in event-driven architectures and cloud-based solutions.
Actively contributing to backend development while providing guidance and mentorship to your engineering team.
Learn and master the company's technical stack, languages, and systems.
Work closely with cross-functional teams including mobile and front-end developers, QA, project managers, and product managers.
Proactively identify and communicate roadblocks and over-budget tasks.
Contribute to project estimates.
Stay informed about emerging technologies, development platforms, frameworks, and industry solutions.
Manage tasks and track progress using Issue Tracking software.
REQUIREMENTS
Proven experience as a Backend Developer
Strong knowledge of backend programming languages including Java, Python and Ruby.
Bachelor’s degree in Computer Science, Engineering, Computer Information Systems, or equivalent work experience, and 5+ years of Senior or higher backend development experience.
Experience with database technologies
Knowledge of user authentication and authorization between multiple systems, servers and environments.
Critical thinking and problem-solving skills with attention to detail
Five to ten years of professional experience with Ruby on Rails
Extensive experience with developing and publishing API Endpoints
Ability to work on multiple projects in the same week
Ability to learn new technologies quickly.
Team player with an interest in cross team collaboration
Personal commitment to code quality and good engineering practices
Location: Work Remotely within the United StatesJob Type: Full-timeSchedule: Monday to Friday
ADDITIONAL SKILLS
CI/Automation
AWS Experience with Code Pipeline, Elastic Beanstalk, RDS, AWS Amplify
Docker, CircleCI, Redis, and Terraform
Cybersecurity
API Scaling
PCI Compliance
Payments and Financial Technology
We thank all interested candidates for their time and consideration; and only candidates we are interested in pursuing an interview with will be contacted. As we are in the Financial Industry, there is a background check required prior to onboarding.
mCards Inc. is committed to creating a diverse environment and is proud to be an equal opportunity employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, colour, religion, gender, gender identity or expression, sexual orientation, national origin, genetics, disability, age, or veteran status.
Job Type: Full-time
Pay: $90,000.00 - $120,000.00 per year
Benefits:
Health insurance
Schedule:
Monday to Friday
Application Question(s):
What is the largest team of people that you have managed in your career?
Have you ever managed or lead a team?
If so, what is the largest team of people that you have managed in your career?
Education:
Bachelor's (Required)
Experience:
RoR: 5 years (Required)
developing API endpoints: 4 years (Required)
Work Location: Remote",N/A,https://www.indeed.com/viewjob?jk=c0aa4abe2c7c866c,False,backend developer
Front End Web Developer – WordPress/Elementor,WRS Health,Remote,remote,2025-06-19,Indeed,"Company Overview
Voted #1 EHR by PC Mag, WRS Health delivers a fully integrated cloud based EMR and practice management solutions to its clients. We bring solutions to physicians by providing constant enhancement of our products and services including EHR, practice management, marketing, patient coordination and billing.
Job Purpose and Role
We are seeking a talented Front End Developer with expertise in WordPress and Elementor to join our team. In this role, you will be responsible for updating and customizing our website by collaborating with marketing and ensuring that the site is optimized for both user experience and performance. You will work closely with other team members within a scrum framework, contributing to the overall development process and bridging the gap between design and technical implementation.
You’ll work on a mix of internal marketing sites, client projects, and ongoing site updates.
Job Duties and Responsibilities
Collaborate with the marketing team to integrate engaging content into the website using WordPress and Elementor for both internal marketing and client websites.
Work closely with designers, content creators, and marketing teams to ensure websites meet business goals and brand standards.
Work within a multidisciplinary team, including back-end developers and web designers, to deliver cohesive and functional applications.
Ensure that the website design aligns with user experience requirements and is consistent with UX guidelines.
Collaborate with stakeholders to gather requirements and provide technical recommendations for new projects
Document processes, coding practices, and custom development work to ensure knowledge transfer within the team.
Stay up-to-date on emerging technologies, continuously improving and updating skills to bring innovative solutions to the team.
Qualifications
Minimum of 3 years of proven experience as a Front End Developer.
Proficient in WordPress development and customization.
Proficient with Elementor.
Strong skills in front-end development, including HTML5, CSS3, and JavaScript.
Strong problem-solving skills and attention to detail, with a focus on delivering high-quality work.
Excellent communication skills, with the ability to interact effectively with team members at all levels.
Knowledge of current SEO techniques and how to implement them within WordPress.
Familiarity with tools like Google PageSpeed Insights, GTmetrix, or Lighthouse for performance analysis and optimization.
Experience with Google Analytics 4 (GA4) and Google Tag Manager configuration is a plus.

This is an Independent Contractor position.
Job Type: Full-time - Remote
Hours: 8:30 AM to 4:30 PM EST or 9:00 AM to 5:00 PM EST
This job description is intended to describe the general requirements for the position. It is not a complete statement of duties, responsibilities or requirements. Other duties not listed here may be assigned as necessary to ensure proper operations of the department.

OdEvjkpagw",N/A,https://www.indeed.com/viewjob?jk=1cbeaa58a5ce6b30,False,backend developer
Web Developer,BxB media,"Remote in Rochester Hills, MI 48306",remote,2025-06-19,Indeed,"We are hiring a Web Developer!
We, at BxB Media, collaborate with HVAC and other home services professionals to build great brands and help them grow. We believe that not only does our company culture directly impact the lives of our employees, but it has a profound impact on the quality of work we provide to our clients.
People who enjoy working hard in a fast-paced, remote environment will thrive here. Being able to work under pressure but also knowing when to ask for help are necessary skills. At the end of the work week, you should be able to feel a sense of satisfaction because you know you worked hard as part of a supportive, creative team and that you made a difference by helping our clients move their business forward.
What BxB Media has to offer / Benefits:
Health insurance Blue Cross / Blue Shield 100% paid of the basic plan for the employee, 4 plans available
Vision and dental insurance, 50% paid for employees
13 days paid time off (104 hours)
6 paid holidays
401K with up to 4% match, eligible after year 1
Short and long-term disability
$20,000 Term life insurance benefits
Eligible to add group life and accidental insurance
Job Title: Web Developer
Location: Fully Remote
Pay Rate: $27.00 - $35.00 an hour, depending on experience
Work Schedule: Monday through Friday, 8:00 am - 5:00 pm, some weeknights and some weekends depending on seasonality.
We seek a skilled and solutions-driven Web Developer to join our Development Team. This position plays a vital role in building, maintaining, and improving client websites. If you're someone who loves solving problems with code, thrives in a collaborative team environment, and takes pride in delivering clean, functional, and visually appealing websites-then we want to hear from you!
Primary Job Functions: The Web Developer role is responsible for building and maintaining client websites. The department focuses on leveraging individual strengths. While most projects involve backend development for internal pages, CSS for homepages, DNS and database management for launches, and ongoing maintenance tasks, each portion has a dedicated team to handle that section. Our projects are primarily built on the WordPress platform, requiring proficiency in WordPress, PHP, HTML, CSS, and API integrations. Familiarity with DNS, database management, and ServiceTitan is a plus.
Core Responsibilities:
Develop and implement backend solutions for the efficient creation and management of website content
Style homepages based on designs created by our Creative Department using CSS, ensuring they are responsive, visually appealing, and functional
Manage DNS and database tasks for website launches
Perform ongoing maintenance on existing client websites, including adding content or modules and troubleshooting issues
Collaborate with designers, content creators, and marketing teams to execute website strategies
Utilize WordPress and its environment, including custom functions, post types, ACF, and Gravity Forms
Work with APIs for enhanced website functionality
Maintain thorough documentation of development processes and changes
Participate in regular team meetings to discuss project progress and address any challenges
Desired Requirements:
High School Diploma or GED
3+ years of experience with WordPress
Strong communication and organizational skills
Self-motivated and timely in all work
Forward-thinking approach, considering future impacts of current decisions
Experience with Microsoft Office (Word, Excel, SharePoint)
Proficient in project management tools and techniques
Understanding of web development processes and technologies
Check us out online: www.bxbknowshvac.com

WE ARE A 100% DRUG AND NICOTINE-FREE EMPLOYER",N/A,https://www.indeed.com/viewjob?jk=fbbcc762ee1103fa,False,backend developer
Full Stack Developer,Surface Design Solutions,Remote,remote,2025-06-19,Indeed,"Job Title: Full-Stack Software Developer at Surface Design Solutions, Inc.
Job Description:
We are looking for a full-time developer to join our team. As we look to accelerate our growth, we want to bring on a developer who can help us grow and who is excited about growing with us. The position will involve designing and implementing robust software solutions that empower our customers to leverage Surface Design Solutions' patented machine-learning algorithms. The work will directly enable our customers to be more cost-efficient and sustainable in their manufacturing, while making higher-quality products.
Salary and stock options are negotiable.
About Us: We are a group of scientists and engineers who are passionate about improving manufacturing through the optimization of surfaces. Surface-related problems degrade the manufacturing of products in industries from aerospace and electric vehicles to semiconductors and medical devices. Our technology uses physics-informed machine learning to demystify these problems and deliver wholly new solutions. We are looking for someone who is excited to work as part of a small, tight-knit team on complex, engineering problems.
We support high-volume product manufacturers by providing purpose-built manufacturing specifications that enhance product lifespan and improve production efficiency. We accomplish this through data-enabled optimization of their manufacturing operations, and particularly around the surfaces of tooling and parts. Inadequate surface finish can lead to issues such as the peeling off of paints and coatings, increased friction and wear in motors or machines, or premature failure of critical components in spacecraft. Our commitment to innovation has earned us recognition among industry leaders and trade organizations.
About the Role: As a Full-Stack Software Developer, you will be responsible for developing a backend server that consists of a REST API, a database and a system for managing and orchestrating machine-learning workflows. These responsibilities include the development of unit and integration tests to ensure software quality. We expect you to collaborate with internal and external stakeholders to identify and address their needs, and to contribute to the continued success of our groundbreaking solutions.
About You: The ideal candidate will have the following skills and experience:
§ Proven experience with REST API backend development in Python and Django
§ Proficiency in deploying the backend software stack on AWS infrastructure
§ Experience with Celery is a plus
§ Familiarity with the version control system Git
§ Experience working in software-development teams
§ A willingness to learn and understand industry-specific challenges
§ Excellent written and verbal communication skills
§ Entrepreneurial skills are a plus
§ Experience or willingness to engage with frontend development through Vuejs
If you are ready to make a significant impact in a vibrant environment, we invite you to become part of our team. Apply online here, and please email a cover letter to jobs@surface.design for review. In your cover letter, please elaborate on how your experience aligns with and contributes to the success of this role.
While this position is open to candidates across the United States, preference may be given to those located on the US East Coast to facilitate collaboration with the team. The ability to join team meetings occasionally in person in Pittsburgh will be a plus. Application review will begin on June 18th. We look forward to seeing your application!
Job Type: Full-time
Pay: $90,000.00 - $120,000.00 per year
Benefits:
Health insurance
Retirement plan
Schedule:
Choose your own hours
Work Location: Remote",N/A,https://www.indeed.com/viewjob?jk=bf23cc444b4cb4b0,False,backend developer
"Full Stack Developer (React Native, React, Node)",Peachy,Remote,remote,2025-06-19,Indeed,"YO.Ventures (https://www.yo.ventures/) is a fast-moving product studio and the sister company of Peachy (https://www.wearepeachy.com/).
We launch and grow impactful digital products across industries — from mobile consumer apps to SaaS platforms and branded commerce experiences.
We're now looking for a full-time remote Full Stack Engineer (React, React Native, Node.js) to join our distributed team. You'll work closely with design and product to build beautiful, performant apps and web applications. This is a hands-on role where your technical decisions will directly shape the success of each product.
➖ What You'll Need to Succeed:
3+ years of experience building production-ready React Native apps.
Strong full-stack engineering background (Node.js, Firebase, PostgreSQL, REST APIs).
Experience with TypeScript, scalable architecture, and component-based design.
Familiarity with Git, automated deployment flows, and CI/CD pipelines.
Strong problem-solving skills and ability to work independently in a fast-paced environment.
Clear written and verbal communication skills ( Upper Intermediate English proficiency required).
Bonus: Experience with Next.js, Stripe, Shopify API.
➖ What You'll Do:
Build and maintain cross-platform mobile apps using React Native (Expo + TypeScript).
Contribute to both front-end and back-end codebases using Node.js, Firebase, Supabase, and PostgreSQL.
Integrate third-party APIs, payment systems like Stripe, and auth flows.
Collaborate with the design team (Figma) to translate UI into production-ready components.
Ship MVPs, validate with users, and iterate based on real feedback.
Support deployment processes using CI/CD pipelines via GitHub Actions.
Maintain a clean, scalable architecture with testable, well-documented code.
Optimize app performance across devices (iOS & Android).
➖ What You'll Get at YO.Ventures:
The opportunity to work on multiple ambitious digital products from day one.
A collaborative, remote-first environment with a lean and talented team.
Flexible working hours and full autonomy over your schedule.
Competitive compensation + regular performance reviews.
Access to paid training, tech courses, and professional development resources.
Direct involvement in the product vision, roadmap, and tech stack decisions.
Work on meaningful projects in diverse verticals like finance, eCommerce, wellness, and productivity.
Clear growth opportunities and a long-term path with a supportive team.
A culture that values speed, ownership, experimentation — and kindness.
If you're ready to build high-quality digital — apply now and let's create something great together.",N/A,https://www.indeed.com/viewjob?jk=49e8df047b3f8f12,False,backend developer
"Software Engineer II, Fullstack",Included Health,Remote,remote,2025-06-19,Indeed,"Job Summary:
Software Engineer II, Fullstack is responsible for building fast, accessible, and thoughtfully designed products. You'll collaborate with our Product and Design teams to shape application architecture, enhance user experiences, improve developer workflows, and support robust deployment and testing strategies.

Responsibilities:
Partner with product managers to lead the technical planning of member experience improvements.
Contribute across the full stack of web technology, frontend, API, and backend.
Design systems that span multiple services to allow consistent, fast, clean data flow.
Swiftly address any issues and invest in resolutions that improve the product's reliability going forward.
Participate in and influence technical decisions of the wider Applications Engineering team.
Promote software engineering best practices across teams.
Qualifications:
3+ years of experience creating and maintaining APIs (REST, GraphQL)
Experience delivering scalable, reliable, high-quality user experiences
Hands-on experience with full stack development
Experience in our current technologies is a bonus: React, Go, GraphQL, Docker, or AWS
Physical/Cognitive Requirements:
Capability to remain seated in a stationary position for prolonged periods.
Eye-hand coordination and manual dexterity to operate keyboard, computer and other office-related equipment.
The United States new hire base salary target ranges for this full-time position are:
Zone A: $118,640.00 - $167,580.00 + equity + benefits
Zone B: $136,436.00 - $192,720.00 + equity + benefits
Zone C: $148,300.00 - $209,480.00 + equity + benefits
Zone D: $154,232.00 - $217,850.00 + equity + benefits

This range reflects the minimum and maximum target for new hire salaries for candidates based on their respective Zone. Below is additional information on Included Health's commitment to maintaining transparent and equitable compensation practices across our distinct geographic zones.

Starting base salary for you will depend on several job-related factors, unique to each candidate, which may include education; training; skills; years and depth of experience; certifications and licensure; our needs; internal peer equity; organizational considerations; and understanding of geographic and market data. Compensation structures and ranges are tailored to each zone's unique market conditions to ensure that all employees receive fair and great compensation package based on their roles and locations. Your Recruiter can share your geographic zone upon inquiry.

Benefits & Perks:
In addition to receiving a great compensation package, the compensation package may include, depending on the role, the following and more:
Remote-first culture
401(k) savings plan through Fidelity
Comprehensive medical, vision, and dental coverage through multiple medical plan options (including disability insurance)
Paid Time Off (""PTO"") and Discretionary Time Off (“DTO"")
12 weeks of 100% Paid Parental leave
Family Building & Compassionate Leave: Fertility coverage, $25,000 for surrogacy/adoption, and paid leave for failed treatments, adoption or pregnancies.
Work-From-Home reimbursement to support team collaboration home office work

Your recruiter will share more about the salary range and benefits package for your role during the hiring process.

About Included Health

Included Health is a new kind of healthcare company, delivering integrated virtual care and navigation. We’re on a mission to raise the standard of healthcare for everyone. We break down barriers to provide high-quality care for every person in every community — no matter where they are in their health journey or what type of care they need, from acute to chronic, behavioral to physical. We offer our members care guidance, advocacy, and access to personalized virtual and in-person care for everyday and urgent care, primary care, behavioral health, and specialty care. It’s all included. Learn more at includedhealth.com.
-
Included Health is an Equal Opportunity Employer and considers applicants for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, orientation, national origin, age, disability, genetics or any other basis forbidden under federal, state, or local law. Included Health considers all qualified applicants with arrest or conviction records in accordance with the San Francisco Fair Chance Ordinance, the Los Angeles County Fair Chance Ordinance, and California law.",N/A,https://www.indeed.com/viewjob?jk=c8929f282017886f,False,full stack developer
NodeJS Full Stack Developer,"Buyers Edge Platform, LLC",Remote,remote,2025-06-19,Indeed,"We are seeking a Software Developer to assist in implementing features additions and bug fixes for several of our platform portals. You will have the opportunity to make a major impact as we build new integrations and create major new portal features to be added over the next year
Who we are:
Buyers Edge Platform stands at the forefront of revolutionizing the foodservice industry through technology, purchasing power and partnerships. We are dedicated to empowering stakeholders across the entire foodservice ecosystem (operators, distributors, manufacturers) with efficiency and unprecedented visibility. With a diverse portfolio of over a dozen brands, our mission is clear: to reduce costs, streamline the foodservice supply chain, and propel the industry from manual to automated.
Today, we are one of the largest players in foodservice, with over 200K operator locations across North America and over $50 billion of aggregated spend volume. Our commitment to foodservice excellence is proven in four distinct areas of value: Digital Procurement Network, Fresh Solutions, Supply Chain Management, and Software. Buyers Edge Platform is not just a provider – we are a strategic partner on the journey towards a more efficient, connected, and automated future for the foodservice industry.
We are focused on performance, not presence. What matters is not that you are sitting in front of your computer from 9am to 5pm, but rather that you build highly effective and efficient software within agreed timelines. In practice, this might mean working extra hours some days to hit that while having other days that allow for more free time and recovery.
Our goal is for Buyers Edge Platform to be a place where people are able to work in a way that is the most efficient and effective for them. This will enable us all to enjoy the solutions we build and the team we are on.
We are unable to offer work sponsorship for this role.
Your impact:
Software Development:
Design, code, test, and debug software applications based on requirements and specifications.
Implement new features and functionalities in existing software products.
Maintain and enhance existing software systems.
Write clean, efficient, and maintainable code.
Follow best practices in software development and coding standards.
Technical Design and Documentation:
Collaborate with technical architects and senior developers to design software solutions.
Create technical design documentation such as architecture diagrams, flowcharts, and data models.
Document code and development processes for future reference and maintenance.
Problem Solving and Troubleshooting:
Identify and resolve technical issues and bugs in software applications.
Conduct root cause analysis of software problems and implement solutions.
Perform unit testing and participate in code reviews to ensure quality.
Collaboration and Communication:
Work closely with cross-functional teams including product managers, designers, and quality assurance engineers.
Communicate effectively with team members to understand requirements and provide status updates.
Participate in meetings, stand-ups, and brainstorming sessions to discuss project progress and challenges.
Technical Skills Development:
Stay updated with the latest technologies, tools, and frameworks relevant to software development.
Continuously improve technical skills through self-learning, training, and participation in workshops or conferences.
Mentor junior developers and assist in their skill development.
Version Control and Deployment:
Utilize version control systems such as Git for code management and collaboration.
Manage code repositories, branches, and merges effectively.
Assist in the deployment and release process of software applications.
Performance Optimization and Scalability:
Identify opportunities to improve the performance and scalability of software systems.
Optimize code, database queries, and system architecture for better efficiency.
Conduct performance testing and tuning to ensure optimal software performance.
Security and Compliance:
Follow security best practices in software development to prevent vulnerabilities and data breaches.
Ensure compliance with relevant regulations and standards such as GDPR, HIPAA, or PCI DSS.
Conduct security assessments and implement necessary measures to enhance software security.
Customer Support and Maintenance:
Provide technical support to end-users and clients, including troubleshooting and issue resolution.
Respond to customer feedback and incorporate improvements into software products.
Perform regular maintenance activities such as updates, patches, and bug fixes
About you:
3-5 years of development experience in a professional environment
3+ years of experience with NodeJS and Express
3+ years of experience with React or similar framework
MySQL/PostgreSQL experience required
Git or similar version control system experience
Jira or similar project management system experience
Proven experience collaborating with a product team
Proven ability to handle multiple projects at once
Not sure you meet every qualification? Studies show that diverse applicants often hesitate to apply unless they check every box. At Buyers Edge Platform, we value authenticity and inclusion—if you're excited about the role, we encourage you to apply. You might be exactly who we're looking for!
What's in this for you:
Great benefits from day one. We offer medical, dental, vision, FSA, company-paid life insurance, and more—plus a 401(k) with company match.
Grow with us. Enjoy strong training, development, and competitive pay.
Work-life balance. Our flexible PTO policy lets you take time when you need it—no accrual required.
We welcome all.
We are committed to creating a diverse environment and are proud to be an equal opportunity employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to actual or perceived race, color, creed, religion, national origin, ancestry, citizenship status, age, sex or gender (including pregnancy, childbirth and pregnancy-related conditions), gender identity or expression (including transgender status), sexual orientation, marital status, military service and veteran status, physical or mental disability, genetic information, or any other characteristic protected by applicable federal, state or local laws and ordinances.",N/A,https://www.indeed.com/viewjob?jk=0746bdf5314d12b0,False,full stack developer
Full Stack Developer,Ender-IT,"Remote in Herndon, VA",remote,2025-06-19,Indeed,"Job ID
Job Requirements
Location
Email
317548
Full Stack Developer
Herndon, Virginia, US
hr@ender-it.com
Description
Looking For Full Stack Java Developer : (Remote)

Must Have Skills:

Following Skill are required for this role -

Java
SpringBoot
Microservices
JSON
XML
OOP
AWS
Lambda
EC2
S3",N/A,https://www.indeed.com/viewjob?jk=20918b1ea49a58d0,False,full stack developer
Intermediate Full Stack Developer - Temporary.,EX Squared LATAM,Remote,remote,2025-06-19,Indeed,"Become an EXpert as an Intermediate Full Stack Developer - Temporary
Why Join EX Squared?
We're a digital consultancy with teams across LATAM, the U.S., and India, helping organizations design and scale transformative digital experiences. At EX Squared, you'll collaborate with global professionals, work on exciting cross-industry projects, and access learning tools to continuously grow your skills.

We're looking for a passionate Intermediate Full Stack Developer to join our team on a 6-month contract (with potential for extension). This is a high-impact role where you'll work alongside developers, QAs, and architects to build robust, customer-facing digital products using modern technologie
If you're a proactive developer with a strong command of React and Node.js, who can spin up cloud infrastructure, build secure services, and enjoys working across the full development stack—this could be your next exciting challenge.
What You'll Do:
As an Intermediate Full Stack Developer, you'll play a pivotal role in delivering responsive and high-performing applications. You'll:
Develop modern UIs using HTML, CSS, JavaScript (React)
Write clean, efficient server-side code using Node.js and TypeScript.
Design responsive web applications and ensure cross-device compatibility.
Create and consume RESTful APIs and GraphQL services.
Manage data flows and backend logic, working with databases like MySQL, PostgreSQL or MongoDB.
Ensure performance, scalability, and security across the application stack.
Collaborate closely with cross-functional teams and contribute to architecture decisions.
Debug, troubleshoot, and deploy scalable web solutions
Work comfortably in the command line and with cloud platforms
What You'll Bring
We're looking for a solutions-driven developer who enjoys autonomy and is eager to bring innovation into action. You'll need:
3+ years of hands-on experience with React & Node.js
Strong understanding of clean code principles and web application architecture
Experience building end-to-end prototypes and taking them to production
Previous involvement in at least one large-scale digital product
Comfort using Linux/Mac/Windows CLI
Familiarity with GraphQL and Apollo
Eagerness to learn new technologies and trends
Experience with CMS integrations and content modeling
Advanced English proficiency (C1) – you'll be collaborating with international teams daily
Nice to Have
Experience with AWS and Docker
Familiarity with Next.js and server-side rendering (SSR)
Styled Components or similar CSS-in-JS libraries
Ecommerce platform experience (e.g., Shopify Plus, CommerceCloud, Hybris)
What We Offer
USD-based compensation
Fully remote contract role with flexible hours
Learning support through EX Squared University and partner networks
Inclusive, diverse, and collaborative work environment",N/A,https://www.indeed.com/viewjob?jk=a3d5f8f620c86a2e,False,full stack developer
Full Stack Developer,Surface Design Solutions,Remote,remote,2025-06-19,Indeed,"Job Title: Full-Stack Software Developer at Surface Design Solutions, Inc.
Job Description:
We are looking for a full-time developer to join our team. As we look to accelerate our growth, we want to bring on a developer who can help us grow and who is excited about growing with us. The position will involve designing and implementing robust software solutions that empower our customers to leverage Surface Design Solutions' patented machine-learning algorithms. The work will directly enable our customers to be more cost-efficient and sustainable in their manufacturing, while making higher-quality products.
Salary and stock options are negotiable.
About Us: We are a group of scientists and engineers who are passionate about improving manufacturing through the optimization of surfaces. Surface-related problems degrade the manufacturing of products in industries from aerospace and electric vehicles to semiconductors and medical devices. Our technology uses physics-informed machine learning to demystify these problems and deliver wholly new solutions. We are looking for someone who is excited to work as part of a small, tight-knit team on complex, engineering problems.
We support high-volume product manufacturers by providing purpose-built manufacturing specifications that enhance product lifespan and improve production efficiency. We accomplish this through data-enabled optimization of their manufacturing operations, and particularly around the surfaces of tooling and parts. Inadequate surface finish can lead to issues such as the peeling off of paints and coatings, increased friction and wear in motors or machines, or premature failure of critical components in spacecraft. Our commitment to innovation has earned us recognition among industry leaders and trade organizations.
About the Role: As a Full-Stack Software Developer, you will be responsible for developing a backend server that consists of a REST API, a database and a system for managing and orchestrating machine-learning workflows. These responsibilities include the development of unit and integration tests to ensure software quality. We expect you to collaborate with internal and external stakeholders to identify and address their needs, and to contribute to the continued success of our groundbreaking solutions.
About You: The ideal candidate will have the following skills and experience:
§ Proven experience with REST API backend development in Python and Django
§ Proficiency in deploying the backend software stack on AWS infrastructure
§ Experience with Celery is a plus
§ Familiarity with the version control system Git
§ Experience working in software-development teams
§ A willingness to learn and understand industry-specific challenges
§ Excellent written and verbal communication skills
§ Entrepreneurial skills are a plus
§ Experience or willingness to engage with frontend development through Vuejs
If you are ready to make a significant impact in a vibrant environment, we invite you to become part of our team. Apply online here, and please email a cover letter to jobs@surface.design for review. In your cover letter, please elaborate on how your experience aligns with and contributes to the success of this role.
While this position is open to candidates across the United States, preference may be given to those located on the US East Coast to facilitate collaboration with the team. The ability to join team meetings occasionally in person in Pittsburgh will be a plus. Application review will begin on June 18th. We look forward to seeing your application!
Job Type: Full-time
Pay: $90,000.00 - $120,000.00 per year
Benefits:
Health insurance
Retirement plan
Schedule:
Choose your own hours
Work Location: Remote",N/A,https://www.indeed.com/viewjob?jk=bf23cc444b4cb4b0,False,full stack developer
Software Engineer – Full Stack (Angular + Spring Boot) Remote | Part Time | 3-Month Contract,Treinetic,Remote,remote,2025-06-19,Indeed,"Posted On : May 26, 2025
Remote
Part Time
We are looking for a Software Engineer – Full Stack (Angular + Spring Boot) to join our team on a part-time contract basis. This 3-month remote opportunity is ideal for a passionate developer who excels at delivering scalable web solutions across the full stack. You will work on developing and maintaining applications using Angular for the frontend and Spring Boot for the backend, ensuring seamless integration, performance, and reliability. This role requires hands-on experience with Angular, Spring Boot, RESTful APIs, and working knowledge of modern web development principles. You’ll collaborate with designers and engineers to create robust features and maintain high-quality code across the application lifecycle.
Responsibilities
Design, develop, and maintain full-stack applications using Angular and Spring Boot.
Implement responsive and efficient frontend interfaces aligned with UI/UX designs.
Develop robust backend services and APIs to support frontend functionality.
Optimize performance and ensure scalability across the application.
Collaborate with cross-functional teams to gather and define requirements.
Ensure clean, maintainable code through best practices and design patterns.
Perform unit and integration testing to ensure reliability and stability.
Troubleshoot and resolve bugs or issues across frontend and backend.
Participate in code reviews and team discussions.
Stay current with industry trends and evolving technologies.
What we expect
Bachelor’s degree in Computer Science, Software Engineering, or a related field.
Proven experience with Angular (latest versions) and TypeScript.
Strong backend development experience using Spring Boot and Java.
Solid understanding of HTML5, CSS3, JavaScript (ES6+), and responsive design.
Experience with RESTful APIs and database integration (MySQL, PostgreSQL, etc.).
Familiarity with Git, CI/CD pipelines, and deployment workflows.
Understanding of component-based frontend architecture and API-driven development.
Knowledge of security best practices and performance optimization techniques.
Ability to work independently and manage time effectively in a remote setting.
Strong communication, problem-solving, and collaboration skills.
If you’re eager to advance your career and become a valued member of a prominent company, this is an opportunity you won’t want to miss!",N/A,https://www.indeed.com/viewjob?jk=ec358435b35371e6,False,full stack developer
Full Stack Developer,Ryzen Solutions,Remote,remote,2025-06-19,Indeed,"Job Overview
We are seeking a skilled Full Stack Developer to join our dynamic team. In this role, you will be responsible for designing, developing, and maintaining both the front-end and back-end components of our web applications. The ideal candidate will have a strong understanding of software development principles and a passion for creating efficient and scalable solutions. You will work closely with cross-functional teams in an Agile environment to deliver high-quality software that meets our clients' needs.
Responsibilities
Develop and maintain web applications using modern frameworks and technologies.
Collaborate with UX/UI designers to implement user-friendly interfaces.
Write clean, maintainable, and efficient code for both front-end and back-end systems.
Conduct code reviews to ensure best practices and high-quality standards are met.
Troubleshoot and debug applications to optimize performance.
Participate in Agile ceremonies such as sprint planning, daily stand-ups, and retrospectives.
Integrate data storage solutions such as MySQL into applications.
Work with RESTful APIs to connect front-end components with back-end services.
Stay updated with emerging technologies and industry trends to continuously improve development processes.
Skills
Proficiency in software development methodologies, particularly Agile.
Strong knowledge of programming languages including PHP Node.JS Framework Vue.js, angular, React.js
Experience with MySQL database management and query optimization.
Familiarity with RESTful service architecture for seamless application integration.
Understanding of Quantum engineering principles is a plus but not required.
Ability to work collaboratively in a team-oriented environment while managing individual tasks effectively.
Strong problem-solving skills and attention to detail.
Job Type: Contract
Pay: $50.00 - $70.00 per hour
Benefits:
401(k)
Dental insurance
Health insurance
Vision insurance
Schedule:
Monday to Friday
Work Location: Remote",N/A,https://www.indeed.com/viewjob?jk=6d69fcc67f376a9e,False,full stack developer
Full Stack Developer,Fullsteam,Remote,remote,2025-06-19,Indeed,"It's fun to work in a company where people truly BELIEVE in what they're doing!
Fullsteam is a leading provider of vertical software and embedded payments technology dedicated to helping businesses flourish by providing their customers with seamless experiences. With a dynamic and growing team of over 1,900 employees, we are committed to driving innovation and delivering best-in-class software and payment solutions that empower small and medium-sized businesses across numerous industries. Our purpose is to help our customers grow their businesses and delight their customers. Join us and be a part of a forward-thinking company that values growth, excellence, and the success of our clients.
Urable, part of the Fullsteam organization, is an all-in-one business management application designed for service-based businesses. With a cloud-based infrastructure and dedicated mobile apps, it allows you to run your entire business from multiple devices in real-time.

We are seeking a skilled Full Stack Developer to design, develop, and maintain responsive web applications using Angular for the frontend and Firebase Firestore as the backend data layer. The ideal candidate will excel in building modular, high performance UI codebases, integrating RESTful APIs, and managing real-time data interactions with Firestore. This role involves close collaboration with cross-functional teams to deliver scalable, secure, and optimized solutions deployed via Firebase Hosting, Apple App Store, and the Google Play Store.

Primary Responsibilities:
Resolution of technical support tickets
Development and design of new feature requests

Skills & Competencies:
Develop and Maintain Web Applications: Build responsive, scalable, and high-performance frontends using
Angular, integrated with Firebase Firestore as the backend data layer.
Frontend Expertise: Leverage Angular (TypeScript, components, services, routing) to create modular, reusable
UI codebases that align with modern web standards.
Firestore Integration: Implement and manage Firebase Firestore for structured, scalable NoSQL data storage,
including designing collections, querying data, and handling real-time updates.
API Consumption: Design and integrate RESTful APIs or Firebase SDKs to ensure seamless communication
between Angular frontends and Firestore databases.
State Management: Utilize Angular tools like RxJS, or custom services to manage application state and sync with
Firestore’s real-time capabilities.
Security & Optimization: Apply Firestore Security Rules to protect data and optimize Angular apps for
performance (e.g., lazy loading, AOT compilation, efficient Firestore queries).
Collaboration: Work with Leadership team and stakeholders to translate requirements into technical solutions,
ensuring smooth deployment.
Troubleshooting: Debug and resolve issues across the stack, from Angular frontend bugs to Firestore query or
configuration errors.
Version Control: Use Git for source code management, collaborating effectively in team environments.

Minimum Qualifications:
Experience: 5+ years of hands-on development with Angular (v16+ preferred) and Firebase Firestore in production
environments.
Technical Skills: Proficient in TypeScript, JavaScript (ES6+), HTML5, CSS3, and Firebase SDKs (especially Firestore);
familiar with Angular CLI and Firebase CLI.

Nice-to-Haves:
Experience with integrating large ecommerce platforms like Shopify, Bigcommerce, Woocomerce etc.
Looker Studio, BigQuery, or additional Google / Firebase features (e.g., Cloud Functions, Authentication).
Problem-Solving: Strong ability to architect solutions that balance Angular’s structure with Firestore’s flexible data modeling.
Fullsteam supports an inclusive workplace that values diversity of thought, experience, and background. Fullsteam is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, religion, color, national origin, ancestry, age, physical or mental disability, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity/expression, pregnancy, veteran status, marital status, creed, status with regard to public assistance, genetic status or any other status protected by federal, state, or local law.",N/A,https://www.indeed.com/viewjob?jk=69ab7bd9d480e0ec,False,full stack developer
"Software Engineer, Full Stack","Charlie Health Engineering, Product & Design","Remote in New York, NY",remote,2025-06-19,Indeed,"Why Charlie Health?
Millions of people across the country are navigating mental health conditions, substance use disorders, and eating disorders, but too often, they're met with barriers to care. From limited local options and long wait times to treatment that lacks personalization, behavioral healthcare can leave people feeling unseen and unsupported.
Charlie Health exists to change that. Our mission is to connect the world to life-saving behavioral health treatment. We deliver personalized, virtual care rooted in connection—between clients and clinicians, care teams, loved ones, and the communities that support them. By focusing on people with complex needs, we're expanding access to meaningful care and driving better outcomes from the comfort of home.
As a rapidly growing organization, we're reaching more communities every day and building a team that's redefining what behavioral health treatment can look like. If you're ready to use your skills to drive lasting change and help more people access the care they deserve, we'd love to meet you.
About the Role
As an early member of Charlie Health's Engineering Team, you will play a big part in building our applications from the ground up.
We're looking for someone who enjoys partnering closely with the rest of the product development team to make durable contributions and technical decisions as we race toward product launches. You'll thrive here if you find greenfield work energizing, have a high quality bar, and prefer to iterate to success.
We're a team of passionate, forward-thinking professionals eager to take on the challenge of the mental health crisis and play a formative role in providing life-saving solutions. If you're inspired by our mission and energized by the opportunity to increase access to mental healthcare and impact millions of lives in a profound way, apply today.
Responsibilities
Develop and deliver high quality, performant, maintainable features that drive meaningful business value using our core technology stack: React, Python, and PostgreSQL.
Partner with teammates across the organization to understand our business. Leverage that understanding to drive data modeling discussions and decisions.
Be an owner. Collaborate with product and design to iterate to top notch product solutions.
Identify bottlenecks and implement improvements to engineering processes, tools, and procedures. We're early and the expectation of folks joining at this stage is that you'll play a huge part in setting and improving how we work.
Promote a culture of collaboration and learning across engineering, product, and design team via mentoring, documentation, presentations, or other knowledge sharing methods.
Ensure our clients can always access the care they need by participating in our on-call rotation
Requirements
Professional experience developing user facing web or mobile applications that deliver meaningful business value.
Hands on production experience with an application programming language, preferably Python.
Ability to break down ambiguous problems into smaller parts with tractable solutions.
Growth mindset and a sense of humor. You welcome feedback and when you stumble you get back up. You adapt quickly in a fast-paced environment and you enjoy fostering an environment that prioritizes fun, learning, and growth.
2+ years experience as an engineer
Please note: candidates located within 75 minutes' commuting distance of our NYC office are expected to come to office 4 days/week
Charlie Health does not provide visa sponsorship.
Benefits
Charlie Health is pleased to offer comprehensive benefits to all full-time, exempt employees. Read more about our benefits here.#LI-Remote
Note to Colorado applicants: applications will be accepted and reviewed on a rolling basis.
Additional Information
The total target cash compensation for this role will be between $130,000 and $162,500 per year at the commencement of employment. Please note, pay will be determined on an individualized basis and will be impacted by location, experience, expertise, internal pay equity, and other relevant business considerations. Further, cash compensation is only part of the total compensation package, which, depending on the position, may include stock options and other Charlie Health-sponsored benefits.
Our Values
Connection: Care deeply & inspire hope.
Congruence: Stay curious & heed the evidence.
Commitment: Act with urgency & don't give up.

Please do not call our public clinical admissions line in regard to this or any other job posting.
Please be cautious of potential recruitment fraud. If you are interested in exploring opportunities at Charlie Health, please go directly to our Careers Page: https://www.charliehealth.com/careers/current-openings. Charlie Health will never ask you to pay a fee or download software as part of the interview process with our company. In addition, Charlie Health will not ask for your personal banking information until you have signed an offer of employment and completed onboarding paperwork that is provided by our People Operations team. All communications with Charlie Health Talent and People Operations professionals will only be sent from @charliehealth.com email addresses. Legitimate emails will never originate from gmail.com, yahoo.com, or other commercial email services.
Recruiting agencies, please do not submit unsolicited referrals for this or any open role. We have a roster of agencies with whom we partner, and we will not pay any fee associated with unsolicited referrals.
At Charlie Health, we value being an Equal Opportunity Employer. We strive to cultivate an environment where individuals can be their authentic selves. Being an Equal Opportunity Employer means every member of our team feels as though they are supported and belong. We value diverse perspectives to help us provide essential mental health and substance use disorder treatments to all young people.
Charlie Health applicants are assessed solely on their qualifications for the role, without regard to disability or need for accommodation.
By submitting your application, you agree to receive SMS messages from Charlie Health regarding your application. Message and data rates may apply. Message frequency varies. You can reply STOP to opt out at any time. For help, reply HELP.",N/A,https://www.indeed.com/viewjob?jk=2c206f2f0d158fae,False,full stack developer
Full-Stack Software Engineer - Product Engineer,Addepar,"Remote in New York, NY",remote,2025-06-19,Indeed,"Who We Are
Addepar is a global technology and data company that helps investment professionals provide the most informed, precise guidance for their clients. Hundreds of thousands of users have entrusted Addepar to empower smarter investment decisions and better advice over the last decade. With client presence in more than 50 countries, Addepar's platform aggregates portfolio, market and client data for over $7 trillion in assets. Addepar's open platform integrates with more than 100 software, data and services partners to deliver a complete solution for a wide range of firms and use cases. Addepar embraces a global flexible workforce model with offices in New York City, Salt Lake City, Chicago, London, Edinburgh, Pune, and Dubai.
The Role
We are seeking a Full-Stack Software Engineer to join our Reporting Product Team!
Our cross-functional team is responsible for building and maintaining one of the cornerstone functions of our core product. The reporting product provides an intuitive user experience that enables our customers to develop custom reports that visualize and communicate relevant insights to their internal and external partners. These flexible reporting tools give them the power to ""drag and drop"" and quickly create tailored reports that update in real-time all branded to their firm's specifications.
We're looking for a Software Engineer who will be a part of a dynamic team that creates high quality software using engineering best practices to deliver an industry leading product. Must be passionate about building rich user experiences, efficient and scalable backends while working collaboratively with our cross-functional team of product managers and designers to deliver a fantastic product to our customers.
Our engineering stack is primarily composed of a Java backend with an Ember frontend, however we don't require experience with any specific tool set. We use Agile methodologies to deliver impactful business outcomes.

Addepar takes a market-based approach to pay. A successful candidate's starting pay will be determined based on the role, job-related skills, experience, qualifications, work location, and market conditions. The range displayed on each job posting reflects the minimum and maximum target base salary for roles in Colorado, California, and New York.
The current range for this role is $107,000 - $168,000 (Base Salary) + bonus + equity + benefits.
Your recruiter can share more about the specific salary range for your preferred location during the hiring process. Additionally, these ranges reflect the base salary only, and do not include bonus, equity, or benefits.
What You'll Do
Partner with designers and product owners to design and deliver significant features on our platform.
Develop pragmatic solutions to sophisticated problems.
Contribute to our inclusive and dynamic engineering culture.
Advocate for standard methodologies and process improvements.
Who You Are
Several years experience as a professional software engineer
Experience with Java and at least one Java application framework
Collaborative approach to building feature-rich user experiences
Experience with Ember, finance and a public cloud environment is a plus!
Our Values
Act Like an Owner - Think and operate with intention, purpose and care. Own outcomes.
Build Together - Collaborate to unlock the best solutions. Deliver lasting value.
Champion Our Clients - Exceed client expectations. Our clients' success is our success.
Drive Innovation - Be bold and unconstrained in problem solving. Transform the industry.
Embrace Learning - Engage our community to broaden our perspective. Bring a growth mindset.
In addition to our core values, Addepar is proud to be an equal opportunity employer. We seek to bring together diverse ideas, experiences, skill sets, perspectives, backgrounds and identities to drive innovative solutions. We commit to promoting a welcoming environment where inclusion and belonging are held as a shared responsibility.
We will ensure that individuals with disabilities are provided reasonable accommodation to participate in the job application or interview process, to perform essential job functions, and to receive other benefits and privileges of employment. Please contact us to request accommodation.
PHISHING SCAM WARNING: Addepar is among several companies recently made aware of a phishing scam involving con artists posing as hiring managers recruiting via email, text and social media. The imposters are creating misleading email accounts, conducting remote ""interviews,"" and making fake job offers in order to collect personal and financial information from unsuspecting individuals. Please be aware that no job offers will be made from Addepar without a formal interview process. Additionally, Addepar will not ask you to purchase equipment or supplies as part of your onboarding process. If you have any questions, please reach out to TAinfo@addepar.com.",N/A,https://www.indeed.com/viewjob?jk=ba533112c5a0afb9,False,full stack developer
Full Stack Developer,Recycletek,Remote,remote,2025-06-19,Indeed,"Recycletek is revolutionizing the way the world recycles. Our cutting-edge machines make it lightning-fast for customers to return beverage containers and get paid instantly, all while helping retailers stay fully compliant with state regulations. As we scale up, we're expanding our software team and searching for a talented Full-Stack Developer to help supercharge our platform and drive seamless cloud operations.
Build and enhance our backend systems using Python (Flask, SQLAlchemy) to power real-time recycling at scale.
Dive into dynamic frontend projects with React, shaping intuitive and responsive user interfaces.
Develop and shape the Software for the next generation of AI Recycling Machines
(PoP Software, Customer Portal, Backoffice/BI/Dashboards for Recycling Centers).
Work closely with a driven team to boost system performance and deliver a seamless, rewarding user experience.
Contribute to cloud operations with a focus on scalability, security, and rock-solid reliability.

What We're Looking For:
4+ years of experience as a full-stack developer.
Proficiency in Python (Flask) for backend development.
Strong experience with React (JavaScript/TypeScript) for frontend applications.
Familiarity with SQL and database management.
Experience with cloud services (AWS, GCP, or Azure) is a big plus.
Understanding of authentication and security best practices.
Bonus: Experience with IoT integrations or hardware-software interaction and robotics.
Why Join Us?
Work on impactful technology that supports sustainable recycling.
Join a small, agile team where your contributions make a difference.
Opportunity to shape the cloud migration strategy for our software.
Flexible work environment with remote options.

If you’re excited about making a real-world impact with cutting-edge recycling technology, we’d love to hear from you!
Apply now by sending your resume and portfolio!

About Recycletek:

We believe it is our responsibility to build a sustainable world. It is possible to naturally shift human behavior so that together we save and maintain the world's beauty, instead of destroying it. When our customers recycle with us, we go to extraordinary lengths to ensure them that they aren't just recycling, they are truly contributing to closing the loop. Our incentive based programs coupled with advanced metrics allow individuals and corporations to easily adopt a sustainable lifestyle. When you recycle with us it is just the beginning, through our educational programs and eco-friendly product line, we help guide people to make sustainable choices, creating a first of its kind positive feedback loop.",N/A,https://www.indeed.com/viewjob?jk=2bfd6210d42c6216,False,full stack developer
Software Engineer (Full Stack),"GAR Associates, LLC",Remote,remote,2025-06-19,Indeed,"Company Overview
GAR Associates, LLC is a real estate appraisal and consulting firm with over 63 years of experience with offices in both the Capital Region and Western parts of New York. Over the past 20 years, GAR has made significant investments in software engineering and applications related to the assessment and appraisal industry, both internal and public-facing. That investment includes building an experienced team of software engineers that are excited about using new technology to create state-of-the-art assets that continue to expand our business.
Summary
We are seeking a full-stack software engineer to join our team. In this role, you will work with a team of engineers to write code for both backend APIs and frontend user interfaces. You will implement web-based applications that are optimized for performance, scalability, testing, and supportability. We are looking for a candidate that has demonstrated a passion for learning new technology and working with a team toward a common goal.
Responsibilities
Design and develop scalable web applications using modern frameworks and technologies.
Implement RESTful APIs to facilitate seamless communication between front-end and back-end systems.
Set up and help maintain Azure cloud-resources including Kubernetes.
Maintain and optimize existing applications for performance and security.
Participate in code reviews to ensure code quality and adherence to best practices.
Stay updated with emerging technologies and industry trends to continuously improve development processes.
Requirements:
5+ years experience as a Full Stack Developer or similar role in software engineering.
Strong proficiency in React and Python programming languages.
Experience creating CICD flows and with Kubernetes in the Cloud
Experience in the following areas is a plus:
Cloud infrastructure (Azure or AWS)
Cloud deployment with Docker containers
Cloudflare / DNS
Restful API, FastAPI
Go Language
ESRI or Google Mapping
Logging/Telemetry
Unit testing
Security standards such as OAuth
Agile team process
If you're ready to take your career to the next level with an innovative team dedicated to excellence in software development, we invite you to apply today at GAR Associates. Your next big opportunity awaits!
Job Type: Full-time
Pay: $100,000.00 - $115,000.00 per year
Benefits:
401(k)
Dental insurance
Health insurance
Schedule:
Monday to Friday
Work Location: Remote",N/A,https://www.indeed.com/viewjob?jk=cabe00671425d9b3,False,web developer
Senior .NET Software Engineer,Mainspring Services,Remote,remote,2025-06-19,Indeed,"Mainspring Services is growing and we are looking for a highly collaborative Sr. Software Engineer to join our team. The ideal candidate for this position is, at the core, a technologist with a broad skill set that brings a range of experience in web software development, and has the hustle mentality and positive attitude to join our small but extremely driven team.
As a Sr. Software Engineer, you will be a key member of a small team and will design, implement, and deploy ongoing enhancements and expansion of our company’s core software products. You will be stepping into a senior role working directly with the CTO, Development Manager, and members of the Product team. We are at a growth point as a company and you will play an integral role in the development and growth of product(s) which will be our team's foundation for the foreseeable future.
Our applications are built primarily on the modern Microsoft stack, so we are looking for experience with .NET (8/9/10), SQL Server, and a variety of Azure Services.
Ideally you will bring demonstrable hands-on experience with the following:
Writing C# web applications across the full development stack
Architecting and optimizing SQL databases
Database development using Microsoft SQL Server.
Azure Based Infrastructure - Specifically: Azure Function Apps, Azure App Services, Azure Service Bus, Azure AD B2C / Azure Entra, Azure Application Insights, Azure Storage, Azure Cognitive Search, and more
Experience with WebAPI and SignalR
Proficiency with JavaScript/jQuery
Comfortable with Git for source control
Front-end UI/UX experience is a plus
Familiarity with NPM/GULP/Compiled SCSS & JS
Experience using PasticheScript will be highly beneficial
Proficiency at creation and modification of complex regular expressions (RegEx) is a large plus
Working with document (PDF and Doc(x) ) interaction for data extraction and updates is a bonus.
We place a higher value on mindset and attitude than on lengthy experience in our exact stack. That said, we do expect candidates to have 4-7 years of experience with modern Microsoft technologies. The ability to work independently to solve problems, learn our platform and industry so you can provide recommendations, and learn new skills is also important. The position is full-time remote and will continue to be so, so a proven record of experience working remotely will be beneficial.
If this all sounds like you – we’d love to talk!
Please do not try to tailor your resume to be 100% specific to this role; we would rather have what you truly do on a day to day basis shine through.
Job Type: Full-time
Pay: $140,000.00 - $187,157.00 per year
Benefits:
Paid time off
Compensation Package:
Yearly pay
Schedule:
Monday to Friday
Application Question(s):
Are you comfortable reading and writing fairly complex RegEx? Can you provide any examples, in your OWN words, of how you've directly used RegEx in your day to day?
Which services within the Microsoft Azure Cloud do you have the most experience with - on a direct basis?
Experience:
Azure: 5 years (Required)
.NET Core: 7 years (Required)
Microsoft SQL Server: 7 years (Required)
Work Location: Remote",N/A,https://www.indeed.com/viewjob?jk=cde49f9f789b8015,False,web developer
Web Developer,EBQ,"Remote in Austin, TX",remote,2025-06-19,Indeed,"Summary
This is a great opportunity to join a growing team and help grow multiple brands through marketing initiatives. This position will be responsible for supporting EBQ’s clients through website/email development, optimization, and maintenance.

Position Responsibilities
Create website layouts/user interfaces by using standard HTML/CSS/JavaScript best practices
Work with designers to develop designs into website elements
Implement responsive web design across devices (desktop, mobile, tablets) and web browsers
Work with the content team to implement Search Engine Optimization (SEO) strategies and review all web-related analytics
Optimize landing pages for digital marketing purposes
Develop emails and templates that are responsive across email clients and devices
Create and maintain documentation
Troubleshoot, test, and maintain websites to ensure optimal security and functionality
Efficiently test and troubleshoot issues as problems arise
Assist the marketing team in various integrated communication and marketing activities
Consistently achieve or exceed monthly target(s) established by supervisor
Retain training and direction from management
Adhere to company policies and values
Work effectively in a collaborative work environment and professionally represent EBQ to clients
Perform other duties as assigned

Minimum Qualifications
Highly motivated and disciplined self-starter with excellent oral and written communication skills
Highly knowledgeable of web development fundamentals, including HTML, CSS, and JavaScript
Understanding of responsive design and browser testing tools
Strong troubleshooting skills and a problem-solving mindset
Reliability and strong work ethic
A willingness to constantly learn
Process-oriented

Proficiency in the following areas is desirable but not required
Proficiency with content management systems (CMS) such as WordPress, HubSpot, Drupal, and/or Webflow. Open to learning other CMS and page builders as needed
Ability to administer and manage websites using hosting providers such as WPEngine, GoDaddy, Bluehost, or DreamHost
Experience with PHP and WordPress webhooks
Relational databases (SQL/MySQL)
Understanding of user experience/user interface principles
Understanding of email marketing platforms (i.e., HubSpot, Pardot, Mailchimp, etc.)
Experience with e-commerce (i.e., WooCommerce/Shopify)
Adobe Suite (XD, Photoshop, Illustrator, etc.)
Project management software
CDN integrations (Cloudflare)
Version control (GitHub)
Website optimization (speed, accessibility, security, etc.)

Physical Demands
The physical demands described here are representative of those that must be met by an employee to successfully perform the essential functions of this job.

While performing the duties of this job, the employee is regularly required to talk or hear. The employee frequently is required to stand; walk; use hands to finger, handle, or feel; and reach with hands and arms. Must be able to lift 15 pounds at times.

EBQ is an equal opportunity employer. We provide equal employment opportunities to all qualified employees and applicants for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, gender, gender identity, age, marital status, national origin, sexual orientation, citizenship status, disability, or any other legally protected status. We prohibit discrimination in decisions concerning recruitment, hiring, compensation, benefits, training, termination, promotions, or any other condition of employment or career development. No visa sponsorship is available for this position.

If you are an individual with a disability and require a reasonable accommodation to complete any part of the application process, or are limited in the ability or unable to access or use this online application process and need an alternative method for applying, you may contact 512-637-9696 for assistance.",N/A,https://www.indeed.com/viewjob?jk=c4cf3fde73d8b3bc,False,web developer
Junior Web Developer,Caravel Academy,Remote,remote,2025-06-19,Indeed,"We have many opportunities for experienced application developers who can design, create, deploy, and sustain enterprise solutions. We are excited to invest in capable and focused people who bring a positive attitude to every situation that they encounter.
Responsibilities:
Produce well designed, testable, efficient code by using best software development practices
Build application style/user interface by using standard front end practices
Utilize data from various back-end services and databases
Collect and review specifications and requirements based on technical needs
Prepare and maintain software documentation
Maintain, expand, and scale out web based software applications as assigned
Keep up-to-date with emerging technologies and industry trends and apply them into operations and activities
Collaborate with clients and designers to match design intent
Requirements:
3 years experience of working as a Web Developer or Web Programmer
Significant experience with at least one of the following programming languages: Java, PHP, ASP.NET or Javascript
Deep experience with relational database systems, Object Oriented Programming and web application development
Excellent knowledge of how web applications work including security, session management, and best development practices
Excellent knowledge of modern HTML/CSS
Experience with network diagnostics, network analytics tools
Understanding of Search Engine Optimization process
Strong problem solving skills with a creative approach
Strong organizational skills with a good ability to prioritize tasks
BS in computer science or other related area
Job Type: Full-time
Pay: $122,301.00 - $159,765.00 per year
Benefits:
401(k)
401(k) matching
Dental insurance
Flexible schedule
Flexible spending account
Health insurance
Health savings account
Life insurance
Paid time off
Tuition reimbursement
Vision insurance
Work Location: Remote",N/A,https://www.indeed.com/viewjob?jk=e0de40529a9c7e6f,False,web developer
Jr Web Developer (Entry Level),"Planned Systems International, Inc.",Remote,remote,2025-06-19,Indeed,"Overview:
Planned Systems International (PSI) is an Enterprise IT services company who focuses on designing, building, securing, and operating cutting-edge software solutions that drive mission success and operational excellence for Federal Government organizations. PSI is currently seeking a dedicated and detail-oriented Junior Web Developer to join our dynamic team.
Essential Functions and Job Responsibilities:
Successful candidates will provide website design, development, testing, management and support of the hardware/software infrastructure for a web-based portal for our government client. Essential functions will include, but not be limited to:
Performing all aspects of the development tasks, including front-end, back-end, and database development.
Managing resources to ensure timely and successful deliveries.
Working with clients and review panels to identify recommendations for the appropriate technical, business and human factors solutions.
Commitment to clear and quality communications between team and client product managers.
Commitment to promoting a collaborative work environment with team members and customers.
Develop and maintain web-enabled capabilities and custom applications.
Lead staff in defining and tracking project requirements, plans, and schedules.
Commitment to delivery of quality products.
Minimum Requirements:
Bachelor’s degree in Computer Science, Engineering, or closely related field.
Strong understanding of user interface design principles, with proven track record of creative web site development in accordance with the design specifications, user interface style guides and established usability standards.
Must have strong experience working with a variety of technology and the ability to multi-task between different projects and workflow stages.
Must have experience communicating directly with end users and the ability to gather requirements.
Experience analyzing business product needs, recommending, then possibly implementing, effective software solutions in a timely manner.
Experience analyzing core standards for software development, and maintaining an effective process for support.
Experience providing guidance and leadership to other developers and development teams.
U.S. Citizenship is required. Candidates selected must be able to successfully obtain and maintain a Public Trust security clearance.
Desired Qualifications:
Currently holds a DHS Public Trust Clearance.
Certified in Lean Software Development, Kanban, Scrum and other Agile processes.
Department Homeland Security (DHS) Experience.
Company Benefits:
PSI offers full-time, benefits eligible employees a competitive total compensation package that includes paid leave, and options for employer sponsored group medical, dental, vision, short-term and long-term disability, life insurance, AD&D coverage, legal services, identity theft, and accident insurance. Flexible spending account and health saving account options offer pre-tax savings for qualified medical, dental, and vision expenses. The company sponsored 401(k) retirement plan has an employer contribution match that is immediately vested. We invest in the professional growth of our employees through professional courses, certifications, and tuition reimbursement programs.
EEO Commitment:
It is company policy to promote equal employment opportunities. All personnel decisions, including, but not limited to, recruiting, hiring, training, promotion, compensation, benefits, and termination, are made without regard to race, color, religion, age, sex, sexual orientation, pregnancy, gender identity, genetic information, national origin, citizenship status, veteran status, protected veteran status, disability, or any other characteristic protected by applicable federal, state, or local law.

Reasonable accommodations for applicants and employees with disabilities will be provided. If a reasonable accommodation is needed to participate in the job application or interview process, to perform essential job functions, and/or to receive other benefits and privileges of employment, please contact Human Resources by emailing HRDepartment@plan-sys.com, or by dialing 703-575-8400.",N/A,https://www.indeed.com/viewjob?jk=19515c1f1a6fae5f,False,web developer
Responsible Sourcing Data Scientist and Project Manager,Solventum,"Remote in Eden Prairie, MN 55347",remote,2025-06-19,Indeed,"Thank you for your interest in working for our Company. Recruiting the right talent is crucial to our goals. On April 1, 2024, 3M Healthcare underwent a corporate spin-off leading to the creation of a new company named Solventum. We are still in the process of updating our Careers Page and applicant documents, which currently have 3M branding. Please bear with us. In the interim, our Privacy Policy here: https://www.solventum.com/en-us/home/legal/website-privacy-statement/applicant-privacy/ continues to apply to any personal information you submit, and the 3M-branded positions listed on our Careers Page are for Solventum positions. As it was with 3M, at Solventum all qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to their race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, disability, or status as a protected veteran.
Job Description:
Procurement Business Controls and Compliance Specialist (Solventum)
3M Health Care is now Solventum
At Solventum, we enable better, smarter, safer healthcare to improve lives. As a new company with a long legacy of creating breakthrough solutions for our customers’ toughest challenges, we pioneer game-changing innovations at the intersection of health, material and data science that change patients' lives for the better while enabling healthcare professionals to perform at their best. Because people, and their wellbeing, are at the heart of every scientific advancement we pursue.
We partner closely with the brightest minds in healthcare to ensure that every solution we create melds the latest technology with compassion and empathy. Because at Solventum, we never stop solving for you.
The Impact You’ll Make in this Role
Solventum is seeking a highly motivated and experienced Sustainable Supply Chain Lead to join our growing sustainability organization. In this role, you will play a critical part in developing and implementing our Purchase Goods and Services supplier engagement and emissions reduction strategy, driving our commitment to combat global climate change.

You will have the opportunity to tap into your curiosity and collaborate with some of the most innovative and diverse people around the world. Here, you will make an impact by:
Purchased Goods and Services Emissions Inventory:
Identify and engage with key suppliers across the value chain to gather accurate emissions data
Develop relationships with high environmental impact suppliers to enable suppliers covering 50% of emissions from purchased goods and services to set science-based targets
Develop and implement robust data collection and management systems for purchased goods and services emissions data.
Lead the maturity efforts to move from supplier engagement and spend based approach to an absolute reduction target with supplier specific emissions.
Conduct regular data quality checks and ensure data accuracy and completeness.
Emissions Reduction Strategy:
Develop and implement supplier engagement programs to ensure suppliers are aligned with Solventum’s GHG emission reduction targets.
Develop and implement a comprehensive purchased goods and services emissions reduction strategy, including setting ambitious reduction targets and identifying key reduction opportunities.
Stay informed on industry best practices and emerging technologies for purchased goods and services emissions reduction.
Work collaboratively with internal stakeholders and 3rd party providers to include emissions considerations in supplier selection processes.
Reporting and Communication:
Prepare and submit annual purchased goods and services emissions disclosures to the ESG group
Develop clear and concise communications and reporting materials to effectively communicate purchased goods and services supplier engagement and emissions performance and progress to internal stakeholders.
Contribute to the development of the company's sustainability report and other public disclosures.

Continuous Improvement and Project Management:
Continuously evaluate and improve the purchased goods and services emissions accounting and reporting processes.
Support and lead supply base projects and initiatives alongside the procurement team and supply base to achieve purchased good and services emissions targets.
Identify and implement new tools, technologies and automation capabilities to streamline and enhance data collection and analysis
Lead dashboard development and integration of data into procurement standard work and operating mechanisms.
Stay abreast of evolving regulations and standards related to purchased goods and services ESG requirements and reporting.
Support additional environmental programs and emerging regulation requirements

Your Skills and Expertise
To set you up for success in this role from day one, Solventum requires (at a minimum) the following qualifications:
Bachelor's degree in environmental science, engineering, sustainability, or a related field and a minimum of (5) years of combined procurement, logistics, supply chain, experience in a private, public, government, or military environment.
OR
High School Diploma/GED and a minimum of (9) nine years of combined procurement, logistics, supply chain, experience in a private, public, government, or military environment
In addition to the above requirements, the following are also required:
Experience with Scope 3 emissions data collection, analysis, and reporting.
Experience with supplier engagement and collaboration on emissions reduction initiatives.
Minimum of (5) years of experience in corporate sustainability, with a focus on GHG accounting and reporting.
Proficiency in data management and analysis tools (e.g., Excel, BI tools, LCA software).
Experience with process mapping and technical problem solving

Additional qualifications that could help you succeed even further in this role include:
Master's degree in a related field.
Excellent communication and interpersonal skills, with the ability to effectively engage with diverse stakeholders.
Strong data manipulation, analytical and problem-solving skills.
Experience with CDP reporting and other sustainability reporting frameworks.
Experience with science-based targets and other climate goal-setting frameworks.
Project management expertise
Familiarity with relevant industry standards and regulations (e.g., ISO 14064, GHG Protocol, Science Based Target Initiative).
Work location: Remote-United States
Travel: May include up to 10% [domestic/international]
Relocation; Not authorized
Must be legally authorized to work in country of employment without sponsorship for employment visa status (e.g., H1B status).
Supporting Your Well-being
Solventum offers many programs to help you live your best life – both physically and financially. To ensure competitive pay and benefits, Solventum regularly benchmarks with other companies that are comparable in size and scope.
Applicable to US Applicants Only:The expected compensation range for this position is $82,370 - $100,675, which includes base pay plus variable incentive pay, if eligible. This range represents a good faith estimate for this position. The specific compensation offered to a candidate may vary based on factors including, but not limited to, the candidate’s relevant knowledge, training, skills, work location, and/or experience. In addition, this position may be eligible for a range of benefits (e.g., Medical, Dental & Vision, Health Savings Accounts, Health Care & Dependent Care Flexible Spending Accounts, Disability Benefits, Life Insurance, Voluntary Benefits, Paid Absences and Retirement Benefits, etc.). Additional information is available at: https://www.solventum.com/en-us/home/our-company/careers/#Total-Rewards
Responsibilities of this position include that corporate policies, procedures and security standards are complied with while performing assigned duties.
Solventum is committed to maintaining the highest standards of integrity and professionalism in our recruitment process. Applicants must remain alert to fraudulent job postings and recruitment schemes that falsely claim to represent Solventum and seek to exploit job seekers.
Please note that all email communications from Solventum regarding job opportunities with the company will be from an email with a domain of @solventum.com. Be wary of unsolicited emails or messages regarding Solventum job opportunities from emails with other email domains.
Please note, Solventum does not expect candidates in this position to perform work in the unincorporated areas of Los Angeles County.
Solventum is an equal opportunity employer. Solventum will not discriminate against any applicant for employment on the basis of race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, age, disability, or veteran status.
Please note: your application may not be considered if you do not provide your education and work history, either by: 1) uploading a resume, or 2) entering the information into the application fields directly.
Solventum Global Terms of Use and Privacy Statement

Carefully read these Terms of Use before using this website. Your access to and use of this website and application for a job at Solventum are conditioned on your acceptance and compliance with these terms.
Please access the linked document by clicking here, select the country where you are applying for employment, and review. Before submitting your application you will be asked to confirm your agreement with the
terms.",N/A,https://www.indeed.com/viewjob?jk=e407bd4e598fb9d8,False,data scientist
Data Scientist,Enlyte,Remote,remote,2025-06-19,Indeed,"Company Overview:
At Enlyte, we combine innovative technology, clinical expertise, and human compassion to help people recover after workplace injuries or auto accidents. We support their journey back to health and wellness through our industry-leading solutions and services. Whether you're supporting a Fortune 500 client or a local business, developing cutting-edge technology, or providing clinical services you'll work alongside dedicated professionals who share your commitment to excellence and make a meaningful impact. Join us in fueling our mission to protect dreams and restore lives, while building your career in an environment that values collaboration, innovation, and personal growth.

Be part of a team that makes a real difference.
Job Description :
Key Responsibilities

Design, develop, and implement machine learning models and algorithms to address business problems related to medical claims
Conduct exploratory data analysis to identify patterns, trends, and insights
Clean, preprocess, and transform large, complex datasets to ensure data quality
Create compelling data visualizations and dashboards to communicate findings to technical and non-technical stakeholders
Collaborate with engineering teams to deploy models into production environments
Monitor model performance and implement improvements as needed
Mentor junior data scientists and contribute to best practices documentation
Stay current with emerging techniques and technologies in data science and machine learning
Present findings and recommendations to leadership and business stakeholders
Qualifications:
Bachelor's degree in Computer Science, Statistics, Mathematics, Data Science, or related quantitative field
3+ years of professional experience in data science, machine learning, or related analytical role
Strong programming skills in Python or R, and proficiency with data manipulation libraries (pandas, numpy, dplyr)
Experience building and deploying machine learning models using frameworks such as scikit-learn, TensorFlow, or PyTorch
Solid understanding of statistical methods, experimental design, and hypothesis testing
Proficiency with SQL and experience working with relational databases
Experience with data visualization tools (Tableau, Power BI, or similar)
Strong communication skills with the ability to translate technical concepts to non-technical audiences

Preferred Qualifications

Experience with cloud computing platforms (AWS, Azure, GCP)
Experience with Snowflake cloud data platform, including:
Writing optimized SQL queries for Snowflake's architecture
Leveraging Snowflake's unique features like Time Travel, Zero-Copy Cloning, and Secure Data Sharing
Working with Snowflake's semi-structured data capabilities (VARIANT, ARRAY, OBJECT types)
Using Snowflake's integration with Python via connectors and Snowpark
Experience with Snowflake's performance optimization techniques
Knowledge of big data technologies (Spark, Hadoop)
Experience with version control systems (Git) and collaborative development workflows
Familiarity with containerization and orchestration tools (Docker, Kubernetes)
Experience with NLP, computer vision, or time series analysis
Contributions to open-source projects or research publications

Required Technical Skills

Programming: Python, SQL, R (preferred)
Cloud Data Warehousing: Snowflake SQL, Snowflake data objects and architecture
Machine Learning: Classification, regression, clustering, dimensionality reduction
Data Processing: ETL pipelines, data cleaning, feature engineering
Statistics: Hypothesis testing, experimental design, A/B testing
Tools: Jupyter, Git, Docker (preferred)
Visualization: Matplotlib, Seaborn, ggplot2, Tableau, PowerBI

Soft Skills

Problem-solving and analytical thinking
Excellent written and verbal communication
Collaboration and teamwork
Attention to detail
Time management and prioritization
Continuous learning mindset
Benefits:
We’re committed to supporting your ultimate well-being through our total compensation package offerings that support your health, wealth and self. These offerings include Medical, Dental, Vision, Health Savings Accounts / Flexible Spending Accounts, Life and AD&D Insurance, 401(k), Tuition Reimbursement, and an array of resources that encourage a lifetime of healthier living. Benefits eligibility may differ depending on full-time or part-time status. Compensation depends on the applicable US geographic market. The expected base pay for this position ranges from $80,541 - $90,000annually, and will be based on a number of additional factors including skills, experience, and education.

The Company is an equal opportunity employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, religion, color, national origin, gender, gender identity, sexual orientation, age, status as a protected veteran, among other things, or status as a qualified individual with disability.

Don’t meet every single requirement? Studies have shown that women and underrepresented minorities are less likely to apply to jobs unless they meet every single qualification. We are dedicated to building a diverse, inclusive, and authentic workplace, so if you’re excited about this role but your past experience doesn’t align perfectly with every qualification in the job description, we encourage you to apply anyway. You may be just the right candidate for this or other roles.
#LI-AP1",N/A,https://www.indeed.com/viewjob?jk=5b6e82bf31c2067a,False,data scientist
Data Scientist,Archive Health External,"Remote in Washington, DC",remote,2025-06-19,Indeed,"About Archive Health
At Archive Health, we're redefining healthcare by seamlessly integrating behavioral and physical health into a personalized, whole-person experience. Through direct partnerships with employers, we make it easy for employees to access the care they need — when they need it. By aligning individuals with the right providers and embedding care into the workplace, we're driving better outcomes and healthier communities. We're growing fast and building something meaningful — and we need smart, agile, and driven people to help us get there.
The Role
We're looking for a mission-driven Data Scientist to lead development of predictive models, machine learning frameworks, and experimental designs that help us deliver better care and optimize operations. Someone with deep technical expertise and a passion for solving complex problems that make a tangible difference. You will work directly with our CEO and clinical leadership to design data infrastructure, identify actionable trends, and transform raw data into proactive interventions for our clients and care teams.
What You'll Do:
Design and deploy predictive models that identify high-risk populations, forecast patient outcomes, and optimize clinical workflows.
Use Power BI to design and deploy dynamic, executive-ready dashboards that drive clinical insights, visualize KPIs, and directly inform strategic decision-making at every level of the organization.
Apply machine learning techniques (e.g. classification, clustering, regression, NLP) to generate insights from structured and unstructured healthcare data.
Lead the design and implementation of scalable data pipelines and infrastructure in collaboration with technical partners.
Analyze data across insurance claims, EMR/EHR, patient-reported outcomes, and operational KPIs to support strategic decision-making.
Create clean, interpretable visualizations and dashboards to present findings to clinicians, clients, and the executive team.
Conduct A/B testing, causal inference, and other statistical evaluations to measure program effectiveness and guide product improvements.
Collaborate with clinical teams to define relevant metrics and translate medical workflows into quantifiable signals.
Recommend enhancements to our data architecture, tooling, and automation capabilities.
Keep Archive ahead of industry trends by monitoring new developments in health data science, data privacy, and healthcare AI.
Who You Are:
Bachelor's degree in Data Science, Computer Science, Statistics, Mathematics, or a related quantitative field. PhD a plus.
5+ years of hands-on experience applying data science in a healthcare setting.
Expertise in Python (Pandas, scikit-learn, NumPy), SQL, and data pipeline tools (e.g. Airflow, dbt, Spark).
Strong command of machine learning algorithms, statistical modeling, and data wrangling best practices.
Experience working with EMR/EHR systems, healthcare claims, or patient-reported outcomes preferred.
Super user of Power BI, Tableau and cloud platforms (e.g. AWS, GCP).
Comfortable communicating insights to both technical and non-technical audiences.
Passion for healthcare transformation and patient-centered care.
Why Archive Health:
100% remote and flexible work environment.
Mission-driven team with a passion for improving access to quality care.
Fantastic opportunity to work in a disruptive ground-breaking industry.
Work directly with the executive team while shaping a new role.
Great benefits, and more!
More About Archive
Working with a range of healthcare providers, such as nurse practitioners, doctors, psychotherapists and nutritionists, Archive operates onsite healthcare clinics across America and Mexico. Our vision is to create beautiful healthcare spaces, run by compassionate, insightful professionals dedicated to helping people flourish mentally and physically. For more information, check out our website at archivehealth.com and archivetherapy.com or our LinkedIn page.",N/A,https://www.indeed.com/viewjob?jk=832fb5f5781a9e5e,False,data scientist
Data Scientist,"ELEVATE ME, INC.","Remote in New York, NY",remote,2025-06-19,Indeed,"Job Summary
We are seeking a highly motivated and analytical Data Scientist to join our team. The ideal candidate will leverage data-driven methodologies to solve complex problems, deliver actionable insights, and drive business outcomes. You will work closely with cross-functional teams to analyze data, develop models, and implement solutions that enhance decision-making processes.
Key Responsibilities:
Data Analysis & Exploration:
Collect, clean, and preprocess large datasets from diverse sources.
Perform exploratory data analysis (EDA) to identify trends, patterns, and opportunities.
Model Development:
Design, build, and optimize machine learning and statistical models.
Validate models through rigorous testing and refine them for deployment.
Data Visualization & Reporting:
Create clear and insightful visualizations to communicate findings.
Present data-driven insights and recommendations to stakeholders.
Collaboration:
Work with engineering, product, and business teams to define and solve key challenges.
Collaborate with data engineers to ensure data pipelines and infrastructure meet modeling requirements.
Continuous Learning:
Stay updated on the latest advancements in data science, AI, and analytics tools.
Experiment with new techniques and technologies to improve outcomes.
Required Qualifications:
Education: Master’s degree in Computer Science or Data Science.
with 1-2 years exp in same field or SQL/Python/DA
Skills & Experience:
Proven experience in data analysis, machine learning, or statistical modeling.
Proficiency in programming languages such as Python, R, or SQL.
Familiarity with machine learning frameworks (e.g., TensorFlow, PyTorch, Scikit-learn).
Knowledge of data visualization tools like Tableau, Power BI, or matplotlib.
Strong understanding of data structures, algorithms, and statistical methods.
Key Attributes:
Analytical mindset with strong problem-solving skills.
Effective communicator who can translate complex concepts into actionable insights.
Passion for data-driven decision-making and continuous learning.
Benefits:
Competitive salary and performance-based bonuses.
Health, dental, and vision insurance.
Flexible work schedule and remote options.
Professional development opportunities
Job Types: Full-time, Internship
Pay: $70,000.00 - $82,000.00 per year
Compensation Package:
Signing bonus
Schedule:
Monday to Friday
Work Location: Remote",N/A,https://www.indeed.com/viewjob?jk=5d737d5e573fd940,False,data scientist
Data Scientist,Engage3,"Remote in Scottsdale, AZ",remote,2025-06-19,Indeed,"Job Title: Data Scientist
Location: Remote
Team: PIM Optimization
Job Description


We are seeking a highly motivated and experienced Data Scientist to join our analytics and optimization team. In this role, you will bring tremendous innovation to the retail industry by building and delivering the next generation of transformative price management solutions. You should demonstrate the ability to model and analyze large-scale datasets and exhibit strong systematic thinking and detail-oriented skills to assure the integrity of various solutions. You will support the development, implementation, and maintenance of pricing optimization solutions using Python, SQL, and applied statistical techniques. The ideal candidate will be able to independently analyze data, interpret business problems, and build scalable tools and workflows to support pricing decisions. You will work closely with cross-functional teams to design scalable solutions, interpret complex data, and deliver impactful recommendations.

Key Responsibilities
Develop and deploy models and algorithms for data analysis, price image analysis, and optimization.
Conduct end-to-end data analysis, including data analysis, transformation, and performance evaluation.
Lead ongoing development and maintenance of optimization pipelines, including coding in Python, testing outputs, and debugging issues.
Evaluate the effectiveness of deployed solutions using updated data and provide insights and recommendations as business needs evolve.
Proactively analyze new business questions, conduct research and exploratory data analysis, and implement tailored solutions.
Engage with cross-functional team members (e.g., ETL, Backend) to translate business requirements into robust, production-ready solutions and ensure system integration.
Effective collaboration with the APP team to incorporate newly developed features into the client-facing tool.
Document methodologies, assumptions, and results for both internal knowledge sharing and non-technical stakeholders.


Qualifications

Advanced degree (M.S. or Ph.D.) in Engineering, Math, Finance, Computer Science, Physics or equivalent industry experience as a project leader
3+ years of experience in large-scale data analysis and modeling
Strong proficiency in Python, including experience with libraries such as Pandas, NumPy, Scikit-learn.
Experience writing efficient SQL queries and working with large relational databases.
Solid understanding of statistical inference, predictive modeling, and data visualization principles.
Strong communication skills with the ability to explain technical concepts clearly.
Excellent problem-solving skills and critical thinking; ability to derive actionable insights from complex data.
Ability to work independently, manage multiple priorities, and thrive in a fast-paced team environment.",N/A,https://www.indeed.com/viewjob?jk=a77f47793745d381,False,data scientist
Data Scientist,CareHarmony,Remote,remote,2025-06-19,Indeed,"CareHarmony is seeking a talented and motivated Data Scientist to join our team. As a Data Scientist at CareHarmony, you will play a crucial role in leveraging data to make a positive impact on healthcare outcomes.
In this role, you will work closely with our data science team to analyze complex healthcare data, build predictive models, and generate actionable insights. You will have the opportunity to work with a diverse dataset, including patient interactions, electronic medical records (EMR), and outcomes data.
Key responsibilities include data cleaning and preprocessing, feature engineering, model development and evaluation, and presenting findings to both technical and non-technical stakeholders. You will collaborate with cross-functional teams to translate data insights into actionable strategies that improve patient care and coordination.
If you are passionate about using data to drive meaningful change in healthcare, and you thrive in a collaborative and innovative environment, we would love to hear from you!
Requirements
Strong background in statistics, machine learning, and data analysis
Proficiency in programming languages such as Python or R
Experience working with large and complex datasets
Knowledge of statistical modeling techniques and experience building predictive models
Strong problem-solving and analytical skills
Ability to communicate complex findings to both technical and non-technical stakeholders
Experience with healthcare data and electronic medical records (EMR) is a plus
Benefits
Why Apply:
Opportunity to get in the early stage at a high-growth HealthTech company with extreme product market fit and exponential growth (we’re deployed at 80+ health systems across >25 states!).
You are trusted to take complete autonomy over data ingestion, data integration, and data-related API development.
Actively transform healthcare outcomes by solving real-world problems for millions of patients.",N/A,https://www.indeed.com/viewjob?jk=21c2c8251da741ea,False,data scientist
Associate Data Scientist,Unified,"Remote in San Antonio, TX 78258",remote,2025-06-19,Indeed,"Who you are:
You enjoy building machine learning models and doing advanced statistical analyses. You enjoy combing through large data sets and finding patterns within the noise. You’re autonomous and able to acquire new skills to solve a problem. You’re always looking to innovate current processes and you get excited when tackling problems you haven’t seen before. You have a strong analytics and programming background and are ready to start applying this to the world of data science.
What you’ll do:
As a Data Scientist you will work on building/evaluating learning models to predict core business results. You’ll derive impactful insights from data to drive intelligence for Unified and its clients. You will work with your fellow data science team members to define and scope data science solutions to solve complex problems. You will help build, improve, and test robust statistical and machine learning solutions that will drive impact throughout the organization.
Need to have:
2+ years experience in a data analytics role
2+ years experience building Machine Learning models
2+ years advanced programming skills in Python
High Proficiency in SQL and knowledge of RDBMs like Postgres and Redshift
Experience with ETL processing and data wrangling including fetching, munging, cleaning, pivoting, analyzing, aggregating, distributing, and visualizing
Basic knowledge of statistics, algorithms, data structures, and machine learning
Bachelor’s or higher in a quantitative field
Nice to have:
Experience with digitalr advertising technology
Experience with AWS
Experience with Spark and the big data ecosystem
Experience using Git and the Unix command-line
Familiarity with Airflow and Docker
Familiarity calling RESTful web services, specifically social APIs (Facebook, Twitter, LinkedIn, YouTube, etc.)
Familiarity with BI tools (Tableau, Sisense)
***************************
About Us
Unified stands at the forefront of empowering marketers to make informed and impactful decisions through our industry-exclusive business intelligence platform, purposefully designed for social advertising. With a wealth of experience in collecting and enriching over 3 billion dollars of social investment data, we are fervently committed to providing Fortune 2000 brands and agencies with greater transparency into their diverse teams, tools, and strategies. At the heart of our offerings is the Unified Platform and service teams, meticulously crafted to ensure data quality, optimize investments, and address critical business inquiries. As a leading provider of advertising services, Unified takes a comprehensive approach to paid social advertising, boasting a best-in-class team of digital experts utilizing purpose-built technology to deliver operational excellence and holistic insights across major social platforms. We firmly believe that the best marketing insights drive optimal performance, and at Unified, we seamlessly deliver both. With industry-leading media experts supported by robust data and technology, we have over a decade of experience in managed service partnerships with some of the world's largest brands, maintaining an unwavering focus on digital advertising services and technology. Our proprietary technology provides our internal team and customers with a strategic and holistic real-time view of their digital investments. Pioneering paid social over 11 years ago, Unified holds a unique position as one of the select partners with direct API access to major platforms such as Meta, X, Snapchat, Pinterest, YouTube, LinkedIn, TikTok, and Reddit. Join Unified as we continue to redefine the landscape of digital advertising through innovation, expertise, and cutting-edge technology.

This is a remote position.",N/A,https://www.indeed.com/viewjob?jk=d0323910ec71bf4d,False,data scientist
Data Scientist,Keller Williams Realtors,Remote,remote,2025-06-19,Indeed,"Data Scientist
#25-136
Remote, Texas, United States
Position Purpose
We are looking for a Data Scientist who will implement models across Keller Williams’ growing technology space. You will join the data science team and work to scope projects, explore data, engineer features, and create models to achieve business and product goals. We cover a wide array of artificial intelligence projects from property valuation, entity resolution, and recommendation engines, to forecasting, marketing science, image intelligence, and Agentic AI.
Location(s)
US Remote-US999
About Us
With more than 1,000 market center offices and 173,000 agents, Keller Williams is the world's largest real estate franchise by agent count. The franchise is No. 1 in units and sales volume in the U.S. Since 1983, the company has cultivated an agent-centric, technology-driven, and training-based culture, and has consistently won awards as Best Companies to Work for in Texas, Top Work-Life Balance Company, America's Best Employers for Diversity, Best Employers for Women, and America's Most Innovative Companies. If you want to be a part of an award-winning team that fosters innovation, focuses on people and service, and where you can make a difference, then Keller Williams is the place for you.
Keller Williams Recognition in 2024:
Glassdoor ""Best Places to Work 2024""
Entrepreneur ""2024 Franchise 500 Hall of Fame""
Franchise Business Review ""2024 Top Franchise for Women""
Realtor Mag ""2024 NAR 30 under 30""
Franchise Business Review ""Culture 100""
The Impact You'll Make
Engage with business stakeholders, find opportunities that provide clear business value, and translate those findings into data science/AI/ML use cases
Design predictive modeling and statistical analysis approaches to solve complex problems, and build end-to-end solutions for such problems
Collaborate with data engineers and platform architects to ensure that solutions can be deployed into robust production systems
Monitor deployed model (MlOps, LLMOps) and business metric health, proactively investigate unexpected trends, recommend, and implement timely solutions to emergent problems.
Communicate analysis and model results to business stakeholders
Proactively research and evaluate technologies and methods across data science, engineering, and visualization that improve the team's technical capabilities
The Experience You'll Need
Minimum Requirements
Bachelor’s Degree in heavy math, statistics, or data-science emphasis, preferably from a field of study such as Computer Science, Operations Research, or Economics
Five or more years of experience successfully applying data science to real business problems
Proven practical experience with and theoretical understanding of classification, regression, clustering, and anomaly detection algorithms

Preferred Requirements
Master's Degree and/or PhD with a heavy math, statistics, or data-science emphasis, preferably from a field of study such as Computer Science, Operations Research, or Economics
Expertise with Google Cloud services (BigQuery, Vertex AI, Cloud Storage, Cloud Functions, & Cloud Composer/Airflow)
Experience with multimodal embeddings and vector search
Experience with MlOps on Vertex AI
EEO Statement
We are an equal opportunity employer and all qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, disability status, protected veteran status, or any other characteristic protected by law.
Physical Requirements
The physical demands described here are representative of those that must be met by a team member to successfully perform the essential functions of this job. Reasonable accommodations may be made to enable individuals with disabilities as defined by the Americans with Disabilities Act As Amended to perform the essential functions.
Sitting
Keyboarding
Viewing computer monitor
Work Environment
Work is performed in a business office environment. Ability to work extended hours, as required, in support of the company's business needs.
Benefits and Compensation
Medical (including FSA and HSA options)
Dental
Vision
401k with Company Match
Keller Williams Incentive Plan (KWIP)
Basic Life Insurance
Voluntary Life Insurance
On-Demand Mental Healthcare
Employee Assistance Program (EAP)
Legal Services
Pet Insurance
Identity Theft Protection
Paid Time Off
Paid Holidays
Floating Holidays",N/A,https://www.indeed.com/viewjob?jk=1388ceec5c78aa86,False,data scientist
Associate Data Scientist,Arcadia.io,Remote,remote,2025-06-19,Indeed,"Arcadia is dedicated to happier, healthier days for all. We transform diverse data into a unified fabric for health. Our platform delivers actionable insights for our customers to advance care and research, drive strategic growth, and achieve financial success. For more information, visit arcadia.io.

Why This Role Is Important to Arcadia

The Associate Data Scientist will join Arcadia’s Data Science team as a key contributor to the development of machine learning models, customer-facing deliverables, and strategic insights that support data-driven decision-making across the organization. This role reports to the Senior Director of AI and Predictive Modeling and represents a pivotal step in the evolution of Arcadia’s machine learning initiatives.

The ideal candidate will bring experience in machine learning techniques, statistical analysis, and healthcare data—particularly in value-based care models. A strong desire to continuously learn and adapt is essential. Effective communication is critical, as this role involves working cross-functionally, engaging with clients, and translating complex technical concepts for both subject matter experts and non-technical stakeholders.

What Success Looks Like
In 3 months
Gain a solid understanding of Arcadia’s data model, ingestion workflows, and machine learning deployment processes
Become proficient with the team’s core data tools, including Redshift, Athena, S3, SageMaker, and dbt
Deliver initial analytics and insights that showcase measurable value to customers

In 6 months
Establish yourself as a subject matter expert on Arcadia’s analytics platform and methodologies
Proactively engage with customers to understand their data needs and identify opportunities for model improvements
Design and develop machine learning models that generate meaningful business value and strengthen client trust in Arcadia

In 12 months
Be recognized as a go-to resource for machine learning expertise across the company
Lead cross-functional initiatives to enhance analytics workflows and improve data accessibility and usability
Drive multiple concurrent projects in collaboration with client stakeholders, consistently delivering expert guidance and impactful results
What You'll Be Doing
Manage and execute projects across a diverse customer portfolio, ensuring timely and high-quality deliverables
Design and develop machine learning models for both internal initiatives and client-specific use cases
Evaluate and monitor model performance, ensuring accuracy, reliability, and alignment with business objectives
Present findings, methodologies, and insights to clients in a clear and compelling manner
What You'll Bring
Bachelor’s degree in a relevant field such as Data Science, Statistics, Computer Science, or a related discipline
1+ years experience working with healthcare data, including familiarity with claims, clinical, or operational datasets
1+ years demonstrated experience in developing and deploying machine learning models in real-world applications
Would Love For You To Have
Strong analytical and problem-solving mindset, with attention to detail and a passion for data-driven decision-making
Eagerness to learn and adapt in a fast-paced, evolving environment
Excellent communication and collaboration skills, with the ability to work cross-functionally and engage with both technical and non-technical stakeholders
Customer-focused, with a proactive attitude toward identifying opportunities and delivering value
Proficiency in Python and common data science libraries (e.g., pandas, scikit-learn, NumPy, etc.)
Experience with SQL and working with large-scale relational databases
Familiarity with cloud-based data tools such as Redshift, Athena, S3, SageMaker, and Github
Knowledge of machine learning model evaluation, performance tuning, and deployment best practices
What You'll Get
The opportunity to analyze large and diverse data set on Arcadia’s custom data platform
Support a wide variety of customers in the healthcare space
A collaborative team with decades of collective experience
Competitive compensation, benefits, and flexible time off
Be a part of a mission driven company that is transforming the healthcare industry by changing the way patients receive care
A flexible, remote friendly company with personality and heart
Employee driven programs and initiatives for personal and professional development
About Arcadia
Arcadia.io helps innovative providers and payers across the country transform healthcare to reduce cost while improving patient health. We do this by aggregating large amounts of disparate data, applying algorithms to identify opportunities to provide better patient care, and making those opportunities actionable by physicians at the point of care in near-real time. We are passionate about helping our customers drive meaningful outcomes. We are growing fast and have emerged as a market leader in the highly competitive population health management software market and have been recognized by industry analysts KLAS, IDC, Forrester, and Chilmark for our leadership. For a better sense of our brand and products, please explore our website.

Protect Yourself
If you have concerns about the authenticity of a job offer or recruitment-related communication claiming to be from Arcadia, we encourage you to verify by contacting us directly at (781) 202-3600 and select option 3. For more information, visit our website.

This position is responsible for following all Security policies and procedures in order to protect all PHI under Arcadia's custodianship as well as Arcadia Intellectual Properties. For any security-specific roles, the responsibilities would be further defined by the hiring manager.",N/A,https://www.indeed.com/viewjob?jk=ff32f2ebb477df62,False,data scientist
Full Stack Data Scientist,Allstate,Remote,remote,2025-06-19,Indeed,"At Allstate, great things happen when our people work together to protect families and their belongings from life’s uncertainties. And for more than 90 years our innovative drive has kept us a step ahead of our customers’ evolving needs. From advocating for seat belts, air bags and graduated driving laws, to being an industry leader in pricing sophistication, telematics, and, more recently, device and identity protection.
Job Description
As a Full Stack Data Scientist, you'll be responsible for working as part of a team to develop end-to-end data-driven solutions, from data collection and model development to deployment and maintenance of business-facing inference services. The ideal candidate will have experience developing and implementing cloud-based solutions, optimizing data models for cloud performance, and maintaining scalable predictive systems. As a technical contributor, this role will also begin to manage projects of small to medium complexity.
Key Responsibilities
Collaborates with the team in order to improve the effectiveness of business decisions through the use of data and machine learning/predictive modeling
Reviews, evaluates and communicates appropriateness of modeling techniques and results to team and leadership to ensure these are well understood and incorporated into business processes
Uses best practices, with limited coaching, to develop statistical, machine learning techniques to build models that address business needs and executes on modeling/machine learning projects effectively, contributing to a wide variety of projects
Utilizes effective project planning techniques to break down basic and occasionally moderately complex machine learning/predictive modeling and/or development projects into tasks and ensure deadlines are kept
Innovates on projects by using new modeling techniques or tools
Education
Masters Degree (Preferred)
Experience
2 or more years of experience (Preferred)
Education & Experience (in lieu)
In lieu of the above education requirements, an equivalent combination of education and experience may be considered.
#LI-TE1
Skills
Business Case Analyses, Data Analytics, Data Science, Machine Learning, Machine Learning Techniques, Predictive Analytics, Predictive Modeling, Python (Programming Language), Waterfall Project Management
Compensation
Compensation offered for this role is $78,600.00 - 142,275.00 annually and is based on experience and qualifications.
The candidate(s) offered this position will be required to submit to a background investigation.
Joining our team isn’t just a job — it’s an opportunity. One that takes your skills and pushes them to the next level. One that encourages you to challenge the status quo. And one where you can impact the future for the greater good.
You’ll do all this in a flexible environment that embraces connection and belonging. And with the recognition of several inclusivity and diversity awards, we’ve proven that Allstate empowers everyone to lead, drive change and give back where they work and live.
Good Hands. Greater Together.
Allstate generally does not sponsor individuals for employment-based visas for this position.
Effective July 1, 2014, under Indiana House Enrolled Act (HEA) 1242, it is against public policy of the State of Indiana and a discriminatory practice for an employer to discriminate against a prospective employee on the basis of status as a veteran by refusing to employ an applicant on the basis that they are a veteran of the armed forces of the United States, a member of the Indiana National Guard or a member of a reserve component.
For jobs in San Francisco, please click “here” for information regarding the San Francisco Fair Chance Ordinance.
For jobs in Los Angeles, please click “here” for information regarding the Los Angeles Fair Chance Initiative for Hiring Ordinance.
To view the “EEO is the Law” poster click “here”. This poster provides information concerning the laws and procedures for filing complaints of violations of the laws with the Office of Federal Contract Compliance Programs
To view the FMLA poster, click “here”. This poster summarizing the major provisions of the Family and Medical Leave Act (FMLA) and telling employees how to file a complaint.
It is the Company’s policy to employ the best qualified individuals available for all jobs. Therefore, any discriminatory action taken on account of an employee’s ancestry, age, color, disability, genetic information, gender, gender identity, gender expression, sexual and reproductive health decision, marital status, medical condition, military or veteran status, national origin, race (include traits historically associated with race, including, but not limited to, hair texture and protective hairstyles), religion (including religious dress), sex, or sexual orientation that adversely affects an employee's terms or conditions of employment is prohibited. This policy applies to all aspects of the employment relationship, including, but not limited to, hiring, training, salary administration, promotion, job assignment, benefits, discipline, and separation of employment.",N/A,https://www.indeed.com/viewjob?jk=42fea15d21aff6dc,False,data scientist
Agentic Specialist - Data Scientist,Gocool Inc,Remote,remote,2025-06-19,Indeed,"Overview
We are seeking a highly skilled and motivated Data Scientist to join our dynamic team. The ideal candidate will possess a strong background in data analysis, machine learning, and artificial intelligence. As a Data Scientist, you will be responsible for analyzing complex datasets, developing predictive models, and providing actionable insights to drive business decisions. This role requires a blend of technical expertise and creativity to solve challenging problems using advanced data techniques.
Qualifications
Solutioning and Lead full stack dev delivery with gen AI tools with LLM: Langchain/AutoGen/Langgraph.
Python, Chroma DB, PostSQL with Vector DB, Graph DB.
Cloud: Azure and Azure OpenAI.
Strong communication skills and the ability to articulate technical concepts to non-technical stakeholders.
Job Type: Full-time
Pay: $75.00 - $80.00 per hour
Expected hours: 40 per week
Benefits:
Health insurance
Schedule:
Day shift
Work Location: Remote",N/A,https://www.indeed.com/viewjob?jk=3fde662aafb8eeda,False,data scientist
Application/DevOps Engineer,"CMHWorks, LLC",Remote,remote,2025-06-19,Indeed,"Summary
Location: 100% Remote - U.S. Time Zones ONLY
Commitment: Part-Time
Position Type: Hourly/Contractor Direct (No Agencies)
We are looking for a highly skilled Application/DevOps Engineer who is experienced in all application hoisting a DevOps technologies. Application/DevOps Engineers are responsible for consulting with Engineering Manager and Architect in Application architectures, frameworks, and approaches as well as engineering solution implementations of defined system architectures.
.
***We are looking for an Independent Contractor (1099) who can be flexible with an “on-call” work schedule as needs increase or decrease.***
Details
Specific Responsibilities:
Consult with Engineering Manager and Architect in Application architectures, frameworks, and approaches.
Engineer the application implementation of defined system architectures including:
KPIs, targets, and tooling to measure application and third-party service performance related to the application,
Capture Domain design in accordance with Customer Requirements (DDD and BDD),
Documentation including architecture of deployed solutions, monitoring and support components, etc.,
Identify and document design decision points, propose approaches, and communicate for review and clarification.
Overseeing the development of documentation.
Ensure compliance and performance of developed applications through:
Definition of Best Practices and Standards,
Code Review,
Ensuring adherence to application architecture, application and development standards and practices,
And timely communication of identified issues to reduce potential cost risks.
Assist the PM with communications with clients and cross-functional departments to communicate project statuses and proposals.
Assist in root cause analysis for identified defects.
Communicating key project data to team members and building cohesion among teams.
Developing and executing project plans and tasks as assigned.

General Responsibilities:
Provide Tier 3 Support for escalation from Operations as assigned.
Engage Third-Party Service Providers as necessary to resolve systemic issues.
Document best practices, application standards, and standard operating procedures.
Developing and coordinating software system validation and testing methods.
Support Change Management Process through contribution in required Change Documentation and CAB Participation as Requested.
Establish, document, and communicate initial approaches to new application challenges.
Analyzing data to effectively coordinate the installation of new systems or the modification of existing systems.
Work with Dev Team Lead and Dev PM in the development, documentation and maintenance the software development lifecycle.
Ensure implementation of application components to provide effective monitoring of solution performance.
Maintain understanding of emerging technologies applicable to our current and planned products and services.
Proposing and implementing innovative solutions to meet our company’s technical needs.
Play a key role in shaping the future of our solutions and services.
Required Technical Skillsets:
Automation and DevOps(CI/CD) Toolsets (Jenkins, CodePipeline, CodeBuild, CodeDeploy)
Linux (Ubuntu, Centos) and Windows Server Engineering and Administration
Docker, ECS/Kubernetes Engineering
Platform Engineering experience including .NET, PHP/Laravel, Node.js
AWS Cloud Service Engineering (all)
Azure/365 Engineering (all)
Caching Services (REDIS, Elasticache)
Routing & Security (DNS, WAF, GSLB)
Other qualifications:
Must have reliable high speed internet.
Must be able to communicate in English. You'll be expected to provide regular updates on your work via our PM tool as well as our twice weekly Scrum calls.
Must be able to provide effective documentation.
Must be a team player and able to dedicate 20+ hours a week when required.
Must complete a skills assessment to qualify for the position.
No agencies will be considered.",N/A,https://www.indeed.com/viewjob?jk=41a0b838d92c9343,False,devops engineer
DevOps Engineer,Lynx Solutions SRL,Hybrid work,remote,2025-06-19,Indeed,"We’re looking for a DevOps Engineer to design, deploy, and maintain robust infrastructure while streamlining CI/CD processes. You’ll work with modern cloud and containerization technologies to ensure high availability, security, and performance across environments.
If you enjoy solving infrastructure challenges and optimizing deployments, we’d love to hear from you!
Responsibilities
Server Management: Experience in managing and maintaining servers.
Kubernetes: Strong knowledge of Kubernetes for container orchestration.
GitLab Pipelines: Experience in creating and managing CI/CD pipelines in GitLab.
Database Management: Familiarity with database systems like MySQL, PostgreSQL, or MongoDB.
Elasticsearch: Familiarity with Elasticsearch for search and analytics.
Backup and Recovery: Knowledge of backup and recovery strategies.
Docker: Proficiency in Docker for containerization.
Networking: Solid understanding of network protocols and configurations.
Scripting: Ability to write scripts in languages like Bash, Python, or PowerShell.
Monitoring and Logging: Experience with monitoring tools and logging systems.
Requirements
Cloud Platforms: Experience with cloud services like AWS, Azure, or Google Cloud.
Security: Proficiency in handling passwords, logins, and VPN setup.
Configuration Management: Knowledge of tools like Ansible, Puppet, or Chef.
Automation: Experience with automation tools and frameworks.
Sentry: Experience with on-premises Sentry for error tracking.
Load Balancing: Understanding of load balancing techniques and tools.
Compliance: Awareness of compliance standards and best practices.
Soft Skills: Strong communication, problem-solving, and teamwork abilities.
Continuous Learning: Willingness to stay updated with the latest technologies and trends.
Project Management: Basic understanding of project management principles.
Nice to have
PHP",N/A,https://www.indeed.com/viewjob?jk=23dcc53ef0c8f269,False,devops engineer
SRE/DevOps Engineer,Wisedocs AI,"Remote in Washington, DC",remote,2025-06-19,Indeed,"Wisedocs is on a mission to make it easy and accessible for any company in the insurance, legal and medical space to understand medical documents quickly using AI (Artificial Intelligence). Every week, we process hundreds of thousands of pages of documents, saving our customers hours and hours of manual processing time, and helping them process medical claims much more quickly.

Role Summary
We're looking for a versatile Site Reliability / DevOps Engineer who's equally comfortable troubleshooting support issues as they are scaling infrastructure. This role is perfect for someone who enjoys a dual focus: delivering reliable cloud-native systems and being the technical backbone of customer support operations.

You'll be at the intersection of engineering and support, helping us:
Maintain and support cloud environments
Manage and monitor Kubernetes-based services
Investigate and resolve support tickets that require technical depth
You'll work closely with our engineering, product, and customer success teams to ensure uptime, performance, and customer satisfaction across the board.
Note: This role supports a U.S. government contract. U.S. citizenship of 3+ years and the ability to obtain a security clearance are required.

Responsibilities
Provide Tier 2/3 technical support: triage, debug, and resolve infrastructure or platform issues raised by internal teams or customers
Collaborate with support and product teams to resolve customer-facing incidents efficiently and professionally
Help manage and monitor AWS-hosted services and Kubernetes clusters
Assist with releases, infrastructure changes, and environment health checks
Maintain system observability using monitoring and alerting tools
Document recurring issues, resolutions, and technical processes to support a growing support team
Qualifications
3+ years of experience in a cloud operations, SRE, or technical support role (startup or SaaS experience preferred)
Comfortable working with cloud platforms such as AWS
Familiarity with Kubernetes and container-based deployments
Strong troubleshooting and debugging skills for infrastructure and applications
Able to communicate effectively with both technical and non-technical stakeholders
Familiarity with browser developer tools
Exposure to CI/CD workflows and basic scripting a plus
Experience supporting production environments and resolving incidents in a collaborative team

What we offer
Modern employee benefits, including health and dental coverage
Competitive compensation, with valuable stock options, as we’re still a young company growing very quickly.
An opportunity to develop very rapidly in your career. We can offer you a super-immersive learning environment, and you thrive there you will have the opportunity to rapidly develop this opportunity into senior practitioner or management opportunities as you choose.
Access to a learning and professional development fund to help you level up your career while you’re working with us. We hope to be an incredible step up for your career if you decide to come and work with us.
Company events
Generous Paid Time Off
Paid Sick Days
Employee Referral Bonus
Tuition Assistance
Employee Referral Program
Plus many other Recognition Programs!

Please note Wisedocs may modify this document from time to time as per business needs",N/A,https://www.indeed.com/viewjob?jk=8c563efacae4a147,False,devops engineer
DevOps Engineer,CRATE & BARREL,"Remote in Northbrook, IL",remote,2025-06-19,Indeed,"We inspire purpose-filled living that brings joy to the modern home. With a team of more than 8,000 associates spanning 130 store and distribution locations across the U.S. and Canada, we achieve together, drive results and innovate to inspire. Drawn together by a shared passion for our customers and a spirit of fun, we deliver high-quality home furnishings that are expertly designed, responsibly sourced and bring beauty and function to people’s homes. From the day we opened our first store in Chicago in 1962 to the digital innovations that engage millions of customers today, our iconic brand is over 60 years in the making—and our story is still unfolding.

We’re here for it. We think you should be too. We’re looking for a driven professional with an inclusive mindset to join our team as a DevOps Engineer.

A DevOps Engineer will collaborate to manage infrastructure projects and processes. They will be part of a team supporting production, monitoring, and operations for our retail websites. They should have strong intellectual curiosity to analyze and interpret the data to improve website performance.

This role is an Individual Contributor position which can be worked fully remote.

A day in the life as a DevOps Engineer…

Design, implement, and maintain cloud infrastructure on AWS and GCP using Terraform, focusing on automation and scalability.
Improve website scalability to automatically handle traffic surges while balancing site reliability and cost
Add build gates (regression tests, linting, security scans) to code deployment pipelines to reduce production incidents and improve release velocity.
Proactively monitor real-time application performance to identify areas for improvement
Implement production fixes and contribute to root cause analysis to minimize disruptions to customer experience.
Implement and manage access control policies for production databases and tools, adhering to zero-trust security principles

What you’ll bring to the table…

Strong working knowledge in at least one scripting language (e.g. Python, Bash, Powershell)
Experience using Cloud providers (AWS and/or GCP)
Familiarity with common cybersecurity standards and best practices
Ability to manage multiple projects and priorities effectively to support multiple teams developing disparate applications
Strong communication skills to collaborate efficiently, effectively and respectively with teammates
Bachelor's degree in Computer Science or comparable work experience
Demonstrated experience in a production software development/deployment environment
Maintaining iOS CI/CD pipelines using fastlane and xcodebuild
Experience managing iOS app signing certificates, provisioning profiles, and app entitlements
Experience with Swift Package Manager

We’d love to hear from you if you have…

Proficient in developing and maintaining automated CI/CD pipelines (e.g. Teamcity, Octopus Deploy), including experience managing and adhering to a standard Git workflow
Deep understanding of infrastructure-as-code principles and demonstrated ability to automate infrastructure management with Terraform
Understanding of.NET/C# and JavaScript programming concepts.
Skilled in using Docker and Kubernetes for container orchestration. Familiarity with Istio service mesh is a plus.
Knowledge of relational database management systems, including PostgreSQL and MySQL
Hands-on experience with setting up and configuring monitoring tools (New Relic, Datadog, etc.) and creating informative dashboards.

#li-remote

Minimum Starting Rate: $80,000.00 Annually

Up to: $100,000.00 Annually

Pay ranges will be adjusted upward as needed to comply with applicable state and local law. In addition to your salary, based on your role, associates may be eligible for other compensation including bonuses, sales incentives, and long term incentives.",N/A,https://www.indeed.com/viewjob?jk=5f2fc523c81745cb,False,devops engineer
DevOps Engineer,PatientNow,Remote,remote,2025-06-19,Indeed,"Company Overview: Comprehensive practice management solutions for the elective medical industry are essential for improving efficiency, and the client-centric culture of the PatientNow team is well-poised to continue delivering solutions that allow our customers to spend more time where they want to, with their patients. With our expanding line of products, we demonstrate our commitment to delivering purpose-built technology to medical aesthetics and wellness service providers in our ever evolving market. PatientNow continues to see Med Spa business growth, in addition to expansion in the areas of nutrition, weight loss and hormone replacement. PatientNow’s goal is to be the elective medical industry’s most trusted and intuitive practice management solution— fueled by innovation, integration, and strategic partnerships, delivered by a team with unrivaled grit.

Vision - Empowering practices and businesses to improve health and wellness worldwide by helping their clients look and feel their best.

Mission - PatientNow is elevating businesses focused on beauty, wellness and medical aesthetics with innovative, all-in-one software and consulting service solutions. People who partner with us stand out in the industry with strong market differentiation, while streamlining operations for long term success and sustainable growth.

Values –
Show up – being present and supportive: for each other through collaboration and respect, for our customers with exceptional service, and for the business with dedication to excellence and growth.
Own the outcome – By understanding the objective, exceeding expectations with pride, confirming resolution, communicating early and often, and continuously learning and improving
Be Authentic - By sharing thoughts and opinions, keeping promises, showing your true self, and engaging with respect

Position Summary: The DevOps Engineer plays a critical role in supporting the delivery, stability, and scalability of our cloud-native SaaS platform. This mid-level position focuses on implementing automation across CI/CD pipelines, managing infrastructure using IaC tools, and ensuring environment consistency within a fully AWS-hosted ecosystem. The role works closely with cross-functional teams to maintain observability, troubleshoot deployment issues, and integrate security best practices. Through hands-on execution and collaboration, the DevOps Engineer helps drive efficiency, reliability, and alignment with organizational goals.

Essential Duties and Responsibilities: To perform this job successfully, an individual must be able to perform the following satisfactorily; other duties may be assigned. Reasonable accommodations may be made to enable individuals with disabilities to perform the essential functions.
Build and enhance automation for Continuous Integration (CI), Continuous Delivery (CDE), and Continuous Deployment (CD) workflows.
Develop and maintain infrastructure provisioning and configuration using Infrastructure as Code (IaC) tools such as Terraform, AWS CloudFormation, or AWS CDK.
Contribute to provisioning efforts to ensure consistent and reliable environments across development, testing, and production.
Manage source control strategies and branching models to ensure clean and consistent versioning across codebases.
Integrate automated unit, performance, and security testing into CI/CD pipelines.
Maintain observability tooling—including dashboards, metrics, logging, and alerting—with solutions such as Datadog and AWS CloudWatch.
Leverage AWS-native tools such as CloudWatch and X-Ray for real-time performance insights and debugging.
Troubleshoot and resolve issues across cloud infrastructure, build pipelines, and deployment environments.
Continuously evaluate pipeline performance and recommend improvements for speed, reliability, and cost-efficiency.
Assist in managing build artifacts using platforms such as Artifactory, NuGet, or GitHub Packages to support version-controlled deployments.
Support system configuration and provisioning through tools like Ansible, Chef, or Puppet.
Foster partnerships with internal teams (Software Engineering, Quality Assurance, Product Management, Cybersecurity, IT Infrastructure) enabling alignment with organizational objectives.
Competencies: To perform the job successfully, an individual should demonstrate the following.

Adaptability - Demonstrates persistence and overcomes obstacles. Measures self against standard of excellence. Recognizes and acts on opportunities. Sets and achieves challenging goals. Takes calculated risks to accomplish goals.

Business Ethics – Inspires the trust of others. Keeps commitments. Treats people with respect. Upholds organizational values. Works with integrity and ethically.

Communications - Exhibits good listening and comprehension. Expresses ideas and thoughts in written form. Expresses ideas and thoughts verbally. Keeps others adequately informed. Selects and uses appropriate communication methods.

Continuous Learning - Assesses own strengths and weaknesses. Pursues training and development opportunities. Seeks feedback to improve performance. Shares expertise with others. Strives to continuously build knowledge and skills.

Problem Solving - Develops alternative solutions. Gathers and analyzes information skillfully. Identifies problems in a timely manner. Resolves problems in early stages. Works well in group problem solving situations.

Teamwork - Balances team and individual responsibilities. Contributes to building a positive team spirit. Exhibits objectivity and openness to others' views. Gives and welcomes feedback. Puts success of team above own interests.

Education/Experience:
Bachelor’s degree in Computer Science, Engineering, or a related field preferred; equivalent professional experience will be considered.
5+ years in DevOps, site reliability, or infrastructure-focused roles supporting cloud-native software development.
Strong working knowledge of CI/CD principles with hands-on use of GitHub Actions, AWS CodePipeline, and CodeBuild for automation, testing, and deployment.
Proven ability to support build and release workflows for .NET/C# and Angular applications, along with familiarity with Python, Node.js, and React.
Skilled in managing AWS services across compute, storage, networking, IAM, and provisioning tasks.
Well-versed in toolchains such as Ansible, Artifactory, AWS CLI, AWS Systems Manager, Docker, GitHub, GitHub Packages, and Jira.
Applied Infrastructure as Code using tools like Terraform, AWS CloudFormation, or AWS CDK.
Comfortable working in Linux environments such as Redhat or Ubuntu.
Proficient in scripting with Python, PowerShell, YAML, or Bash to automate operational tasks.
Capable of leveraging observability platforms like Datadog and AWS CloudWatch for monitoring, logging, and alerting.
Team-oriented and resourceful, with strong problem-solving skills and the ability to thrive in cross-functional, fast-paced environments.

Supervisory Responsibilities:
This position does not have supervisory responsibilities.

Physical Demands: The physical demands described here are representative of those that must be met by an employee to successfully perform the essential functions of this job. Reasonable accommodations may be made to enable individuals with disabilities to perform the essential functions.
While performing the duties of this job, the employee is regularly required to sit at a desk and work on a computer for prolonged periods.",N/A,https://www.indeed.com/viewjob?jk=95b409a98b0088e9,False,devops engineer
DevOps Engineer - AWS,iFIT,Remote,remote,2025-06-19,Indeed,"iFIT's vision is to create the world's most holistic health and fitness platform, integrating all elements of health - physical fitness, mental health, nutrition and active recovery - into a seamless interactive experience. We develop proprietary software that learns and adjusts to the habits of each person as it delivers immersive content that guides them on their own individual fitness journey.
We are currently seeking an ambitious pace-setter to join our team as a DevOps Engineer (Remote - U.S.).
ROLE COMMITMENTS
Operational Excellence: Improve operational processes and system observability to support our global member base
Product Engineering Support: Collaborate with Product teams to ensure that new features are delivered on-time and designed with scalability in mind
Product Expansion: Support infrastructure and system enhancements required to expand iFIT's reach and reliability as we grow internationally
Toil Reduction: Solve problems in an automated, sustainable manner, with a focus on empowering teams to spend more time on high-impact projects
ESSENTIAL DUTIES AND RESPONSIBILITIES
Build and manage AWS infrastructure using Infrastructure as Code (Terraform, CloudFormation, AWS CDK)
Collaborate with Platform teams on cloud architecture, IaC (Terraform) standards, and best practices
Develop and maintain CI/CD pipelines for TypeScript applications
Troubleshoot build and deployment issues and support feature rollouts
Document operational processes and author support runbooks
Automate manual processes to improve efficiency and reliability
Engage actively in daily team meetings and engineering rituals
Provide hands-on support for TypeScript application deployments
Requirements:
Education and Basic Qualifications
Bachelor's degree in Computer Science, Information Technology, or equivalent experience
7+ years as an AWS-focused DevOps Engineer managing infrastructure & (IaC) Terraform
5+ years experience as an application developer using strongly-typed language such as TypeScript
Experience with container technologies (Docker, ECS, Kubernetes)
Proven CI/CD pipeline experience
Preferred Qualifications
Proficiency in GitHub Actions
Familiarity with AWS security services (WAF, GuardDuty, CloudTrail)
Experience managing NoSQL (MongoDB) and relational databases (PostgreSQL)
Background in event-driven architecture
Knowledge of web frameworks (Express.js, Nest.js)
Familiarity with network fundamentals (TCP/IP, DNS, VPC configuration)
Experience in cost optimization strategies for AWS
Previous roles involving mentoring or training team members
Exposure to AI/ML infrastructure
AWS Cloud certifications",N/A,https://www.indeed.com/viewjob?jk=ed3ac8cee4f1f605,False,devops engineer
DevOps Engineer,Cameo,"Remote in Chicago, IL",remote,2025-06-19,Indeed,"At Cameo, we make impossible connections possible. Our platform allows fans to get personalized messages from their favorite comedians, actors, athletes, and more.... not gonna lie, it’s pretty magical. And now we’re looking for passionate, hardworking humans to help take Cameo to the next level.

Our #Fameo means everything to us. Join a stellar team of smart, curious, and driven individuals, and experience working at a globally known consumer startup.
Best in class. We’ve been named one of LinkedIn’s Top 50 Startups to Work For, voted one of America’s Best Startup Employers by Forbes, and the #1 Most Innovative Social Media Company by Fast Company.
Get all good stuff. Health insurance, 401(K), Fun work environment at our Downtown Chicago Headquarters, and opportunities to meet Cameo Talent!

Come to work every day knowing your efforts will have a material impact, shaping the direction of the next outstanding tech company!

About the role:
You will be helping us improve & scale the platform that connects fans and talent to create the perfect video shoutout. In particular, you will help us make sure we can support our growing fan base securely and performantly.
As our DevOps/Site Reliability Engineer, you will be working across multiple technologies, primarily supporting our backend API (node.js + express), databases (mongoDB + Redis), and infrastructure (AWS + Kubernetes/EKS + OpenTelemetry + Terraform).

Responsibilities:
As part of the Cameo Platform team continuously design, build, maintain and monitor the core infrastructure used by Cameo’s engineering teams
You’ll take part in the planning process for the growth of Cameo’s infrastructure
Become well versed with Cameo’s tech stack allowing you to debug production issues at all levels of the stack
You will help drive a DevOps mindset and culture across the engineering organization
You will collaborate with other teams like sales, marketing and data to make the talent experience fun and engaging, and help us deliver that perfect Cameo.


What you bring to the table:
2+ years experience supporting and monitoring web applications and infrastructure
Proficient in using various observability tools, including Grafana, OTel, X-Ray, and OpenSearch.
Experience with Amazon Web Services (AWS)
Skilled in building and supporting containers
Familiar with a range of programming and scripting languages (Js/Ts, Python, Groovy, Bash)
Experience in implementing Infrastructure as Code (Terraform)
Experience with CI/CD (Jenkins Declarative Pipelines) for both web and mobile applications
Knowledgeable in Kubernetes (EKS)
Familiarity with Kafka
Experience with NoSQL databases (Mongo, Redis)
Familiarity with NodeJS, React, ReactNative
You take pride in your work
You have a strong product sense
You are a doer who is comfortable with ambiguity
Benefits:
Competitive compensation package with benefits.
Collaborative work culture that encourages innovation and personal development.
Flexible work arrangements, including remote work options.
Opportunity for career growth and learning in the analytics and entertainment industries.

Cameo is an equal opportunity employer. We are committed to creating an inclusive and welcoming environment for every person who walks through our doors. All employment is decided on the basis of qualifications, merit, and business need. Cameo celebrates and embraces diversity.
The salary range for this position is $100,000 to $145,000 with opportunities for additional compensation based on performance. Cameo determines salary ranges by role and level with ranges for US roles typically based on our home market of Chicago. The range displayed on each job posting reflects the minimum and maximum target for new hire salaries for the position across all US locations. Within that range, individual pay is determined by job-related skills, experience, and relevant education and training. Posted salary ranges reflect base salary only, exclusive of equity, commissions, and other compensation and benefits.
Please consult the Notice to California Residents contained in Cameo's Privacy Policy available at https://www.cameo.com/privacy for information regarding your rights under the California Consumer Privacy Act if you are a California resident.",N/A,https://www.indeed.com/viewjob?jk=f82a09e9d9eeced8,False,devops engineer
DevOps Engineer,gWorks,"Remote in Omaha, NE",remote,2025-06-19,Indeed,"The Role: DevOps Engineer
At gWorks, we help local governments lead with confidence and serve their communities more effectively. Our cloud-based software powers everything from financial accounting to GIS and citizen engagement — enabling public leaders to simplify complexity, modernize operations, and better serve their communities.
As a DevOps Engineer, you’ll play a pivotal role in building the infrastructure, deployment pipelines, and automation that powers our SaaS platform. From designing zero-touch CI/CD pipelines to implementing Infrastructure as Code (IaC) and resilient, secure cloud environments, you’ll help streamline development, ensure high availability, and scale systems to meet growing demands.
This is a hands-on, high-impact engineering role for someone passionate about automation, cloud architecture, and DevOps excellence.
How You’ll Make an Impact
Build a No-Touch CI/CD Pipeline
Design and maintain fully automated deployment pipelines that move code seamlessly from development to production.
Implement Infrastructure as Code (IaC)
Use Terraform and AWS CloudFormation to automate infrastructure provisioning and configuration across multiple environments.
Deploy Scalable Environments
Automate the creation and deployment of QA, staging, production, and demo environments using best-in-class tools and principles.
Optimize Deployments with Blue/Green Strategies
Minimize downtime and risk through modern deployment patterns that ensure continuity and high availability.
Leverage AWS Native Tooling
Build secure, scalable solutions using AWS tools like ECS, Lambda, CloudWatch, Aurora, SQS, and CloudFront.
Ensure Resilience and Recovery
Design infrastructure that is fault-tolerant, highly available, and prepared for disaster recovery scenarios.
Advance Zero-Trust Security Models
Implement and maintain authentication and access control systems based on zero-trust principles.
Enhance Monitoring and Logging
Develop monitoring systems and dashboards using CloudWatch or ELK stack to track service health, uptime, and security.
Automate Everything
Write scripts and tools in Python, Bash, or similar languages to automate tasks, reduce manual work, and increase efficiency.
Collaborate Across Teams
Partner with Engineering, QA, and Product teams to embed DevOps best practices across the development lifecycle.
Document and Share Knowledge
Create internal documentation and lead knowledge sharing for infrastructure, automation, and deployment workflows.
What Success Looks Like
Infrastructure uptime consistently meets or exceeds SLAs across all environments
Deployment time is reduced significantly within the first 6 months through automation
Zero-trust security model successfully prevents unauthorized access or breaches over a 12-month period
Fully automated pipelines and resilient environments support faster releases with reduced friction
Positive cross-functional collaboration and adoption of DevOps practices across the Engineering team
What You’ll Bring
Bachelor’s degree in Computer Science, IT, or equivalent practical experience
3+ years in DevOps, systems engineering, or cloud infrastructure roles
Expertise in AWS services, including ECS/Fargate, EC2, S3, VPC, IAM, Lambda, and CloudFormation
Proficiency in scripting languages (Python, Bash) and automation tooling
Experience with GitHub and modern code repo management practices
Understanding of cloud networking, firewalls, routing, and VPNs
Familiarity with monitoring/logging tools like CloudWatch, ELK, or similar
Strong analytical and troubleshooting skills
Ability to collaborate across functions and communicate clearly with technical and non-technical stakeholders
Where You’ll Work
We support great work — from wherever you work best.
Omaha-based? You’ll follow our hybrid model, working remotely with in-office collaboration on Tuesdays and Thursdays.
Remote? You’ll be fully supported to work from anywhere in the U.S.
While we’re proudly Omaha-first, we welcome remote candidates who are proactive, communicative, and passionate about building smart systems that scale.
Compensation & Benefits
Base Salary Range: $90,000- $110,000, based on experience
Health, dental, and vision insurance
401(k) with company match
Generous PTO and paid holidays
Mission-driven culture with opportunities for technical leadership and growth
A Note to Candidates
You don’t have to meet every requirement to apply. If this role excites you and you’re passionate about scaling infrastructure and DevOps excellence, we’d love to hear from you.
Equal Opportunity Employer
gWorks is an equal opportunity employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, disability, or status as a protected veteran.",N/A,https://www.indeed.com/viewjob?jk=04dc8e2dc8a62f22,False,devops engineer
Staff Software Engineer - AI Trainer,DataAnnotation,"Remote in Sunnyvale, CA",remote,2025-06-19,Indeed,"We are looking for proficient programmers to join our team to train our AI chatbots to code. You will work with the chatbots that we are building in order to measure their progress, as well as write and evaluate code.
To apply to this role, you will need to be proficient in either Python and/or JavaScript. Your role will require proficiency in at least one programming language/framework (JavaScript, TypeScript, Python, C, C#, C++, HTML/CSS, React, Go, Java, Kotlin, SQL, or Swift) in order to solve coding problems (think LeetCode, HackerRank, etc). For each coding problem, you must be able to explain how your solution solves the problem.
As part of the application process, you will be asked to complete an assessment. If you pass, you will gain access to projects. Based on the quality of your work, you will continue to receive projects regularly. We find our most successful candidates work between 5-20 hours per week, up to 40 hours.
Benefits:
This is a full-time or part-time REMOTE position
You’ll be able to choose which projects you want to work on
You can work on your own schedule
Projects are paid hourly, with bonuses on high-quality and high-volume work
Responsibilities:
Come up with diverse problems and solutions for a coding chatbot
Write high-quality answers and code snippets
Evaluate code quality produced by AI models for correctness and performance
Qualifications:
Fluency in English
Proficient in either Python and/or JavaScript
Detail-oriented
Excellent writing and grammar skills
A bachelor's degree (completed or in progress)
Note: Payment is made via PayPal. We will never ask for any money from you.
#INDUSSD
Job Type: Contract
Pay: From $40.00 per hour
Benefits:
Flexible schedule
Work Location: Remote",N/A,https://www.indeed.com/viewjob?jk=e81acb445f969bba,False,machine learning
Front End Software Engineer,"Ursus, Inc.","Remote in San Jose, CA",remote,2025-06-19,Indeed,"JOB TITLE: Front End Software Engineer
LOCATION: Remote ( San Jose & San Francisco)
PAY RANGE: $60.00 - $70.42/hr
DURATION: 1 year

TOP 3 SKILLS:
Fluent in the latest web UI technologies (JavaScript, TypeScript, React JS, CSS, HTML5)
Proven record of delivering both simple and complex UIs that are efficient, maintainable, and well-structured
Experience in Web services, micro-services, and REST APIs


COMPANY:
Our client a Fortune 500 Software Organization is seeking a Front End Software Engineer to bring onto the team.

Job Duties:
Architecture, design, and development of modern web applications around various machine learning lifecycle workflows for Search and Discovery features and internal evaluations
Working directly with data scientists and engineers to implement scalable, fault-tolerant, and reusable front end code
Working closely with product managers and UX designers to design new product features.
Optimize web applications to maximize speed and scale
Develop POCs quickly to get user feedback and improve on that.
Qualifications:
Fluent in the latest web UI technologies (JavaScript, TypeScript, React JS, CSS, HTML5)
Proven record of delivering both simple and complex UIs that are efficient, maintainable, and well-structured
Experience in Web services, micro-services, and REST APIs
Experience with Java and Spring Boot
Experience in RDBMS & NOSQL database
Experience of working with SaaS products with machine learning or data science components would be a plus
Good communication and interpersonal skills
Education:
BS or MS in Computer Science Minimum 2-5 years of relevant experience in industry

BENEFITS SUMMARY: Individual compensation is determined by skills, qualifications, experience, and location. Compensation details listed in this posting reflect the base hourly rate or annual salary only, unless otherwise stated. In addition to base compensation, full-time roles are eligible for Medical, Dental, Vision, Commuter and 401K benefits with company matching.

IND123",N/A,https://www.indeed.com/viewjob?jk=fa0d4b9deeed26eb,False,machine learning
Machine Learning Engineer,Fragrance.com,Remote,remote,2025-06-19,Indeed,"Position Title: Machine Learning Engineer
Department: Data Engineering
Reports to: Manager of Data Engineering
Classification: Salary (Exempt)

COMPANY PROFILE
Fragrance.com is a worldwide leading beauty e-commerce company created to provide the public with access to the largest inventory of genuine, brand name fragrances, skincare, candles, aromatherapy and more.
JOB OVERVIEW
As a Machine Learning Engineer, you will work closely with the Manager of Data Engineering and cross-functional teams to acquire, clean, and analyze data, build and optimize machine learning models, and deploy them into production. You will play a crucial role in developing models that directly impact business outcomes.
RESPONSIBILITIES
Data Acquisition & Cleaning: Collect and preprocess large datasets, ensuring data quality and transforming raw data into usable formats for model training.
Exploratory Data Analysis (EDA): Perform data analysis to uncover patterns, trends, and insights that inform model development.
Feature Engineering: Identify and create relevant features from raw data to enhance model accuracy and performance.
Model Building & Selection: Develop, select, and fine-tune machine learning models using the most appropriate algorithms for various business applications.
Model Validation & Deployment: Validate models through rigorous testing, ensuring they meet performance standards, and deploy them into production environments.
SKILL/EXPERIENCE/PROFICIENCY REQUIREMENTS
Technical Skills: Proficiency in Python or R, with experience in machine learning libraries (e.g., TensorFlow, PyTorch) and data manipulation, data visualization (Matplotlib or Seaborn) and Structured Query Language (SQL).
Knowledge of Machine Learning Algorithms: Strong understanding of supervised, unsupervised, and reinforcement learning techniques.
Soft Skills: Strong problem-solving abilities, effective communication skills, and a collaborative mindset. Eagerness to learn and stay current with new technologies and methods.
EDUCATIONAL REQUIREMENTS
Bachelor’s degree in Computer Science, Engineering, Mathematics, or a related field.
Relevant coursework or certifications in machine learning is a plus.
PRFERRED, NOT REQUIRED
Proficiency in ML Ops tools (e.g., MLflow or Anaconda)
Experience with Snowflake or Databricks
LIMITATIONS AND DISCLAIMER
The above job description is meant to describe the general nature and level of work being performed; it is not intended to be construed as an exhaustive list of all responsibilities, duties and skills required for the position.
FRAGRANCE.COM BENEFITS:
Medical, Dental, Vision Insurance
PTO and Paid holidays
Paid Sick & Safe Leave
Paid Prenatal Leave
Short Term Disability
Life Insurance
Accident & Critical Illness
Flexible Spending Account
401(k) Retirement Savings Plan and match
Employee Discounts
**This is a direct hire. No agencies or recruiters please**
Applicants must be authorized to work for any employer in the U.S. We are unable to sponsor or take over sponsorship of an employment Visa at this time.


Fragrance.com is firmly committed to the principle of equal employment opportunity. Fragrance.com offers employment opportunities without regard to race, color, sex, age, religion, national origin, disability, U.S. military and or other prohibited bases of discrimination, both state and local. All aspects of the employment relationship (including recruiting, hiring, training, working conditions, compensation, promotion, discipline, and termination) are subject to this policy.",N/A,https://www.indeed.com/viewjob?jk=5ff531cc1cfb5453,False,machine learning
Machine Learning Engineer,ActivTrak,"Remote in Austin, TX",remote,2025-06-19,Indeed,"As a Machine Learning Engineer on our Data Science team at ActivTrak, you'll be at the forefront of our AI/ML driven analytics initiatives. You will research, build, and deploy cutting edge ML models that deliver critical business value and actionable insights.
This role presents an exciting opportunity to tackle petabyte-scale data challenges, working with millions of events daily across thousands of customers. Your responsibilities will span the entire ML lifecycle, from sourcing and transforming raw data into robust features to managing and optimizing models in production.
You'll thrive in a collaborative environment, partnering closely with engineering and business teams to translate complex data into clear answers for our customers' most pressing questions. Prior experience in the end-to-end research, development, and production deployment of high-impact ML models is highly valued.
Requirements
Required Qualifications:
3 years of experience in one or more of the following areas: machine learning, data science, data engineering, or a related technical field
Proficiency in using Python and SQL for model development and data analysis
Experience leveraging libraries and tools for dataframes and vectors (Pandas, Polars, etc).
Experience with Classification and Regression algorithms
Experience with Model evaluation techniques
Familiarity with Supervised and Unsupervised learning approaches
Familiarity with Probability, Statistics, and Linear Algebra
Preferred Qualifications:
Familiarity with timeseries datasets
Familiarity with leveraging LLMs and the concepts behind RAG
Familiarity with working in Cloud Platforms (GCP a plus)
Familiarity with using Docker and deploying to Kubernetes
Interest in Agentic AI
Benefits
Work environment:
Competitive compensation and benefits
The position is remote within the US
Minimal travel
Limited physical demands
This is an incredible opportunity to embark on an exciting journey with a dynamic, VC-backed company. If you have a proven track record of creative thinking, a drive for learning, and a deep commitment to collaboration, we want to talk to you!
ActivTrak is an equal opportunity employer. We celebrate diversity and are committed to creating an inclusive environment for all employees. ActivTrak does not discriminate on the basis of race, color, religion, sex, national origin, political affiliation, sexual orientation, marital status, disability, age, protected veteran status, gender identity or any other factor protected by applicable federal, state or local laws.",N/A,https://www.indeed.com/viewjob?jk=202f479c04a46c72,False,machine learning
Full Stack Developer,Surface Design Solutions,Remote,remote,2025-06-19,Indeed,"Job Title: Full-Stack Software Developer at Surface Design Solutions, Inc.
Job Description:
We are looking for a full-time developer to join our team. As we look to accelerate our growth, we want to bring on a developer who can help us grow and who is excited about growing with us. The position will involve designing and implementing robust software solutions that empower our customers to leverage Surface Design Solutions' patented machine-learning algorithms. The work will directly enable our customers to be more cost-efficient and sustainable in their manufacturing, while making higher-quality products.
Salary and stock options are negotiable.
About Us: We are a group of scientists and engineers who are passionate about improving manufacturing through the optimization of surfaces. Surface-related problems degrade the manufacturing of products in industries from aerospace and electric vehicles to semiconductors and medical devices. Our technology uses physics-informed machine learning to demystify these problems and deliver wholly new solutions. We are looking for someone who is excited to work as part of a small, tight-knit team on complex, engineering problems.
We support high-volume product manufacturers by providing purpose-built manufacturing specifications that enhance product lifespan and improve production efficiency. We accomplish this through data-enabled optimization of their manufacturing operations, and particularly around the surfaces of tooling and parts. Inadequate surface finish can lead to issues such as the peeling off of paints and coatings, increased friction and wear in motors or machines, or premature failure of critical components in spacecraft. Our commitment to innovation has earned us recognition among industry leaders and trade organizations.
About the Role: As a Full-Stack Software Developer, you will be responsible for developing a backend server that consists of a REST API, a database and a system for managing and orchestrating machine-learning workflows. These responsibilities include the development of unit and integration tests to ensure software quality. We expect you to collaborate with internal and external stakeholders to identify and address their needs, and to contribute to the continued success of our groundbreaking solutions.
About You: The ideal candidate will have the following skills and experience:
§ Proven experience with REST API backend development in Python and Django
§ Proficiency in deploying the backend software stack on AWS infrastructure
§ Experience with Celery is a plus
§ Familiarity with the version control system Git
§ Experience working in software-development teams
§ A willingness to learn and understand industry-specific challenges
§ Excellent written and verbal communication skills
§ Entrepreneurial skills are a plus
§ Experience or willingness to engage with frontend development through Vuejs
If you are ready to make a significant impact in a vibrant environment, we invite you to become part of our team. Apply online here, and please email a cover letter to jobs@surface.design for review. In your cover letter, please elaborate on how your experience aligns with and contributes to the success of this role.
While this position is open to candidates across the United States, preference may be given to those located on the US East Coast to facilitate collaboration with the team. The ability to join team meetings occasionally in person in Pittsburgh will be a plus. Application review will begin on June 18th. We look forward to seeing your application!
Job Type: Full-time
Pay: $90,000.00 - $120,000.00 per year
Benefits:
Health insurance
Retirement plan
Schedule:
Choose your own hours
Work Location: Remote",N/A,https://www.indeed.com/viewjob?jk=bf23cc444b4cb4b0,False,machine learning
Jr. Software Engineer,RayNC Tech Solutions,Remote,remote,2025-06-19,Indeed,"Job Overview
We are looking for a skilled and enthusiastic Software Engineer to join our team. The ideal candidate will have a solid foundation in software development and knowledge in implementing AI use cases. You will be responsible for Research on AI trends, designing, developing, and deploying scalable AI solutions.
Responsibilities
Leverages AI technologies to solve business problems, focusing on application development and deployment.
Design, develop, and implement AI-driven applications and services.
Collaborate with data scientists, product managers, and other stakeholders to define AI use cases and translate them into technical requirements.
Build, test, and deploy machine learning models and algorithms.
Integrate AI models into software applications, ensuring scalability and performance.
Develop APIs and data pipelines to support AI solutions.
Perform code reviews, testing, and debugging to ensure high-quality deliverables.
Stay up-to-date with the latest advancements in AI and software development best practices.
Document technical processes and solutions effectively.
Requirements
Bachelor’s or Master’s degree in Computer Science, Engineering, or a related field.
2-4 years of experience in software engineering with a focus on AI use cases.
Proficiency in programming languages such as Python, Java, or C#.
Experience with machine learning frameworks like TensorFlow or PyTorch.
Strong knowledge of AI concepts, including supervised and unsupervised learning, computer vision, and data pre-processing.
Experience with cloud platforms (e.g., AWS, Azure, Google Cloud) and containerization (Docker, Kubernetes).
Familiarity with data structures, algorithms, and software design patterns.
Strong problem-solving skills and the ability to work independently or as part of a team.
Excellent communication and collaboration skills.
What We Offer:
Competitive salary and benefits package.
Opportunity to work on cutting-edge AI projects.
A collaborative and innovative work environment.
Professional development and growth opportunities.
Join us in creating impactful software solutions that drive success!
Job Type: Full-time
Pay: $55,000.00 - $65,000.00 per year
Work Location: Remote",N/A,https://www.indeed.com/viewjob?jk=8a743929f287e058,False,machine learning
Software Engineer,MathWorks,"Remote in Natick, MA",remote,2025-06-19,Indeed,"MathWorks has a hybrid work model that enables staff members to split their time between office and home. The hybrid model provides the advantage of having both in-person time with colleagues and flexible at-home life optimizations. Learn More: https://www.mathworks.com/company/jobs/resources/applying-and-interviewing.html#onboarding.
Play a key role in designing, architecting, and developing MATLAB features and enhancements. Design, architect, and implement software with high-scalability and high-availability in mind. Work with cross functional teams to create requirements, design specifications, and participate in code reviews. Collaborate with User Experience and UI designers to develop customer workflows. Work with Quality Engineers to ensure test cases and plans are appropriately developed and followed. Focus on improving performance, availability, and scalability of the platform.
May telecommute up to 40%.
MathWorks nurtures growth, appreciates diversity, encourages initiative, values teamwork, shares success, and rewards excellence.

Minimum Qualifications:
Employer will accept a Master’s degree in Computer Science, Engineering (any), or related field and no experience.

Alternatively, employer will accept a Bachelor’s degree in Computer Science, Engineering (any), or related field and 3 years of experience in the job offered or in a Software Engineer-related occupation.
Position requires demonstrable experience with the following:
1. Demonstrated expertise in programming at least two general-purpose programming language for backend services and micro-services development using MATLAB, Python, Java, or Golang;
2. Demonstrated expertise in machine learning, natural language processing, and LLMs for search;
3. Demonstrated expertise in search technologies: information retrieval concepts (indexing, relevance scoring, text analysis, filtering, or similar); and
4. Demonstrated expertise working with business stakeholders to gather requirements, design, develop features from start to finish.

Experience may be gained during graduate program. Will accept any suitable combination of education, training, and/or experience.",N/A,https://www.indeed.com/viewjob?jk=6a8189ebcf2d1269,False,machine learning
Staff Machine Learning Scientist,FutureFit AI,"Remote in New York, NY",remote,2025-06-19,Indeed,"Come join our Data Team!
High velocity, high intensity, high trust, high bar, high impact, and a will to win.
FutureFit AI could be the right next step in your career journey if reading those words resonates deeply with you, full stop. You live and lead with humility, pursue audacious goals, and are motivated by having a meaningful and positive impact on the people and the world around you.
First, an important note: Data shows that men on average apply for a role if they meet 3/10 requirements while women often only do so if it’s 10/10. We work hard to be clear and specific about what our roles include and demand and encourage you to apply if you see a strong (but not necessarily perfect) fit between you and the opportunity.
Your Role
FutureFit AI is looking for a Staff Machine Learning Scientist to join our team! You will play a key role in designing and shaping our data science products, including our recommenders and data ontology.
70% of your time will be dedicated to improving our recommendation engine
20% of your time will be spent building out our data ontologies that power the recommendation engine
10% of your time will function as a strategic partner to the VP of Data and Product; re-thinking our recommender architecture and optimizing how we use industry data
Reporting Structure
This role reports directly to Katya Simpson, our VP of Product and AI.
Your Responsibilities
Own problem spaces from 0 to 1. This starts with defining product requirements with stakeholders to maintaining your products
Set the standard for high-quality recommender science
Uphold best practices in data science and machine learning

Your Skills
Proven experience with recommendation engines, including cold-start scenarios
Classical machine learning expertise
Data ETL experience: experience with Airflow, DBT or similar
Familiarity with modeling both structured and unstructured data from NoSQL databases such as MongoDB
Proven ability to translate vague problems into actionable insights for the business
Strong communication skills to present actionable insights to stakeholders with varying levels of technical expertise
Experience with production-grade NLP (using LLMs)
Your Experience
While all are encouraged to apply, we’re looking for demonstrated professional experience in high-performing settings. Special credit to those with both big tech and start up experience or experience in the workforce development industry.

Your Education
Your alma mater isn’t our focus. Your grit, hunger, and drive are. If you’re one who learns continuously, tackles challenges head-on, and knows your strengths and gaps intimately, you’re our person.
Job Benefits
Work directly with the founding team
Unlimited PTO
Health care
401(K) for US team members
Career Development Budget
Technology reimbursement
Flexible schedules built on trust
Location
We are open to candidates living anywhere in Canada or the US. For candidates living in Toronto, our office is conveniently located at 325 Front St West (a short walk from Union Station). The team comes in 1-2x a week, usually on Wednesdays. We'd love to see you too!
Compensation
The base salary range for this role is $170,000-$220,000 CAD/USD (currency matched to location). This range reflects the varying levels of expertise and responsibilities that will be determined through the interview process, based on applied experience and other criteria established by the hiring committee.
Role Logistics - Hiring Journey
At FutureFit AI, we believe in designing intentional and rigorous hiring journeys to help you determine if this is the best role and organization for you, based on your unique skills, mindset, and experiences. We operate at high velocity with high intensity and want an accurate taste of what that feels like before you get through the door.
Every hiring journey at FutureFit AI consists of thoughtfully crafted steps including a performance challenge and rounds of interviews with team members. For this role, that might look like:
Online Application
Initial Screen with Director of People & Culture
Interview with Hiring Manager
Live Math Interview
Interview with Lead Data Engineer
Interview with Director of Product
Interview with CEO
Final Decision
Our Company
In looking at a job posting, it’s often hard to get a basic picture of the company profile (size, stage, structure, etc.) which is why we are sharing it with you upfront. This helps you quickly decide and helps us focus any time we spend together on going beyond the basics:

Problem Domain: Future of Work / Workforce Development - important that the problem domain interests you even if you haven’t worked in the space before.
Industry: SaaS / AI - technology and data are at the core of what we build.
Customers: We partner with workforce development agencies, government agencies, and employers/enterprises.
Structure: We are organized around the following key departments: Growth, Customer Success, Product, Engineering, Data, People & Culture, Finance & Operations.
Team: We are a team of 30-50 across US and Canada with main hubs in New York and Toronto.
Funding: We built the company from 0 to 1 with no external capital (a rare feat for tech startups) and have subsequently raised one round of funding led by JP Morgan which fueled a significant growth trajectory for us.

Our Core Principles
Be Curious
Drive to Outcomes
Raise the Bar
Speed Matters
Own It
We Over Me
About FutureFit AI
At FutureFit AI, we’re on a mission to unlock pathways between talent and opportunity using the power of AI. We focus on personalized, AI-powered career guidance for job seekers, emphasizing skills over extensive resumes, and partner with workforce development partners, governments, and employers to level access to opportunity.
FutureFit AI is a growing, venture-backed company focused on using technology to improve the lives and outcomes for people going through career transitions. We’re a small, driven team, united by our commitment to the job seekers and workforce ecosystems we serve. We're not just building a company; we're shaping the future of work.
We will ensure that individuals with disabilities are provided reasonable accommodation to participate in the job application or interview process, perform essential job functions, and receive other benefits and privileges of employment. Please contact us to request an accommodation.

FutureFit AI All rights reserved, we are proud to be an equal opportunity workplace. We celebrate diversity and are committed to creating an inclusive environment for all employees. We do not discriminate on the basis of race, religion, color, gender identity, sexual orientation, age, disability, veteran status, or other applicable legally protected characteristics. We encourage people of different backgrounds, experiences, abilities, and perspectives to apply.",N/A,https://www.indeed.com/viewjob?jk=b563412ffc57279f,False,machine learning
Senior Software Engineer,Research Warrant LLC,Remote,remote,2025-06-19,Indeed,"The Opportunity
We’re looking for a senior-level developer to own the end-to-end lifecycle of diffusion-based generative models running on NVIDIA’s new Grace Blackwell architecture. You’ll architect pipelines in Python, fine-tune Stable Diffusion models, and push the limits of large-scale inference on GB200-class hardware. If you thrive on building systems that move from a research notebook to petaflop-scale production, this role is for you.
What You’ll Do
Model R&D & Fine-Tuning – Fine-tune and evaluate Stable Diffusion (SDXL and beyond) for domain-specific image and video generation tasks.
Grace Blackwell Enablement – Design and optimize training/inference workloads to exploit GB’s unified HBM and NVLink-C2C, Tensor RT-LLM, and DPX instruction set.
Pythonic MLOps – Develop robust, test-covered Python code (3.10 +) for data prep, training orchestration (PyTorch 2 + Lightning, JAX/MaxDiffusion), and deployment.
Performance Engineering – Profile kernels, tune CUDA graphs, and apply compiler-level optimizations (Triton, TVM) to reach SOTA throughput/latency.
Cross-Functional Leadership – Partner with product, design, and platform engineering to ship features; mentor junior ML engineers.
Job Type: Full-time
Pay: From $55.00 per hour
Expected hours: 40 per week
Schedule:
8 hour shift
Monday to Friday
Weekends as needed
Work Location: Remote",N/A,https://www.indeed.com/viewjob?jk=db1e2083edec1315,False,cloud engineer
Cohesity Engineer/Architect,CDW,Remote,remote,2025-06-19,Indeed,"Cohesity Engineer/Architect
Location: Remote
Contract Duration: 6 months, can extend
Pay Rate: $80-85/hr.
Full-time, benefits
****In need of someone who has deep architecture knowledge as well as hands-on experience with Cohesity*****
Design, implement, knows how to run Cohesity environment day to day, as they rolled off VMWare and move to Cohesity.
Expert in recovery
Someone who can help with process, look at what is built and get each of backups into production environment
Job Description: We are seeking a skilled and experienced Cohesity Engineer/Architect to join our team. The ideal candidate will be responsible for designing, implementing, and managing our Cohesity environment on a day-to-day basis as we transition from VMware to Cohesity. This role requires an expert in recovery processes and someone who can help streamline our backup processes and ensure they are effectively integrated into our production environment.
Key Responsibilities:
Design and implement Cohesity solutions to meet business requirements.
Manage and maintain the Cohesity environment on a daily basis.
Collaborate with the team to transition from VMware to Cohesity.
Provide expert-level support for recovery processes.
Work closely with the team in India to ensure seamless operations.
Assist in developing and refining backup processes.
Ensure all backups are successfully integrated into the production environment.
Job Types: Full-time, Contract
Pay: $80.00 - $85.00 per hour
Expected hours: 40 per week
Benefits:
Dental insurance
Health insurance
Referral program
Vision insurance
Compensation Package:
Hourly pay
Schedule:
8 hour shift
Day shift
Monday to Friday
Application Question(s):
Do you have deep architecture knowledge as well as hands-on experience with Cohesity?
Are you open to working a remote 6 month contract position (with possible extensions)?
Experience:
Cohesity: 5 years (Preferred)
Work Location: Remote",N/A,https://www.indeed.com/viewjob?jk=47b21f35f799e029,False,cloud engineer
AWS Cloud Engineer,Cornerstone Technology,Remote,remote,2025-06-19,Indeed,"Job Title: AWS Cloud Migration Engineer
Location: Remote
Job Type: Full-time
Top Secret DoD Clearance Required
We are seeking a skilled AWS Cloud Migration Engineer to support a high-impact project with our government customer. This role will focus on migrating a mission-critical application from an on-premise environment to AWS GovCloud. The application stack includes Java services running primarily on Linux servers, with Oracle and MongoDB databases.
The ideal candidate will bring hands-on expertise in AWS GovCloud, cloud infrastructure automation, Linux system administration, and secure migration practices aligned with DoD and FedRAMP compliance.
Key Responsibilities:
Cloud Migration & Infrastructure Engineering
Lead and execute the end-to-end migration of all on premise IT components including Java based applications, Linux and Windows servers, databases, networking configurations, and storage systems to AWS GovCloud.
Configure and deploy AWS infrastructure components including EC2, S3, RDS, VPC, Load Balancers, and IAM.
Design and implement network architecture in AWS with security best practices (e.g., VPC, subnets, security groups, NACLs).
Automation & Infrastructure as Code
Build and maintain Infrastructure as Code (IaC) using Terraform and/or CloudFormation.
Develop and manage automation scripts using Python, Bash, and AWS SSM for provisioning, patching, and operational tasks.
Compliance & Security
Apply DoD STIGs and RMF controls during cloud environment setup and migration.
Ensure compliance with IL4/IL5 security standards in AWS GovCloud.
Support logging, monitoring, and alerting using AWS CloudWatch, CloudTrail, and third-party tools such as Grafana or Datadog.
Database Support & Integration
Coordinate with database engineers on the migration of Oracle and MongoDB databases.
Assist in provisioning and managing RDS and storage services as needed.
Collaboration & Documentation
Collaborate with application developers, security teams, and DCSA stakeholders to ensure a seamless migration process.
Create detailed technical documentation, migration runbooks, and architecture diagrams.
Qualifications:
Education:
Bachelor’s degree in Computer Science, Information Systems, Engineering, or related technical field.
Experience:
7+ years of experience in cloud engineering or system administration, with a strong background in AWS.
2+ years of experience supporting migrations to AWS GovCloud or other secure cloud environments.
Experience supporting applications running on Linux (RedHat/CentOS) with Oracle or MongoDB backend preferred.
Technical Skills:
Strong proficiency in AWS GovCloud, EC2, VPC, S3, RDS, IAM, and CloudWatch.
Experience with Terraform and/or CloudFormation for IaC.
Proficient in scripting (Python, Bash, PowerShell).
Familiarity with STIGs, RMF, and FedRAMP compliance in DoD environments.
Working knowledge of containerization (Docker) and orchestration (EKS/Kubernetes) is a plus.
Certifications (preferred):
AWS Certified Solutions Architect – Associate or Professional
CompTIA Security+ (required for DoD 8570 compliance)
Red Hat Certified System Administrator (RHCSA) or equivalent Linux certs
Job Type: Full-time
Pay: $120,213.00 - $140,413.00 per year
Benefits:
401(k)
401(k) matching
Dental insurance
Health insurance
Health savings account
Life insurance
Paid time off
Retirement plan
Vision insurance
Schedule:
Monday to Friday
License/Certification:
CompTIA Security+ (Required)
Security clearance:
Top Secret (Required)
Work Location: Remote",N/A,https://www.indeed.com/viewjob?jk=97e78e30ff660cf2,False,cloud engineer
Contract Software Engineer (PHP + AWS + JS),EasedEdge,Remote,remote,2025-06-19,Indeed,"Overview
We’re a fast-moving B2B SaaS startup looking for an experienced Software Engineer to help integrate a vector-based countertop drawing tool into our core estimating system. You won’t be working on the canvas itself , your focus will be on connecting the output of that tool to our backend and building a smooth, intuitive UI around it.
About EasedEdge:
EasedEdge seeks to be the preferred business management partner of countertop fabricators throughout the United States. We do this by developing business changing software through data-driven evolution, a focus on innovation, and working with the most valuable 3rd party integrations. The company was founded in 2018 and has quickly become one of the most respected software companies in our industry. Despite its growth, EasedEdge remains essentially a startup organization well poised for market expansion.
What You’ll Do
Build the integration between frontend drawing data and backend estimate generation logic
Implement and refine estimate logic: pricing calculations, tax rules, line item grouping/sorting
Create responsive, animated UI components (modals, inputs, state transitions)
Maintain clean architecture between the UI, API, and database layers
Test and debug your own code, we’re looking for reliable, production-ready work
Tech Stack
PHP
AWS
MySQL
Vanilla JavaScript, HTML, CSS
What You Bring
3+ years of professional software engineering experience
Experience working on data-driven applications (pricing, billing, estimating, etc.)
Ability to connect complex frontend data models to backend systems
Strong sense of UI quality and detail
Able to work independently and communicate clearly in a remote team
Comfortable managing 20–40 hours/week and shipping reliable features regularly
Project Details
Duration: 1–2 months
Schedule: Flexible (20–40 hours/week based on availability)
Remote
Rate: $50/hour, paid weekly or bi-weekly
Job Types: Full-time, Part-time, Temporary
Pay: $50.00 per hour
Expected hours: 40 per week
Compensation Package:
1099 contract
Hourly pay
Schedule:
4 hour shift
8 hour shift
Work Location: Remote",N/A,https://www.indeed.com/viewjob?jk=9ab3f6184bad81e5,False,cloud engineer
Senior DevOps Engineer,BELVA,Remote,remote,2025-06-19,Indeed,"About BELVA AI
At BELVA, we’re not just building technology—we’re redefining how people interact with it.
We believe technology should serve a higher purpose: making life better. Our mission is to liberate individuals from repetitive, manual tasks so they can focus on what truly matters. With ethical, privacy-first AI at our core, we empower people and organizations to work smarter and reclaim their time.
BELVA is a trailblazing AI company driven by curiosity, grit, and an unwavering commitment to progress. We value passion, attitude, and potential over pedigrees—because while skills can be learned, vision and leadership must come from within. If you're eager to shape the future of AI and build tools that genuinely serve people, we’d love to hear from you.
Position Overview
We are seeking a highly skilled and motivated Senior DevOps Engineer to join our team as our first dedicated DevOps hire. This is a pivotal role that offers the opportunity to define and lead the infrastructure, automation, and deployment strategy for a fast-growing AI company.
As a senior individual contributor, you will take full ownership of our cloud infrastructure, observability stack, deployment pipelines, and security practices. You’ll lead efforts to establish SOC2 and HIPAA compliance, implement infrastructure-as-code, and build scalable DevOps practices that support rapid product iteration without sacrificing reliability or security.
Key Responsibilities
Take full ownership of the company’s AWS-based cloud infrastructure.
Design, implement, and maintain modern DevOps best practices across environments and teams.
Lead SOC2 and HIPAA compliance efforts, including audit preparation and remediation.
Develop and maintain CI/CD pipelines, including support for Blue/Green and Canary deployments.
Migrate infrastructure to a fully infrastructure-as-code approach using tools such as Terraform.
Establish observability systems with actionable dashboards, logging, metrics, and alerts.
Implement and manage security and access controls suitable for a growing SaaS product.
Collaborate with the engineering team to drive best practices for scalable, reliable operations.
Required Qualifications
Bachelor’s degree in Computer Science, Engineering, or a related field, or equivalent practical experience.
6+ years of experience in DevOps, Site Reliability Engineering, or Infrastructure Engineering roles.
Deep hands-on experience with AWS and Kubernetes (EKS or similar).
Demonstrated success as the first or sole DevOps engineer within a startup or early-stage company.
Expertise in infrastructure-as-code (e.g., Terraform, Pulumi).
Experience building CI/CD systems from scratch.
Proficiency with monitoring and observability tools and best practices.
Direct experience leading or supporting SOC2, HIPAA, or equivalent compliance frameworks.
Ability to lead discussions on uptime, deployment reliability, and security strategy.
Preferred Qualifications
Familiarity with tools such as DataDog, MongoDB, Vercel, and Uvicorn.
Experience supporting MLOps or large language model (LLM) operations.
Experience deploying and managing private LLM model servers.
Hands-on experience with private artifact repositories (e.g., Artifactory, self-hosted PyPI/NPM).
Experience with ephemeral development environments and per-branch preview deployments.
Background in mobile DevOps (e.g., React Native CI/CD pipelines).
Job Type: Full-time
Pay: From $130,000.00 per year
Benefits:
401(k)
Dental insurance
Employee assistance program
Health insurance
Life insurance
Paid time off
Vision insurance
Schedule:
Day shift
Monday to Friday
Application Question(s):
Do you now, or will you in the future, require sponsorship for employment authorization (e.g., H-1B, TN, O-1) to work in the United States?
Education:
Bachelor's (Required)
Work Location: Remote",N/A,https://www.indeed.com/viewjob?jk=d4ba9856770b9c65,False,cloud engineer
Azure Cloud Engineer,Vectaur,Remote,remote,2025-06-19,Indeed,"Description:
Vectaur is actively seeking an Azure Cloud Engineer for a direct-hire opportunity to join an extremely stable and internationally respected national organization.

Position Summary

The Azure Cloud Engineer is responsible for designing, implementing, and maintaining Azure cloud infrastructure and services. They collaborate with cross-functional teams to ensure the availability, scalability, and security of Azure-based applications and systems. This role involves troubleshooting and optimizing Azure environments while staying updated on emerging Azure technologies and best practices within enterprise cloud computing.

In addition to supporting the current Azure ecosystem, the Engineer will also play a key role in migrating and securing new client data across the platform.

Experience with Terraform is essential and familiarity with DevOps and AWS is considered a plus.

Responsibilities:
Deploy and manage cloud resources (e.g., virtual machines, storage, databases) using Microsoft Azure.
Ensure the security, reliability, and performance of Azure-based infrastructure.
Collaborate with development, operations, and security teams to support application hosting and integration.
Migrate client data and workloads securely to Azure, ensuring compliance and performance standards.
Implement infrastructure as code (IaC) using Terraform, ARM templates, and Azure DevOps pipelines.
Monitor and troubleshoot Azure environments, responding to incidents and identifying areas for improvement.
Contribute to automation and orchestration efforts to streamline cloud operations.
Leverage cloud knowledge to support multi-cloud strategies, including AWS as warranted.

Requirements:
Proficiency with Azure infrastructure, services, and administration.
Strong experience with infrastructure as code (Terraform required; CloudFormation and ARM a plus).
Familiarity with container services such as Docker, Kubernetes, and Azure Container Instances.
Ability to manage cloud deployments securely and efficiently.
Excellent analytical, problem-solving, and troubleshooting skills.
Working knowledge of AWS environments and best practices is a plus.
Strong communication and collaboration skills to work effectively with technical and non-technical teams.
Demonstrated experience with cloud migration projects and securing client data.
Relevant certifications (Azure Administrator, Azure Solutions Architect, etc) are highly desired.



Additional Details
Employment Type: Direct-Hire
Location: Remote, within the USA
Target Total Compensation: $140k - $160k depending on skills & experience
Employment Status: No form of employment sponsorship is being considered at this time.


Determining compensation for this role depends upon a wide array of factors including but not limited to:
the individual’s skill sets, experience and training;
licensure and certification requirements;
office location and other geographic considerations;
other business and organizational needs.",N/A,https://www.indeed.com/viewjob?jk=d9b459e28c3c27e5,False,cloud engineer
"Sr. Software Engineer (JavaScript, TypeScript)",Intone Networks,"Remote in Minneapolis, MN",remote,2025-06-19,Indeed,"Consultant should have great healthcare experience. Job Title: Sr. Software Engineer (JavaScript, TypeScript) Duration: 6+ Months C2C Rate: $50/hr on C2C Location: Minneapolis, MN Remote Work: 100% Primary Skills: API,Javascript",N/A,https://www.indeed.com/viewjob?jk=f4b4e6fe2e4172f6,False,cloud engineer
Application/DevOps Engineer,"CMHWorks, LLC",Remote,remote,2025-06-19,Indeed,"Summary
Location: 100% Remote - U.S. Time Zones ONLY
Commitment: Part-Time
Position Type: Hourly/Contractor Direct (No Agencies)
We are looking for a highly skilled Application/DevOps Engineer who is experienced in all application hoisting a DevOps technologies. Application/DevOps Engineers are responsible for consulting with Engineering Manager and Architect in Application architectures, frameworks, and approaches as well as engineering solution implementations of defined system architectures.
.
***We are looking for an Independent Contractor (1099) who can be flexible with an “on-call” work schedule as needs increase or decrease.***
Details
Specific Responsibilities:
Consult with Engineering Manager and Architect in Application architectures, frameworks, and approaches.
Engineer the application implementation of defined system architectures including:
KPIs, targets, and tooling to measure application and third-party service performance related to the application,
Capture Domain design in accordance with Customer Requirements (DDD and BDD),
Documentation including architecture of deployed solutions, monitoring and support components, etc.,
Identify and document design decision points, propose approaches, and communicate for review and clarification.
Overseeing the development of documentation.
Ensure compliance and performance of developed applications through:
Definition of Best Practices and Standards,
Code Review,
Ensuring adherence to application architecture, application and development standards and practices,
And timely communication of identified issues to reduce potential cost risks.
Assist the PM with communications with clients and cross-functional departments to communicate project statuses and proposals.
Assist in root cause analysis for identified defects.
Communicating key project data to team members and building cohesion among teams.
Developing and executing project plans and tasks as assigned.

General Responsibilities:
Provide Tier 3 Support for escalation from Operations as assigned.
Engage Third-Party Service Providers as necessary to resolve systemic issues.
Document best practices, application standards, and standard operating procedures.
Developing and coordinating software system validation and testing methods.
Support Change Management Process through contribution in required Change Documentation and CAB Participation as Requested.
Establish, document, and communicate initial approaches to new application challenges.
Analyzing data to effectively coordinate the installation of new systems or the modification of existing systems.
Work with Dev Team Lead and Dev PM in the development, documentation and maintenance the software development lifecycle.
Ensure implementation of application components to provide effective monitoring of solution performance.
Maintain understanding of emerging technologies applicable to our current and planned products and services.
Proposing and implementing innovative solutions to meet our company’s technical needs.
Play a key role in shaping the future of our solutions and services.
Required Technical Skillsets:
Automation and DevOps(CI/CD) Toolsets (Jenkins, CodePipeline, CodeBuild, CodeDeploy)
Linux (Ubuntu, Centos) and Windows Server Engineering and Administration
Docker, ECS/Kubernetes Engineering
Platform Engineering experience including .NET, PHP/Laravel, Node.js
AWS Cloud Service Engineering (all)
Azure/365 Engineering (all)
Caching Services (REDIS, Elasticache)
Routing & Security (DNS, WAF, GSLB)
Other qualifications:
Must have reliable high speed internet.
Must be able to communicate in English. You'll be expected to provide regular updates on your work via our PM tool as well as our twice weekly Scrum calls.
Must be able to provide effective documentation.
Must be a team player and able to dedicate 20+ hours a week when required.
Must complete a skills assessment to qualify for the position.
No agencies will be considered.",N/A,https://www.indeed.com/viewjob?jk=41a0b838d92c9343,False,cloud engineer
"Junior Software Engineer, Core Cloud Engineering",Vultr,Remote,remote,2025-06-19,Indeed,"Who We Are
Vultr is on a mission to make high-performance cloud infrastructure easy to use, affordable, and locally accessible for enterprises and AI innovators around the world. With 32 cloud data center locations around the world, Vultr is trusted by hundreds of thousands of active customers across 185 countries for its flexible, scalable, global Cloud Compute, Cloud GPU, Bare Metal, and Cloud Storage solutions. Founded by David Aninowsky and self-funded for over a decade, Vultr has grown to become the world’s largest privately-held cloud infrastructure company.
Vultr Cares
Excellent Medical Benefits w/ 100% company-paid premiums for employee only plan + 100% company-paid dental & vision premiums
401(k) plan that matches 100% up to 4% with immediate vesting
Professional Development Reimbursement of $2,500 each year
11 Holidays + Paid Time Off Accrual + Rollover Plan + take your birthday off
Commitment matters to Vultr! Increased PTO at 3 year & 10 year anniversary + 1 month paid sabbatical every 5 years + Anniversary Bonus each year
$500 first year remote office setup + $400 each following year for new equipment
Internet reimbursement up to $75 per month
Gym membership reimbursement up to $50 per month
Company-paid Wellable subscription

Join Vultr
Our Engineering team at Vultr is seeking an Associate Software Engineer, Core Cloud Engineering to report to the Senior Manager, Core Cloud Engineering. This role will work with low-level systems programming, networking protocols, and hypervisor technologies. The ideal candidate will have experience with compiled languages like Rust, C, and Go, with occasional work in PHP for system integration. This is a hands-on engineering position with an emphasis on performance optimization, automation, and systems-level problem-solving, contributing to one of the most popular cloud platforms serving 1.5 million users.

What to expect:
Hypervisor API Integration: Design, implement, and maintain low-level integrations with hypervisor technologies like libvirt, QEMU, and KVM to enhance platform capabilities.
Networking Automation: Develop and maintain automation around Open vSwitch (OVS), BGP routing, and other networking components to streamline datacenter operations.
Performance Tuning: Analyze and optimize hypervisor performance across I/O, networking, and storage subsystems to meet scalability and efficiency goals.
Systems Development: Write efficient and maintainable code in Rust, C, and Go for high-performance services, ensuring reliability and maintainability.
Infrastructure Automation: Build and enhance tooling for automated hypervisor provisioning, monitoring, and management.
Collaboration: Work closely with other engineering teams to align development efforts with reliability, scalability, and business objectives.
Documentation: Produce high-quality technical documentation for APIs, systems, and processes to support team collaboration and scalability.
Mentorship: Share knowledge with team members, helping to grow expertise in low-level systems and performance engineering.

Our ideal candidate will have:
Experience in compiled languages like Rust (preferred), C, and Go, with experience in PHP for integration tasks.
Experience with hypervisor technologies such as libvirt, QEMU, and KVM.
Knowledge of networking protocols and tools, particularly BGP, Open vSwitch (OVS), and related automation frameworks.
Advanced skills in performance profiling, tuning, and optimization across I/O, network, and storage layers.
Familiarity with database systems and concepts, with a preference for MySQL.
Expertise in Linux systems administration and low-level troubleshooting.
Experience building and maintaining CI/CD pipelines with tools like Gitlab.
Strong knowledge of configuration management tools like Puppet.
Proficiency with observability tools such as Grafana, Sentry, and SumoLogic for monitoring and debugging complex systems.
Exceptional problem-solving skills, with a proven ability to address complex, low-level technical challenges.
Effective communication and collaboration abilities to work cross-functionally with teams and stakeholders.
A commitment to continuous learning and fostering a culture of technical excellence.

Compensation
$60,000 - $85,000
This salary can vary based on location, years of experience, background and skill set.
Vultr is committed to an inclusive workforce where diversity is celebrated and supported. All employment decisions at Vultr are based on business needs, job requirements, and individual qualifications.
Vultr regards the lawful and correct use of personal information as important to the accomplishment of our objectives, to the success of our operations and to maintaining confidence between those with whom we deal and ourselves. As such the use of various key privacy controls enables Vultr’s treatment of personal information to meet current regulatory guidelines and laws.
Workforce members have the right under US state law where and when applicable and certain other privacy and data protection laws, as applicable, to: fair and equal treatment, knowing what personal data we gather and retain, for what purpose, and the ability to access and/or delete such data. You also have the right to opt out of communications from Vultr and approved third- parties at any time.",N/A,https://www.indeed.com/viewjob?jk=ddbaf9567db52bf4,False,cloud engineer
Cybersecurity Specialist,AP Global,Remote,remote,2025-06-19,Indeed,"We are looking for a motivated Cyber Security Associate to join our growing team. If you are passionate about safeguarding digital assets and ensuring secure development processes, this role offers the perfect opportunity to start your career in cybersecurity. As a Cybersecurity Associate 1, you will work closely with our development teams to oversee security practices, ensuring that our e-commerce platforms remain secure and compliant with industry standards.
Key Responsibilities:
Assist in the implementation of security measures throughout the software development lifecycle (SDLC) to protect our e-commerce platforms from potential threats.
Monitor and analyze security alerts, assisting in the detection and response to potential security incidents.
Collaborate with development teams to ensure that security best practices are integrated into all stages of the development process.
Conduct regular security assessments, including vulnerability scanning and penetration testing, to identify and address potential risks.
Assist in maintaining and updating security documentation, policies, and procedures.
Support the implementation of security awareness programs to educate team members on best practices and emerging threats.
Stay informed about the latest cybersecurity trends, tools, and best practices, and assist in applying them to enhance our security posture.
Requirements:
Basic understanding of cybersecurity principles, including threat detection, vulnerability management, and incident response.
Familiarity with security tools such as firewalls, intrusion detection/prevention systems (IDS/IPS), and vulnerability scanners.
Knowledge of secure coding practices and the ability to collaborate with developers to enhance security in the SDLC.
Strong analytical and problem-solving skills, with a keen eye for detail.
Excellent communication skills in English, with a strong ability to work collaboratively within a remote team.
A passion for learning and staying up-to-date with the latest developments in cybersecurity.
We Offer:
A fully remote work environment with flexible hours, allowing you to work from anywhere.
A supportive team culture that values continuous learning and professional growth.
Opportunities to gain hands-on experience in cybersecurity and grow within the organization.
A competitive salary and a comprehensive benefits package.
Job Types: Full-time, Part-time, Contract
Pay: $17.00 - $20.00 per hour
Schedule:
Choose your own hours
Work Location: Remote",N/A,https://www.indeed.com/viewjob?jk=6d9f95aa2764f93d,False,cybersecurity
Cybersecurity Technician I,Trapp Technology,"Remote in Phoenix, AZ 85004",remote,2025-06-19,Indeed,"Position Summary: The Cybersecurity Technician, specializing in SIEM operations, plays a critical role in proactive alert investigation and incident response assistance. Operating primarily within the Security Information and Event Management (SIEM) platform, they continuously monitor and analyze security logs and alerts, identifying anomalies and potential security breaches. This technician investigates generated alerts, correlating events and contextualizing data to determine the severity and scope of potential alerts to determine whether they are a true or false positive. They are responsible for escalating critical findings to senior analysts or incident response teams. This role demands a keen analytical mind, a strong understanding of security principles, and the ability to quickly assess and respond to emerging threats in a dynamic environment.
The cybersecurity department operates 24/7. A variety of shifts are available to ensure coverage including 1, 2, and 3 shifts and weekends.
Responsibilities
This role is critical in providing initial support related to security alerts, ensuring customer information is protected, and facilitating the proper response to cybersecurity incidents. Here's a structured breakdown of the responsibilities mentioned:
Security Alert Management
Put on your detective hat and investigate potential security threats.
Escalate issues to higher-level support when necessary.
Customer Interaction
Assess and understand customer cybersecurity support needs effectively.
Procedure Adherence
Implement cybersecurity principles rigorously to safeguard customer information
Ensure compliance with all Trapp and ArmorPoint policies and procedures
Incident Response
Review alerts and collect data for incident response for further investigation
Assist in facilitating forensic analysis as needed.
Threat Research
Research emerging threats and vulnerabilities to improve incident identification
Stay informed to the latest cybersecurity trends and challenges
Performance Metrics
Optimize response times and close alerts efficiently to meet time-close requirements
Continued Professional Development
Participate in internal meetings and mandatory training sessions
Stay updated on industry best practices and emerging technologies
Other
Maintain a professional demeanor at all times
Uphold the integrity of the organization and its policies
Other duties as assigned
Qualifications and Skills
Education Background:
High School Diploma or GED equivalent (required)
Bachelor’s degree in computer science or a related field is preferred
Experience:
Minimum of two years of cybersecurity or IT experience (required)
Technical Skills:
Typing speed of at least 30 words per minute
Sec+ is highly preferred
CySA+, A+, Net+ are a plus
Soft Skills:
Exceptional listening skills
Clear and succinct communication abilities
Capability to compose grammatically correct and concise documentation
Good troubleshooting skills with the ability to isolate and resolve issues quickly
Enhanced ability to interpret customers’ descriptions of problems and summarize interactions
Necessary Experience
Minimum of 2 years of experience in a cybersecurity or IT role.
Experience in an organization with a strong emphasis on security practices is preferred.
Security+ certification is highly preferred. Additional certifications such as CySA+, a+, Net+ are a plus",N/A,https://www.indeed.com/viewjob?jk=1e66a102f454fd8a,False,cybersecurity
Cybersecurity Analyst,Avkare LLC,Remote,remote,2025-06-19,Indeed,"R&S Northeast and AvKARE, LLC is seeking a knowledgeable and experienced Cybersecurity Analyst to assist with maintaining the security and integrity of all digital platforms. The Cybersecurity Analyst will report directly to the Director of IT and will be responsible for establishing, executing, and maintaining cybersecurity policies, procedures, processes, and documentation. The Cybersecurity Analyst will also be responsible for monitoring networks and systems for security events and implementing measures to improve awareness and prevent security breaches. In-depth knowledge of cybersecurity and compliance is required. The ideal candidate knows how to collaborate on large-scale projects but can also complete assigned tasks on his or her own

Essential Duties and Responsibilities:
Continuously monitor network traffic for suspicious activity and security breaches
Investigate security incidents, analyze data, and respond to threats in real-time
Identify and assess vulnerabilities in systems, networks, and software
Research and analyze new and emerging threats to determine risk and plan for mitigation
Assist in the configuration and implementation of monitoring tools and software
Perform ethical hacking to simulate real-world cyberattacks, identify vulnerabilities, and provide remediation advice where necessary
Provide security status reports and risk assessments, and communicate findings to management
Maintain up-to-date, detailed documentation for IT policies, procedures, and processes
Develop and perform user training exercises to keep users informed and minimize the risk of human error
Additional duties assigned based on changes to business needs

Desired Qualifications
Knowledge of various network protocols, operating systems, and cybersecurity concepts
Strong understanding of IT security frameworks, standards, and guidelines, including NIST and CMMC
Experience with vulnerability scanning and penetration testing method
Ability to work with network security tools such as firewalls and endpoint security to identify, isolate, and mitigate threats
Excellent problem-solving and critical thinking skills
Strong verbal and written communication skills, attention to detail, and self-learning ability
Ability to work a flexible schedule, including occasional evening and weekend hours
Professional certifications, such as CISSP, CCP, OSCP, or CEH

WORKING CONDITIONS/Physical Requirements
Must be able to travel as required with the ability to sit and stand for extended periods. Work environment is usually performed in a home, office or customer setting. Lift and carry product computer material weighing up to 15 lbs. Requires use of a computer, copier, fax, phone and other standard office equipment. Digital dexterity and hand/eye coordination in operation of office equipment. Body motor skills sufficient to move from one location to another.

Travel
Must be willing to travel assigned geography which will include daily and some overnight travel up to 15%

Benefits:
Competitive salary and bonus structure
Comprehensive health, dental, vision and retirement plans
Ongoing professional development opportunities
A dynamic and collaborative work environment

#WeAreHealthDelivered#AvKareLLC #Ll-Remote #Fulltime

Other Duties
Please note this job description is not designed to cover or contain a comprehensive listing of activities, duties or responsibilities that are required of the employee for this job. Duties, responsibilities and activities may change at any time with or without notice.

AvKARE/R&S Northeast is an E-Verify and Equal Opportunity Employer. All qualified applicants will receive considerations for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, age, disability, marital status, sexual orientation, genetic information, gender identity, national origin, citizenship status, disabled veteran or veteran of Vietnam era, or any legally recognized status entitled to protection under applicable federal and state local laws. #INDHP1",N/A,https://www.indeed.com/viewjob?jk=3c7419f763944bbb,False,cybersecurity
Cybersecurity Online Adjunct Instructor,Remington College,"Remote in Dallas, TX 75243",remote,2025-06-19,Indeed,"If you’re a self-motivated, experienced education manager with a passion for the cybersecurity field and you have a desire to help others succeed, we want to hear from you!
We’re looking for a dedicated Cybersecurity Instructor to join our Online Campus.
Essential Duties/Responsibilities:
Prepares lesson plans using industry-standard approaches (e.g., multimedia, adult learning methodology).
Teaches courses as assigned, instructs, and evaluates students, develops students’ skills and encourages growth, and tracks their attendance, performance, and grades.
Participates in various administrative activities (e.g., attends faculty/staff meetings or in-service meetings).
Participates in graduation ceremonies, as assigned.
Participates regularly in continuing professional development activities.
Performs other duties or special projects as assigned.
Education/Experience Needed:
Must have an associate degree or higher in cybersecurity or a related field.
Must have at least 4 years of related practical work experience.
Learn more about us at www.remingtoncollege.edu
Remington College is an Equal Opportunity Employer. We provide reasonable accommodation where appropriate to applicants with disabilities.",N/A,https://www.indeed.com/viewjob?jk=239e059a2f50e21b,False,cybersecurity
Staff Software Engineer - AI Trainer,DataAnnotation,"Remote in Sunnyvale, CA",remote,2025-06-19,Indeed,"We are looking for proficient programmers to join our team to train our AI chatbots to code. You will work with the chatbots that we are building in order to measure their progress, as well as write and evaluate code.
To apply to this role, you will need to be proficient in either Python and/or JavaScript. Your role will require proficiency in at least one programming language/framework (JavaScript, TypeScript, Python, C, C#, C++, HTML/CSS, React, Go, Java, Kotlin, SQL, or Swift) in order to solve coding problems (think LeetCode, HackerRank, etc). For each coding problem, you must be able to explain how your solution solves the problem.
As part of the application process, you will be asked to complete an assessment. If you pass, you will gain access to projects. Based on the quality of your work, you will continue to receive projects regularly. We find our most successful candidates work between 5-20 hours per week, up to 40 hours.
Benefits:
This is a full-time or part-time REMOTE position
You’ll be able to choose which projects you want to work on
You can work on your own schedule
Projects are paid hourly, with bonuses on high-quality and high-volume work
Responsibilities:
Come up with diverse problems and solutions for a coding chatbot
Write high-quality answers and code snippets
Evaluate code quality produced by AI models for correctness and performance
Qualifications:
Fluency in English
Proficient in either Python and/or JavaScript
Detail-oriented
Excellent writing and grammar skills
A bachelor's degree (completed or in progress)
Note: Payment is made via PayPal. We will never ask for any money from you.
#INDUSSD
Job Type: Contract
Pay: From $40.00 per hour
Benefits:
Flexible schedule
Work Location: Remote",N/A,https://www.indeed.com/viewjob?jk=e81acb445f969bba,False,ai engineer
AI Engineer,DQLabs.ai,Remote,remote,2025-06-19,Indeed,"We are seeking a highly skilled AI Engineer with hands-on experience in AgnoAI, multi-agent orchestration, and LLM-based automation. You will be responsible for designing, building, and deploying intelligent agents that work collaboratively to solve complex business problems across data, analytics, and operational workflows. This role blends AI, systems engineering, and autonomy — ideal for someone passionate about the next evolution of software: agentic systems.
Responsibilities
Design, build, and deploy custom agents using AgnoAI for automation, observability, and decision-making tasks
Develop and maintain multi-agent systems using the AgnoAI Control Plane and MCP (Multi-Agent Control Plane)
Implement agent-to-agent communication using planner-based orchestration, dynamic chaining, and memory sharing
Integrate agents with tools like Snowflake, DBT, Airflow, LangGraph, Redis, and APIs
Leverage LLMs to enhance agent reasoning, summarization, task delegation, and knowledge grounding
Work closely with product, data, and platform teams to operationalize agent workflows
Optimize performance, memory sharing, and autonomy in distributed agent environments
Write robust, scalable Python code with modular architecture for easy agent reuse
Must-Have Qualifications
3+ years of experience in Python software development
1+ years of hands-on experience with AgnoAI or equivalent agent orchestration frameworks (LangChain, CrewAI, LangGraph)
Solid understanding of LLMs, prompt engineering, tool usage, and memory design
Experience building agents that interact with external systems (APIs, databases, file systems)
Familiarity with AI observability concepts (volume, freshness, drift, anomaly detection)
Knowledge of workflow design, chaining, or control plane patterns
Nice To Have
Experience with vector databases (e.g., pgVector, Weaviate, Pinecone, Qdrant)
Background in MLOps, DevOps, or cloud-native architecture
Experience using AgnoAI with multi-agent coordination, planner roles, or reasoning loops
Familiarity with Redis/Kafka for agent messaging
Exposure to data observability and quality tools
Tools & Stack You Might Use
AgnoAI, LangGraph, OpenAI API
Snowflake, DBT, Airflow
Python (FastAPI, AsyncIO)
Redis / Kafka / Vault
Docker, GitHub Actions, VectorDBs
Job Type: Full-time
Pay: $60,158.00 - $110,346.00 per year
Benefits:
Dental insurance
Employee discount
Flexible schedule
Health insurance
Health savings account
Paid time off
Referral program
Vision insurance
Schedule:
Monday to Friday
Work Location: Remote",N/A,https://www.indeed.com/viewjob?jk=3617716b8995f1bd,False,ai engineer
"Software Engineer, AI (Python)",G2i Inc.,"Remote in Columbus, OH",remote,2025-06-19,Indeed,"Software Engineer, AI — Code Evaluation & Training (Remote)
Help train large-language models (LLMs) to write production-grade code across a wide range of programming languages:
Compare & rank multiple code snippets, explaining which is best and why.
Repair & refactor AI-generated code for correctness, efficiency, and style.
Inject feedback (ratings, edits, test results) into the RLHF pipeline and keep it running smoothly.
End result: the model learns to propose, critique, and improve code the way you do.
RLHF in one line
Generate code ➜ expert engineers rank, edit, and justify ➜ convert that feedback into reward signals ➜ reinforcement learning tunes the model toward code you’d actually ship.
What You’ll Need
4+ years of professional software engineering experience in Python
(Constraint programming experience is a bonus, but not required)
Strong code-review instincts—you can spot logic errors, performance traps, and security issues quickly.
Extreme attention to detail and excellent written communication skills.
Much of this role involves explaining why one approach is better than another. This cannot be overstated.
You enjoy reading documentation and language specs and thrive in an asynchronous, low-oversight environment.
What You Don’t Need
No prior RLHF (Reinforcement Learning with Human Feedback) or AI training experience.
No deep machine learning knowledge. If you can review and critique code clearly, we’ll teach you the rest.
Tech Stack
We are looking for engineers with a strong command of Python.
Logistics
Location: Fully remote — work from anywhere
Compensation: From $30/hr to $70/hr, depending on location and seniority
Hours: Minimum 15 hrs/week, up to 40 hrs/week available
Engagement: 1099 contract
Straightforward impact, zero fluff. If this sounds like a fit, apply here!",N/A,https://www.indeed.com/viewjob?jk=76524024dbd2b2a2,False,ai engineer
"Python Software Engineer, AI",G2i Inc.,"Remote in Phoenix, AZ",remote,2025-06-19,Indeed,"Software Engineer, AI — Code Evaluation & Training (Remote)
Help train large-language models (LLMs) to write production-grade code across a wide range of programming languages:
Compare & rank multiple code snippets, explaining which is best and why.
Repair & refactor AI-generated code for correctness, efficiency, and style.
Inject feedback (ratings, edits, test results) into the RLHF pipeline and keep it running smoothly.
End result: the model learns to propose, critique, and improve code the way you do.
RLHF in one line
Generate code ➜ expert engineers rank, edit, and justify ➜ convert that feedback into reward signals ➜ reinforcement learning tunes the model toward code you’d actually ship.
What You’ll Need
4+ years of professional software engineering experience in Python
(Constraint programming experience is a bonus, but not required)
Strong code-review instincts—you can spot logic errors, performance traps, and security issues quickly.
Extreme attention to detail and excellent written communication skills.
Much of this role involves explaining why one approach is better than another. This cannot be overstated.
You enjoy reading documentation and language specs and thrive in an asynchronous, low-oversight environment.
What You Don’t Need
No prior RLHF (Reinforcement Learning with Human Feedback) or AI training experience.
No deep machine learning knowledge. If you can review and critique code clearly, we’ll teach you the rest.
Tech Stack
We are looking for engineers with a strong command of Python.
Logistics
Location: Fully remote — work from anywhere
Compensation: From $30/hr to $70/hr, depending on location and seniority
Hours: Minimum 15 hrs/week, up to 40 hrs/week available
Engagement: 1099 contract
Straightforward impact, zero fluff. If this sounds like a fit, apply here!",N/A,https://www.indeed.com/viewjob?jk=9d3fae17c5ce706d,False,ai engineer
Entry Level Full Stack AI Engineer,Hyperproof,Remote,remote,2025-06-19,Indeed,"Role Overview
We are hiring for an entry-level full stack software engineer with an AI focus. This is an ideal role for a recent graduate or early-career professional with a Bachelor's or Master's degree in Computer Science with an AI/ML focus. You'll join a team of experienced software engineers building AI-powered features, contributing your understanding of core AI/ML concepts while learning about the practical challenges of integrating new technology into existing code bases.
You won't be training foundation models from scratch—but you will help us evaluate, integrate, fine-tune, and apply them effectively. You'll help us think critically and creatively about how to use AI as a lever—not just a trend. And you'll collaborate with us in surfacing this technology as a platform & toolset for other engineers to understand and leverage. We are moving towards a future where every software engineer sees AI & LLM capabilities as part of their core toolset.
What You'll Do
Collaborate with senior engineers and product teams to design, build, and refine AI-powered features using LLMs and related technologies.
Apply your academic understanding of ML concepts (transformers, embeddings, RAG, fine-tuning, etc.) to help guide architecture and feature decisions.
Run experiments and evaluations on LLM prompts, model configurations, and data quality.
Stay on top of the latest developments in applied AI/ML, and help translate research into actionable ideas.
Prototype and test new AI features using tools like OpenAI, Hugging Face, LangChain, etc.
Bring a thoughtful, ethical perspective to AI use—highlighting limitations, risks, and opportunities.
Partner closely with product managers and design leads to identify high-impact AI opportunities in the compliance space.
Design and code engaging user experiences using TypeScript, Node.js, React, and Redux
Design and code backend architecture components including REST APIs, queueing, storage systems, RBAC, encryption, and security
Create technical standards, documentation, and developer upskill & enablement materials to support AI adoption across teams.
Write automated tests and build monitoring and system health metrics
What We're Looking For
Bachelor's or Master's degree in Computer Science, AI/ML, Data Science, or related field.
Strong academic foundation in machine learning, natural language processing, or applied AI.
Hands-on experience (internships, personal projects, or research labs) applying ML/AI tools to real-world data or problems.
Familiarity with modern AI toolkits and platforms, vector databases, prompt engineering, fine-tuning pre-trained models, etc.
Strong communication skills and intellectual curiosity—you enjoy learning and explaining what you've learned.
Strong collaboration skills - you're a great team member, working constructively with others
Self-starter attitude—you're comfortable working independently and jumping into ambiguous problems.
Candidate Experience
30-minute initial chat with our Talent Aquisition Specialist
Four 60-minute 1:1 interviews with our engineering team members
Opportunity to ask questions and ensure the role is the right fit
WHERE YOU'LL GO
Hyperproof also loves to see an internal transfer. If a linear career path is not what you're looking for, you can work with your manager and our people team to explore lateral moves to other parts of the organization as you continue to grow with us.
WHAT WE OFFER TO OUR EMPLOYEES
Please note: Benefits listed below are for employees in the United States; contractor roles or international positions may differ
Annual compensation reviews + equity
Unlimited PTO: strongly encouraged to unplug and recharge
Health: coverage for medical, dental, and vision - employee and dependents
401K, which vests immediately, complete with a 4% company match
12 weeks of Parental leave and 1 year free diapers and wipes with Honest
Annual company in-person events and quarterly in-person connects
$500 home office stipend - at the time of hire. Any additional home office needs are requested as needed.
$100 quarterly paid wellness stipend
Pet insurance discount
Slack channel notifications turn off after 5 pm based on your time zone
Two Hypercharge weeks of rest where we close company-wide (July & Dec)
It's an exciting time to be at Hyperproof — we recently raised $40 million in our Series B financing, further cementing Hyperproof as the emerging leader in the risk and compliance management space.
At Hyperproof's core are our passionate team members who focus on user experience, beautiful design, and evangelize a positive social impact of our cloud based platform. We help organizations streamline their risk and compliance workflows so our customers can spend more time strategically managing programs and less time wrangling spreadsheets.
We are disrupting the governance, risk, and compliance software space with our innovative platform by helping traditionally unsung heroes (compliance professionals) do the right things so the wrong things don't happen.
Learn more about the @hyperproof culture and how it all started.
EQUAL OPPORTUNITY EMPLOYER
Hyperproof is committed to a diverse and inclusive workplace — it's one of our core values! Hyperproof is an equal opportunity employer and does not discriminate on the basis of race, national origin, gender, gender identity, sexual orientation, protected veteran status, disability, age, or other legally protected status.
Our company is dedicated to building a diverse, inclusive, and authentic workplace. If you're excited about this role, but your experience doesn't perfectly fit every qualification, we encourage you to apply anyway. You may be just the right person for this role or others.",N/A,https://www.indeed.com/viewjob?jk=edaf6d9e1bbc7fac,False,ai engineer
Experienced Software Engineer across a wide array of tech stacks,"Infinity Software Development, Inc",Remote,remote,2025-06-19,Indeed,"Come help us build modern custom solutions for our growing book of business!
We’re looking for engineers who have experience across multiple technologies and have a passion for software development. It’s ok if you are more comfortable working on the front-end or back-end, but you should have at least some experience on both sides. If you are looking to join a fun team to tackle hard projects, with opportunities to learn new stacks, we’d love to talk to you.
There are no specific technology requirements for this role, but a number of our current projects are using: C#, TypeScript, .NET Core, React, Redux, Angular, Node, Vue, MVC, Swift, Kotlin, Docker, AWS, Azure, Microservices, SQL Server, Oracle, MongoDB.
We are open to US-based remote candidates only.
Infinity Software Development is a custom software development shop that has been delivering tailored technology solutions to our clients all over the country for over 30 years. We like working with people who love solving problems, who work hard and have a little fun in the process.
https://www.infinity-software.com/careers
Job Type: Full-time
Pay: $80,000.00 - $125,000.00 per year
Benefits:
401(k)
Dental insurance
Employee assistance program
Health insurance
Life insurance
Paid time off
Vision insurance
Schedule:
Monday to Friday
Work Location: Remote",N/A,https://www.indeed.com/viewjob?jk=3558156e1e941ee2,False,react developer
Staff Software Engineer - AI Trainer,DataAnnotation,"Remote in Sunnyvale, CA",remote,2025-06-19,Indeed,"We are looking for proficient programmers to join our team to train our AI chatbots to code. You will work with the chatbots that we are building in order to measure their progress, as well as write and evaluate code.
To apply to this role, you will need to be proficient in either Python and/or JavaScript. Your role will require proficiency in at least one programming language/framework (JavaScript, TypeScript, Python, C, C#, C++, HTML/CSS, React, Go, Java, Kotlin, SQL, or Swift) in order to solve coding problems (think LeetCode, HackerRank, etc). For each coding problem, you must be able to explain how your solution solves the problem.
As part of the application process, you will be asked to complete an assessment. If you pass, you will gain access to projects. Based on the quality of your work, you will continue to receive projects regularly. We find our most successful candidates work between 5-20 hours per week, up to 40 hours.
Benefits:
This is a full-time or part-time REMOTE position
You’ll be able to choose which projects you want to work on
You can work on your own schedule
Projects are paid hourly, with bonuses on high-quality and high-volume work
Responsibilities:
Come up with diverse problems and solutions for a coding chatbot
Write high-quality answers and code snippets
Evaluate code quality produced by AI models for correctness and performance
Qualifications:
Fluency in English
Proficient in either Python and/or JavaScript
Detail-oriented
Excellent writing and grammar skills
A bachelor's degree (completed or in progress)
Note: Payment is made via PayPal. We will never ask for any money from you.
#INDUSSD
Job Type: Contract
Pay: From $40.00 per hour
Benefits:
Flexible schedule
Work Location: Remote",N/A,https://www.indeed.com/viewjob?jk=e81acb445f969bba,False,react developer
Software Engineer,Gate3,"Remote in Elk Grove Village, IL 60007",remote,2025-06-19,Indeed,"Role Summary:
Responsible for delivering well-designed software components and contributing to the development of software solutions under moderate supervision. Apply strong technical skills to design, develop, test, and maintain software across modern and legacy platforms. Collaborate with team members and participate in architectural and design discussions to build reliable, maintainable products. This role offers opportunities to expand technical expertise and contribute to team success.
Key Responsibilities:
Design, develop, test and deploy software solutions
Lead code reviews to uphold engineering standards and provide constructive feedback; mentor junior engineers to foster technical growth and knowledge sharing
Collaborate with cross-functional teams to gather and implement project requirements
Maintain, refactor and enhance existing codebases, including legacy systems.
Contribute to architectural discussions and technical decision making; evaluate emerging technologies to support strategic growth
Follow and promote best practices in version control, testing and CI/CD pipelines
Diagnose and resolve complex technical issues, delivering robust, long-term solutions under tight deadlines
Drive continuous improvement across the engineering team by identifying opportunities for process optimization and efficient gains.
Minimum Requirements:
2-3 years of professional software development experience
Proficiency in multiple programming languages and frameworks
Solid understanding of version control systems, CI/CD practices, and testing methodologies
Experience with Modern Technologies (e.g., React, Node.js. Python, Go) and Legacy
Technologies (e.g. Net Framework, Java,)
Bachelor’s degree in Computer Science, Software Engineering or a related technical field, or equivalent practical experience.
Strong problem-solving skills and attention to detail.
Effective Communication and collaboration, including client interaction
Job Type: Full-time
Pay: $50,000.00 - $70,000.00 per year
Benefits:
401(k)
401(k) matching
Bereavement leave
Dental insurance
Flexible schedule
Flextime
Food provided
Health insurance
Internet reimbursement
Life insurance
On-site gym
Paid holidays
Paid sick time
Paid time off
Parental leave
Professional development assistance
Snacks provided
Vision insurance
Work from home
Schedule:
8 hour shift
Monday to Friday
Experience:
Software development: 4 years (Required)
Database development: 3 years (Required)
React: 3 years (Preferred)
Angular: 3 years (Preferred)
.NET: 3 years (Preferred)
Node.js: 3 years (Preferred)
Java: 3 years (Preferred)
Debugging: 3 years (Required)
Location:
Elk Grove Village, IL 60007 (Preferred)
Ability to Commute:
Elk Grove Village, IL 60007 (Required)
Work Location: Hybrid remote in Elk Grove Village, IL 60007",N/A,https://www.indeed.com/viewjob?jk=d40bc0cf164be638,False,react developer
.NET/React Developer,TEKsystems,"Remote in Naperville, IL 60540",remote,2025-06-19,Indeed,"Description
TEKsystems is seeking a .net developer with React experience to help one of our clients in Chicago. This is a contract to hire or full time role that does not provide sponsorship.
Skills
React, .NET, Asp.net, .NETcore, API, MVC, Sql server, UI, messaging brokers, TDD/BDD
Additional Skills & Qualifications
Hands on experience with ASP.Net , .NET Core, C#, Web API, MVC, SQLServer
Hands on experience building UI applications with React
Experience working with any top cloud providers (Azure/AWS/OCI)
Experience working with Microservices architecture with thorough understanding of Bounded contexts (DDD)
Demonstrated Experience with Message brokers (Preferably Azure Service Bus/RabbitMQ) in implementing event driven applications
Pay and Benefits
The pay range for this position is $65.00 - $75.00/hr.
Eligibility requirements apply to some benefits and may depend on your job
classification and length of employment. Benefits are subject to change and may be
subject to specific elections, plan, or program terms. If eligible, the benefits
available for this temporary role may include the following:
Medical, dental & vision
Critical Illness, Accident, and Hospital
401(k) Retirement Plan – Pre-tax and Roth post-tax contributions available
Life Insurance (Voluntary Life & AD&D for the employee and dependents)
Short and long-term disability
Health Spending Account (HSA)
Transportation benefits
Employee Assistance Program
Time Off/Leave (PTO, Vacation or Sick Leave)
Workplace Type
This is a fully remote position.
Application Deadline
This position is anticipated to close on Jun 20, 2025.
h4>About TEKsystems:
We're partners in transformation. We help clients activate ideas and solutions to take advantage of a new world of opportunity. We are a team of 80,000 strong, working with over 6,000 clients, including 80% of the Fortune 500, across North America, Europe and Asia. As an industry leader in Full-Stack Technology Services, Talent Services, and real-world application, we work with progressive leaders to drive change. That's the power of true partnership. TEKsystems is an Allegis Group company.
The company is an equal opportunity employer and will consider all applications without regards to race, sex, age, color, religion, national origin, veteran status, disability, sexual orientation, gender identity, genetic information or any characteristic protected by law.
About TEKsystems and TEKsystems Global Services
We’re a leading provider of business and technology services. We accelerate business transformation for our customers. Our expertise in strategy, design, execution and operations unlocks business value through a range of solutions. We’re a team of 80,000 strong, working with over 6,000 customers, including 80% of the Fortune 500 across North America, Europe and Asia, who partner with us for our scale, full-stack capabilities and speed. We’re strategic thinkers, hands-on collaborators, helping customers capitalize on change and master the momentum of technology. We’re building tomorrow by delivering business outcomes and making positive impacts in our global communities. TEKsystems and TEKsystems Global Services are Allegis Group companies. Learn more at TEKsystems.com.
The company is an equal opportunity employer and will consider all applications without regard to race, sex, age, color, religion, national origin, veteran status, disability, sexual orientation, gender identity, genetic information or any characteristic protected by law.",N/A,https://www.indeed.com/viewjob?jk=52c836886ea464cb,False,react developer
Full Stack Developer,The Storage Group,Remote,remote,2025-06-19,Indeed,"The Storage Group is seeking a Full Stack Developer - Lamp (Remote) who is comfortable around both front end and back-end coding languages, development frameworks and third-party libraries. We need a team player with a knack for visual design and utility. The best candidate will be part of a cross-functional team that is responsible for the full software development life cycle from conception to deployment. We also welcome new ideas and skills as we continually strive to be at the cutting edge of all that we do as a company.
APPLICANT MUST RESIDE IN UNITED STATES. THIS IS NOT A FREELANCE OR CONTRACT POSITION.
Day to Day Life at The Storage Group as a Full Stack Developer:
Develop, test and maintain new and existing web-based SaaS applications for our growing client base
Build pixel-perfect UX’s from visuals on the front end and connect new API’s into systems on the backend while maintaining snappy interactions and CRUD operations
Thoroughly implement and test functionality written by yourself or other developers and spot everything from small details to major logic flaws
Develop front end website architecture
Design user interactions on web pages
Develop back end website applications
Manage servers and databases maintaining functionality and uptime
Ensure responsiveness of applications
Work with graphic designers for web design features
Design and develop API’s
Write Technical documentation
What you need to know to be successful in this role:
Bachelor’s degree Computer Science or relevant technical field preferred
Knowledge and experience with WordPress networked sites
Knowledge experience with multiple front-end languages (i.e. JavaScript, HTML/ CSS, JQuery)
Knowledge of multiple back-end languages (C#, Java, Python and JavaScript frameworks ( i.e. Angular, React, Node.js)
Strong knowledge of integrating third-party APIs
Knowledge and experience with PHP
Experience with Database management (i.e. MySQL, MongoDB), web servers and UI/UX design
Ability to write clean code and follow coding standards
Ability to work in a team setting and able to adapt at a moment’s notice
Creative, adaptable and willing to learn new techniques
Excellent visual and oral communication skills
Bonus Skills:
ADA compliance experience
WCAG 2. 0 Experience
Server, domain, email troubleshooting
SEO knowledge
E-Commerce
Design skills a plus (UX/UI)
What the Storage Group needs from you:
A motivated, innovative, career focused
Willing to go the extra mile to get the job done
Independent but loves brainstorming and working with a team
Able to bring enthusiasm and can do attitude
Service oriented
Someone who likes to learn
The Storage Group, is a progressive marketing solutions and Saas provider to the Self Storage Industry. Our company has a proven track record providing innovative products and services to our clients. Our clients can be found in all 50 states, South America and Asia. Our clients range from all aspects of the Self Storage industry, from single properties to multi units owners and it is important that we provide the tools to help them be successful. Our clients are our family and we always strive to make sure how we service them is always above and beyon
Job Type: Full-time
Benefits:
401(k)
401(k) matching
Bereavement leave
Dental insurance
Disability insurance
Health insurance
Life insurance
Paid holidays
Paid jury duty
Paid sick time
Paid time off
Vision insurance
Work from home
Schedule:
8 hour shift
Monday to Friday
Application Question(s):
How many years of experience do you have with each of the following : MySQL, JavaScript, HTML, CSS?
Do you have familiarity or experience with PCI compliance?
What is your desired salary range?
Please list a few dates and times that you would be available for a short phone interview?
Experience:
WordPress on Networked Websites: 4 years (Required)
PHP: 4 years (Required)
APIs: 4 years (Required)
Work Location: Remote",N/A,https://www.indeed.com/viewjob?jk=7c771c57739d02a4,False,react developer
Junior Software Engineer,CRIO,"Remote in Boston, MA",remote,2025-06-19,Indeed,"CRIO (Clinical Research IO) is a health tech company helping pharma, biotech, research sites, and academic research centers streamline regulatory workflows with one system and a single source of clinical data capture. Our modules allow sites to capture data electronically in real-time, providing data managers and monitors with enhanced transparency, and enabling remote monitoring by sponsors and CROs.
CRIO’s eSource and CTMS system is a leading, modern, enterprise platform built for clinical research sites. Since CRIO’s launch in 2016, CRIO has established the leading brand position in eSource and has won close to 50% of the emerging class of enterprise-grade site networks, many of whom are backed by institutional investors such as VC, PE and corporations. CRIO has achieved the attached metrics, all with little to no serious outbound sales or marketing.

Software Engineer
We are looking for a Junior Software Engineer who is eager to learn and grow in their career while contributing to a meaningful cause. An ideal candidate will understand the basics of software development and will be an enthusiastic self-starter, excited to work with experienced team members who can provide mentorship. Our software engineers are passionate about coding, problem-solving, and collaborating on exciting projects that make a real difference in the health tech space.

Responsibilities
Collaborate with senior engineers and team members on various projects.
Assist in developing cloud-based SaaS products and features.
Contribute to the design, implementation, and testing of software components.
Participate in code reviews and learn best practices in software development.
Troubleshoot and debug applications as needed.

Skills
Familiarity with programming languages such as Java, JavaScript, or Python.
Understanding of web technologies (HTML, CSS, JavaScript) and frameworks (React, Angular).
Experience with relational databases (like MySQL) is a plus.
Knowledge of containerization tools such as Docker is beneficial.

Other Skills/Experience
Strong desire to learn and adapt.
Good communication and teamwork skills.
Detail-oriented and a proactive approach to problem-solving.
A positive attitude and eagerness to contribute.
1-2 years Experience in Software Development
Experience with standard software development practices, with exposure to one or more tools such as Jira and/or Github
Bachelor’s Degree or comparable experience in computer science, engineering, or a related field required.

Nice to Have

Internship or project experience in software development.
Exposure to cloud platforms like Google Cloud Platform (GCP).
Experience in healthcare or life sciences domains is a plus.
(Please note that we do not currently provide visa sponsorship for this position. Candidates must possess the legal right to work in the United States without the need for sponsorship.)

Locations
Fully remote.

At CRIO, equality is a core tenet of our culture. We are committed to building an inclusive global team that represents a variety of backgrounds, perspectives, beliefs, and experiences. The more diverse we are, the richer our community and the broader our impact. Employment decisions are made on the basis of job-related criteria without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, disability, veteran status, or any other classification protected by applicable law.

The pay range for this role is:
80,000 - 100,000 USD per year(Remote (United States))",N/A,https://www.indeed.com/viewjob?jk=46686e4e2ec7380a,False,react developer
Software Engineer,Deep Reef,Remote,remote,2025-06-19,Indeed,"Overview
We are seeking a talented and motivated Software Engineer to join our dynamic team here at DeepReef. We're based in Colorado but this role is fully remote. The ideal candidate will have a strong background in software development and a passion for creating innovative solutions. You will play a key role in designing, developing, and maintaining software applications that enhance our IT infrastructure and deliver exceptional user experiences. If you thrive in an Agile environment and are eager to tackle complex challenges, we want to hear from you.
Responsibilities
Design, develop, and implement software solutions using tools such as Typescript, node.js, React and JavaScript.
Collaborate with cross-functional teams to define project requirements and specifications.
Conduct code reviews and maintain high standards of code quality.
Troubleshoot, debug, and optimize existing applications for performance improvements.
Engage in web development projects, ensuring responsive design and functionality across various platforms.
Utilize MySQL and SQL for database management and data manipulation tasks.
Participate in Agile ceremonies including sprint planning, stand-ups, and retrospectives to ensure timely delivery of projects.
Document software processes, code changes, and technical specifications for future reference.
Requirements
Bachelor’s degree in Computer Science or a related field, or equivalent practical experience.
Familiarity with web development technologies and frameworks.
Strong understanding of database management systems, particularly MySQL and SQL.
Experience with Agile methodologies and practices.
Excellent problem-solving skills and the ability to work collaboratively within a team environment.
Strong communication skills to effectively convey technical concepts to non-technical stakeholders.
Join us as we innovate the future of technology through cutting-edge software solutions!
Job Type: Full-time
Pay: $70,000.00 - $110,000.00 per year
Benefits:
Flexible schedule
Schedule:
Day shift
Weekends only
Work Location: Remote",N/A,https://www.indeed.com/viewjob?jk=74366bdfec3392f9,False,react developer
Python Developer,Belaku Jobs,Remote,remote,2025-06-19,Indeed,"Job Overview
We are seeking a skilled Python Developer to join our dynamic team. The ideal candidate will have expertise in Python and a passion for developing innovative software solutions. This position offers an exciting opportunity to work on diverse projects and contribute to cutting-edge technology developments.
Responsibilities
Develop and maintain Python-based applications
Collaborate with cross-functional teams to define, design, and ship new features
Write efficient, reusable, and reliable code
Integrate user-facing elements with server-side logic
Implement security and data protection measures
Troubleshoot, debug, and upgrade existing systems
Stay updated on emerging technologies
Experience
Proficiency in Python programming
Familiarity with React Express, REST, Java, C, azure, Quantum engineering, VBA, Ruby on Rails
Experience in web development is a plus
Strong problem-solving skills
Ability to work both independently and as part of a team
Excellent communication and collaboration abilities
If you are a talented Python Developer looking to advance your career in a dynamic environment working on cutting-edge technologies, we encourage you to apply.
Job Type: Full-time
Pay: $61.63 - $65.50 per hour
Benefits:
Health insurance
Schedule:
Monday to Friday
Work Location: Remote",N/A,https://www.indeed.com/viewjob?jk=3efdab88c221bbc9,False,react developer
Software Engineer (Full Stack),"GAR Associates, LLC",Remote,remote,2025-06-19,Indeed,"Company Overview
GAR Associates, LLC is a real estate appraisal and consulting firm with over 63 years of experience with offices in both the Capital Region and Western parts of New York. Over the past 20 years, GAR has made significant investments in software engineering and applications related to the assessment and appraisal industry, both internal and public-facing. That investment includes building an experienced team of software engineers that are excited about using new technology to create state-of-the-art assets that continue to expand our business.
Summary
We are seeking a full-stack software engineer to join our team. In this role, you will work with a team of engineers to write code for both backend APIs and frontend user interfaces. You will implement web-based applications that are optimized for performance, scalability, testing, and supportability. We are looking for a candidate that has demonstrated a passion for learning new technology and working with a team toward a common goal.
Responsibilities
Design and develop scalable web applications using modern frameworks and technologies.
Implement RESTful APIs to facilitate seamless communication between front-end and back-end systems.
Set up and help maintain Azure cloud-resources including Kubernetes.
Maintain and optimize existing applications for performance and security.
Participate in code reviews to ensure code quality and adherence to best practices.
Stay updated with emerging technologies and industry trends to continuously improve development processes.
Requirements:
5+ years experience as a Full Stack Developer or similar role in software engineering.
Strong proficiency in React and Python programming languages.
Experience creating CICD flows and with Kubernetes in the Cloud
Experience in the following areas is a plus:
Cloud infrastructure (Azure or AWS)
Cloud deployment with Docker containers
Cloudflare / DNS
Restful API, FastAPI
Go Language
ESRI or Google Mapping
Logging/Telemetry
Unit testing
Security standards such as OAuth
Agile team process
If you're ready to take your career to the next level with an innovative team dedicated to excellence in software development, we invite you to apply today at GAR Associates. Your next big opportunity awaits!
Job Type: Full-time
Pay: $100,000.00 - $115,000.00 per year
Benefits:
401(k)
Dental insurance
Health insurance
Schedule:
Monday to Friday
Work Location: Remote",N/A,https://www.indeed.com/viewjob?jk=cabe00671425d9b3,False,python developer
Senior Software Engineer,Research Warrant LLC,Remote,remote,2025-06-19,Indeed,"The Opportunity
We’re looking for a senior-level developer to own the end-to-end lifecycle of diffusion-based generative models running on NVIDIA’s new Grace Blackwell architecture. You’ll architect pipelines in Python, fine-tune Stable Diffusion models, and push the limits of large-scale inference on GB200-class hardware. If you thrive on building systems that move from a research notebook to petaflop-scale production, this role is for you.
What You’ll Do
Model R&D & Fine-Tuning – Fine-tune and evaluate Stable Diffusion (SDXL and beyond) for domain-specific image and video generation tasks.
Grace Blackwell Enablement – Design and optimize training/inference workloads to exploit GB’s unified HBM and NVLink-C2C, Tensor RT-LLM, and DPX instruction set.
Pythonic MLOps – Develop robust, test-covered Python code (3.10 +) for data prep, training orchestration (PyTorch 2 + Lightning, JAX/MaxDiffusion), and deployment.
Performance Engineering – Profile kernels, tune CUDA graphs, and apply compiler-level optimizations (Triton, TVM) to reach SOTA throughput/latency.
Cross-Functional Leadership – Partner with product, design, and platform engineering to ship features; mentor junior ML engineers.
Job Type: Full-time
Pay: From $55.00 per hour
Expected hours: 40 per week
Schedule:
8 hour shift
Monday to Friday
Weekends as needed
Work Location: Remote",N/A,https://www.indeed.com/viewjob?jk=db1e2083edec1315,False,python developer
Full Stack Developer,The Storage Group,Remote,remote,2025-06-19,Indeed,"The Storage Group is seeking a Full Stack Developer - Lamp (Remote) who is comfortable around both front end and back-end coding languages, development frameworks and third-party libraries. We need a team player with a knack for visual design and utility. The best candidate will be part of a cross-functional team that is responsible for the full software development life cycle from conception to deployment. We also welcome new ideas and skills as we continually strive to be at the cutting edge of all that we do as a company.
APPLICANT MUST RESIDE IN UNITED STATES. THIS IS NOT A FREELANCE OR CONTRACT POSITION.
Day to Day Life at The Storage Group as a Full Stack Developer:
Develop, test and maintain new and existing web-based SaaS applications for our growing client base
Build pixel-perfect UX’s from visuals on the front end and connect new API’s into systems on the backend while maintaining snappy interactions and CRUD operations
Thoroughly implement and test functionality written by yourself or other developers and spot everything from small details to major logic flaws
Develop front end website architecture
Design user interactions on web pages
Develop back end website applications
Manage servers and databases maintaining functionality and uptime
Ensure responsiveness of applications
Work with graphic designers for web design features
Design and develop API’s
Write Technical documentation
What you need to know to be successful in this role:
Bachelor’s degree Computer Science or relevant technical field preferred
Knowledge and experience with WordPress networked sites
Knowledge experience with multiple front-end languages (i.e. JavaScript, HTML/ CSS, JQuery)
Knowledge of multiple back-end languages (C#, Java, Python and JavaScript frameworks ( i.e. Angular, React, Node.js)
Strong knowledge of integrating third-party APIs
Knowledge and experience with PHP
Experience with Database management (i.e. MySQL, MongoDB), web servers and UI/UX design
Ability to write clean code and follow coding standards
Ability to work in a team setting and able to adapt at a moment’s notice
Creative, adaptable and willing to learn new techniques
Excellent visual and oral communication skills
Bonus Skills:
ADA compliance experience
WCAG 2. 0 Experience
Server, domain, email troubleshooting
SEO knowledge
E-Commerce
Design skills a plus (UX/UI)
What the Storage Group needs from you:
A motivated, innovative, career focused
Willing to go the extra mile to get the job done
Independent but loves brainstorming and working with a team
Able to bring enthusiasm and can do attitude
Service oriented
Someone who likes to learn
The Storage Group, is a progressive marketing solutions and Saas provider to the Self Storage Industry. Our company has a proven track record providing innovative products and services to our clients. Our clients can be found in all 50 states, South America and Asia. Our clients range from all aspects of the Self Storage industry, from single properties to multi units owners and it is important that we provide the tools to help them be successful. Our clients are our family and we always strive to make sure how we service them is always above and beyon
Job Type: Full-time
Benefits:
401(k)
401(k) matching
Bereavement leave
Dental insurance
Disability insurance
Health insurance
Life insurance
Paid holidays
Paid jury duty
Paid sick time
Paid time off
Vision insurance
Work from home
Schedule:
8 hour shift
Monday to Friday
Application Question(s):
How many years of experience do you have with each of the following : MySQL, JavaScript, HTML, CSS?
Do you have familiarity or experience with PCI compliance?
What is your desired salary range?
Please list a few dates and times that you would be available for a short phone interview?
Experience:
WordPress on Networked Websites: 4 years (Required)
PHP: 4 years (Required)
APIs: 4 years (Required)
Work Location: Remote",N/A,https://www.indeed.com/viewjob?jk=7c771c57739d02a4,False,python developer
Full Stack Developer (Business Rules),CareCentrix,Remote,remote,2025-06-19,Indeed,"Overview:
As a Full-Stack Developer, you will be responsible for implementing applications and services related to Business Rules in the healthcare domain. You’ll be involved throughout the software development lifecycle—including requirements gathering, design, development, testing, and maintenance—while collaborating with cross-functional teams to ensure solutions meet business needs and industry standards.
Responsibilities:
Qualifications:

Technical Responsibilities:
Design, develop, and implement new features
Follow technical standards and best practices for development; and write clean, scalable, efficient code.
Participate in code and configuration reviews and provide constructive feedback.
Implement automation processes for build, test, deploy.
Ensure the performance, quality, and responsiveness of the applications.
Communicate technical information clearly and effectively to both technical and non-technical audience.
Agile Team Responsibilities:
Participate in the grooming sessions with the product owner, and other stakeholders to understand their needs and requirements; and help improve the acceptance criteria of the stories.
Participate actively in all the sprint ceremonies and ensure that committed stories are delivered on time.
Assist the Tech lead in building the knowledge base artifacts for the team.
System Maintenance and Support:
Assist in monitoring the performance and behavior of Rules systems and identify areas for improvement.
Troubleshoot and resolve technical issues in the existing software.
Stay up to date with the Rules configuration technologies and best practices.
This is the role for you if:
You have experience with Agile development methodologies,
You have experience with Business Rules, open-source frameworks
You have experience with Microservices.
Qualifications:
You should apply if you have:
Bachelor’s degree in computer science, or a related field or equivalent related work experience.
2+ years of experience in software development, with a strong focus on building loosely coupled applications and microservices.
Expertise in building applications and services using tech stacks like Java, Python, Golang
Proficiency in leveraging frameworks such as Kafka, DROOLs, ORM tools
Comfortable developing on-premise and cloud solutions
Experience with database management systems
Excellent problem-solving and analytical skills.
Strong communication and interpersonal skills.
Ability to work independently and as part of a team.

What we offer:
Salary range of $85000 - $110000 / year plus a potential annual bonus opportunity
Full range of benefits including Health, Dental and Vision with HSA Employer Contributions and Dependent Care FSA Employer Match
Generous PTO, 401K Savings Plan, Paid Parental Leave, free on-demand Virtual Fitness Training and more
Advancement Opportunities, professional skills training, and tuition /exam reimbursement
PayActiv - access earned income in between pay checks
Walgreens Discount - receive up to 25% off eligible items
Great culture with a sense of community
THIS ROLE IS REMOTE FOR INDIVIDUALS RESIDING IN THE UNITED STATES ONLY

Must be able to work in the US without any sponsorship

CareCentrix maintains a drug-free workplace

#IDCC

We are an equal opportunity employer. Employment selection and related decisions are made without regard to age, race, color, national origin, religion, sex, disability, sexual orientation, gender identification, or being a qualified disabled veteran or qualified veteran of the Vietnam era or any other category protected by Federal or State law.

CareCentrix accepts applications on an ongoing basis until a candidate is identified.",N/A,https://www.indeed.com/viewjob?jk=a362624d315cbc58,False,python developer
Python Developer,Structured Labs,Remote,remote,2025-06-19,Indeed,"Job Summary
We are seeking a skilled Python Developer to join our dynamic team. The ideal candidate will have a strong foundation in Python programming and be proficient in developing robust applications. This role requires collaboration with cross-functional teams to design, develop, and maintain software solutions that meet business needs. The successful candidate will be passionate about coding and eager to learn new technologies.
Duties
Develop, test, and maintain high-quality software applications using Python.
Collaborate with front-end developers to integrate user-facing elements with server-side logic.
Write reusable, testable, and efficient code while adhering to best practices.
Participate in code reviews to ensure code quality and share knowledge with team members.
Troubleshoot, debug, and optimize existing applications for performance improvements.
Work within an Agile development environment, participating in daily stand-ups and sprint planning.
Utilize version control systems such as GitHub for source code management.
Implement Role-Based Access Control (RBAC) mechanisms to enhance application security.
Qualifications
Proficiency in Python programming language; experience with JavaScript is a plus.
Familiarity with SQL databases and ability to write complex queries.
Understanding of C programming language is beneficial.
Experience with Linux operating systems for development and deployment.
Knowledge of Agile methodologies and experience working in Agile teams.
Familiarity with cloud services such as AWS is an advantage.
Strong problem-solving skills and attention to detail.
Excellent communication skills and ability to work collaboratively in a team environment.
Join us as we innovate and create impactful software solutions!
Job Types: Full-time, Contract, Temporary, Internship
Pay: $31.58 - $65.44 per hour
Work Location: Remote",N/A,https://www.indeed.com/viewjob?jk=e4a4e223e3a07320,False,python developer
Python Developer,Digitizing.io,Remote,remote,2025-06-19,Indeed,"Overview: We are looking for a python developer to help with our data pipeline and scraping initiatives and our ELT system.Using selenium or other methods to get data from a variety of sources then store them in s3 buckets, parse and transform them into database tables and then create applications like bots and dashboards for our clients.
More than 30 hrs/week Hourly
More than 6 months Duration
Intermediate; I am looking for a mix of experience and value
$15.00
-
$25.00
Hourly
Skills and Expertise
Mandatory skills
Python
Data Scraping
Data Science
NumPy
ETL Pipeline
Machine Learning
pandas
Selenium
Selenium WebDriver
Job Types: Full-time, Part-time
Pay: $15.00 - $25.00 per hour
Expected hours: No less than 30 per week
Compensation Package:
Hourly pay
Schedule:
Day shift
Evening shift
Monday to Friday
Night shift
Overtime
Weekends as needed
Work Location: Remote",N/A,https://www.indeed.com/viewjob?jk=74f656554d1ef085,False,python developer
Junior Software Engineer,Corporate Tools,"Remote in Spokane, WA",remote,2025-06-19,Indeed,"Overview:
Corporate Tools is hiring a Junior Software Engineer for $75,000/year. You will be a traditional company employee. This is a full time 40 hour/week position with company benefits in Spokane, Washington.
Corporate Tools is always hiring great Software Engineers. We primarily code in Ruby, Javascript and use Rails and Vue. We classify this position as an entry level position within our Software Department.
Our Junior Software Developer job is a path towards becoming an integral part of our software team. This position is geared towards developers with limited experience or a recent college graduate. Through working with our team of developers, this position will put you on the path towards gaining more skills and experience to help you advance within our company.
Junior Software Engineer Jobs:
Our Junior Software Engineers spend their first year integrating and hopefully advance to becoming Software Engineers within our company. We offer a guaranteed 6 month assessment with an opportunity for a wage increase based on your proficiency in some key skills. We’ll work with you and bring you along to become a vital part of our group. This is our entry level software developer position and a great way to get started with our company. We’re looking for great people who want to do great work. We understand you might suck at writing resumes or pitching yourself, or most your code might be private. Try your best to explain to us what you can do so we can hopefully find you! If you’re a good person, like learning and improving, and want to grow your skills, we want to find you.
How to Apply:
Please apply through the link below. It’s a coding job, so showing us some code would be helpful. Preferably a flavor of Ruby or Javascript, but anything for now will do.

Wage:
$75,000 a year
Benefits:
100% employer-paid medical, dental and vision for employees
Annual review with raise option
22 days Paid Time Off accrued annually, and 4 holidays
After 3 years, PTO increases to 29 days. Employees transition to flexible time off after 5 years with the company—not accrued, not capped, take time off when you want
The 4 holidays are: New Year’s Day, Fourth of July, Thanksgiving, and Christmas Day
Paid Maternity and Paternity Leave
Up to 5% company matching 401(k) with no vesting period
Quarterly allowance
Use to make your remote work set up more comfortable, for continuing education classes, a plant for your desk, coffee for your coworker, a massage for yourself... really, whatever
Open concept office with friendly coworkers
Creative environment where you can make a difference
No dumb benefits like free dog walking on the weekends that snobby hipster places have to make you feel cool, but mathematically won't cost the company much money because you won't use it
Trail Mix Bar
- oh yeah
Responsibilities:
Develop Software
Have a Growth Mindset, not a Fixed Mindset
Learn how to become proficient in Ruby, Rails, and Vue
Requirements:
BS in Computer Science or at least 2 years of related experience
At least 1 year of relevant professional experience
Experience with current software development languages such as Ruby, Python, Java, or Rust, etc.
Experience with front-end web development languages such as HTML, CSS and Javascript
Experience with current web application frameworks such as Django, Laravel, or Ruby on Rails (preferred but not required)
You’re easy-going and willing to learn on the job while also getting stuff done
Able to work in an agile environment with a focus on continuous integration
Junior Software Engineer
Spokane, WA",N/A,https://www.indeed.com/viewjob?jk=a7b123b7b7425908,False,python developer
Senior React Developer,BELVA,Remote,remote,2025-06-19,Indeed,"About BELVA AI
At BELVA, we’re not just building technology—we’re redefining how people interact with it.
We believe technology should serve a higher purpose: making life better. Our mission is to liberate individuals from repetitive, manual tasks so they can focus on what truly matters. With ethical, privacy-first AI at our core, we empower people and organizations to work smarter and reclaim their time.
BELVA is a trailblazing AI company driven by curiosity, grit, and an unwavering commitment to progress. We value passion, attitude, and potential over pedigrees—because while skills can be learned, vision and leadership must come from within. If you're eager to shape the future of AI and build tools that genuinely serve people, we’d love to hear from you.
The Role:
We’re looking for a sharp, pragmatic Senior React Developer to join our fast-moving team. You’ll take the lead in building performant, responsive, AI-centric web applications that power core parts of our user experience. This is a hands-on role where your architectural decisions, technical craftsmanship, and product instincts will shape the future of our platform.
You’ll collaborate closely with backend, design, and product teams to deliver beautiful and intelligent interfaces. You’ll also play a key role in defining our front-end standards, exploring the intersection of AI and UI, and ensuring our apps stay fast, stable, and testable.
NOTE: Must be a Citizen or Green Card Holder and live in the United States
Key Responsibilities:
Lead development of robust, scalable React + TypeScript + Next.js applications
Own the frontend architecture and drive key decisions around technology and UX
Build real-time, responsive interfaces using WebSockets and modern browser APIs
Collaborate with Product, Design, and Backend teams to build delightful user experiences
Champion frontend quality via rigorous code standards, linters, type safety, and testing
Leverage AI-assisted tools to increase speed and accuracy throughout the dev process
Optimize applications for performance and automated browser testing
Required Experience:
7+ years of experience building modern web applications
Experience working in a fast-paced startup environment
Deep expertise in React, TypeScript, Next.js and frontend engineering best practices
Experience working with WebSockets and real-time data flows
Demonstrated use of AI tools in software development
Proven ability to collaborate with cross-functional teams on complex UX challenges
Passion for writing clean, testable, maintainable code
Familiarity with frontend testing and automation strategies
Nice to Haves:
Full-stack experience, particularly with Python-based backends
Experience building AI products, including chat interfaces or workflow builders
Exposure to observability tooling and browser performance diagnostics
Experience with CI/CD and per-branch test environments for frontend apps
Job Type: Full-time
Work Location: Remote",N/A,https://www.indeed.com/viewjob?jk=03d46d07a01527fd,False,python developer
Python Developer,Belaku Jobs,Remote,remote,2025-06-19,Indeed,"Job Overview
We are seeking a skilled Python Developer to join our dynamic team. The ideal candidate will have expertise in Python and a passion for developing innovative software solutions. This position offers an exciting opportunity to work on diverse projects and contribute to cutting-edge technology developments.
Responsibilities
Develop and maintain Python-based applications
Collaborate with cross-functional teams to define, design, and ship new features
Write efficient, reusable, and reliable code
Integrate user-facing elements with server-side logic
Implement security and data protection measures
Troubleshoot, debug, and upgrade existing systems
Stay updated on emerging technologies
Experience
Proficiency in Python programming
Familiarity with React Express, REST, Java, C, azure, Quantum engineering, VBA, Ruby on Rails
Experience in web development is a plus
Strong problem-solving skills
Ability to work both independently and as part of a team
Excellent communication and collaboration abilities
If you are a talented Python Developer looking to advance your career in a dynamic environment working on cutting-edge technologies, we encourage you to apply.
Job Type: Full-time
Pay: $61.63 - $65.50 per hour
Benefits:
Health insurance
Schedule:
Monday to Friday
Work Location: Remote",N/A,https://www.indeed.com/viewjob?jk=3efdab88c221bbc9,False,python developer
Contract Python Developer,Predictive Strategies Inc,Remote,remote,2025-06-19,Indeed,"Benefits:
Part Time
Contract
Flexible schedule

Position: Contract Python Developer
Hours: 5-10 hours per week
Location: Remote (U.S.-based)
Contract Type: Part-Time, Independent Contractor
Rate: $100$150 per hour (based on experience and expertise)

Job Overview

We are seeking an experienced Python Developer with expertise in Model Context Protocol (MCP), SQL Cursors, and database optimization to support a specialized project. This contract role is ideal for a developer with strong protocol design, database management, and data pipeline development experience. The candidate should be comfortable working independently with minimal supervision and collaborating on technical requirements as needed.

Key Responsibilities

Develop and optimize Python-based scripts and applications for Model Context Protocol (MCP)-driven processes.
Utilize SQL cursors for efficient data manipulation and performance tuning in relational databases.
Design, implement, and optimize data pipelines and integrations with existing systems.
Conduct data modeling and transformations to support analytics and reporting.
Troubleshoot and optimize database performance, ensuring efficiency in query execution.
Work collaboratively with internal teams to implement protocol enhancements and ensure seamless data processing.
Required Qualifications

Proficiency in Python with experience in protocol development and API integrations.
Strong knowledge of SQL Cursors, stored procedures, and database optimization techniques.
Familiarity with Model Context Protocol (MCP) or other custom protocol design frameworks.
Experience working with relational databases such as PostgreSQL, MySQL, or SQL Server.
Understanding of data structures, indexing, and query performance tuning.
Ability to work independently and manage deliverables in a contract-based role.
Preferred Qualifications

Experience with cloud-based data processing (AWS, Azure, or GCP).
Background in network protocols, IoT, or cybersecurity related to MCP.
Prior experience in contract or freelance work managing short-term projects.
Required Education

Bachelor’s Degree (or higher) in Computer Science, Data Science, Engineering, or a related field.
Equivalent experience (5+ years) in Python development, data engineering, or protocol design may be considered in place of a formal degree.

This is a remote position.",N/A,https://www.indeed.com/viewjob?jk=149458b7ebc732d1,False,python developer
Junior Software Engineer,Corporate Tools,"Remote in Spokane, WA",remote,2025-06-19,Indeed,"Overview:
Corporate Tools is hiring a Junior Software Engineer for $75,000/year. You will be a traditional company employee. This is a full time 40 hour/week position with company benefits in Spokane, Washington.
Corporate Tools is always hiring great Software Engineers. We primarily code in Ruby, Javascript and use Rails and Vue. We classify this position as an entry level position within our Software Department.
Our Junior Software Developer job is a path towards becoming an integral part of our software team. This position is geared towards developers with limited experience or a recent college graduate. Through working with our team of developers, this position will put you on the path towards gaining more skills and experience to help you advance within our company.
Junior Software Engineer Jobs:
Our Junior Software Engineers spend their first year integrating and hopefully advance to becoming Software Engineers within our company. We offer a guaranteed 6 month assessment with an opportunity for a wage increase based on your proficiency in some key skills. We’ll work with you and bring you along to become a vital part of our group. This is our entry level software developer position and a great way to get started with our company. We’re looking for great people who want to do great work. We understand you might suck at writing resumes or pitching yourself, or most your code might be private. Try your best to explain to us what you can do so we can hopefully find you! If you’re a good person, like learning and improving, and want to grow your skills, we want to find you.
How to Apply:
Please apply through the link below. It’s a coding job, so showing us some code would be helpful. Preferably a flavor of Ruby or Javascript, but anything for now will do.

Wage:
$75,000 a year
Benefits:
100% employer-paid medical, dental and vision for employees
Annual review with raise option
22 days Paid Time Off accrued annually, and 4 holidays
After 3 years, PTO increases to 29 days. Employees transition to flexible time off after 5 years with the company—not accrued, not capped, take time off when you want
The 4 holidays are: New Year’s Day, Fourth of July, Thanksgiving, and Christmas Day
Paid Maternity and Paternity Leave
Up to 5% company matching 401(k) with no vesting period
Quarterly allowance
Use to make your remote work set up more comfortable, for continuing education classes, a plant for your desk, coffee for your coworker, a massage for yourself... really, whatever
Open concept office with friendly coworkers
Creative environment where you can make a difference
No dumb benefits like free dog walking on the weekends that snobby hipster places have to make you feel cool, but mathematically won't cost the company much money because you won't use it
Trail Mix Bar
- oh yeah
Responsibilities:
Develop Software
Have a Growth Mindset, not a Fixed Mindset
Learn how to become proficient in Ruby, Rails, and Vue
Requirements:
BS in Computer Science or at least 2 years of related experience
At least 1 year of relevant professional experience
Experience with current software development languages such as Ruby, Python, Java, or Rust, etc.
Experience with front-end web development languages such as HTML, CSS and Javascript
Experience with current web application frameworks such as Django, Laravel, or Ruby on Rails (preferred but not required)
You’re easy-going and willing to learn on the job while also getting stuff done
Able to work in an agile environment with a focus on continuous integration
Junior Software Engineer
Spokane, WA",N/A,https://www.indeed.com/viewjob?jk=a7b123b7b7425908,False,vue developer
Frontend Software Engineer,Kleer and Membersy,Remote,remote,2025-06-19,Indeed,"As a Frontend Software Engineer, you'll play a vital role in designing and developing front-end features that delight our customers and members, always adhering to the coding conventions and practices defined by our team. You'll collaborate closely with other software engineers to ensure all code meets our security, testing, and maintainability standards. This position reports directly to the VP of Engineering.
This role offers a base salary of $115,000 and company equity.
The Day-to-Day
You'll work closely with the Engineering team to help design high-quality code that scales with our growing user base. Your responsibilities will include:
Work collaboratively within an Agile environment to help architect well-engineered, scalable solutions that meet the needs of our healthcare partners and users.
Partner with the Product Management team to review and estimate projects, refine work, and contribute to developing robust technical solutions.
Collaborate with the team to ensure all code properly adheres to coding best practices, security, testing, and maintainability.
Contribute to an environment that promotes continuous improvement through inspection and adaptation in both processes and technologies.
Stay plugged into emerging technologies and industry trends to foster both your own growth and the team's development.
Be open to and actively participate in a mentee role, learning from senior engineers to enhance your skills and understanding.
To Be Successful
Do these things sound like you? Yes? Good — you're well on your way to being a successful Software Engineer with us!
Starting with the obvious: you are PASSIONATE! (Seriously, you must LOVE what you do!)
You have 4+ years' experience in a software engineering role.
You're comfortable using software design patterns and object-oriented design principles.
You have strong foundational knowledge of software architecture.
You possess required experience with Vue.js and Nuxt.
Experience with Tailwind CSS and TypeScript is strongly recommended.
You demonstrate an understanding of security best practices.
You've written code for highly scalable web-based applications.
You have experience with Agile and Scrum practices and tools.
You possess excellent written and verbal communication skills.
And you have a bachelor's degree in anything. We mean it! Business, History, Cooking (actually, that could be incredibly useful)... anything.

To Thrive
We're an entrepreneurial, creative, and passionate group — and if these things sound like you, you won't just fit in. You'll thrive with us.
You're a self-starter with the ability to ""figure it out"" but aren't afraid to ask questions.
You are highly motivated and driven to continuously improve and deliver high-quality work.
You demonstrate a positive attitude and bring enthusiasm to your daily tasks and interactions.
You're excellent at collaboration and teamwork, recognizing the value of shared success and open communication.
You are comfortable in a mentee role, eager to learn from senior engineers and grow your expertise.
Experience with React and React Native are nice to have.
Experience using Docker.
CI/CD pipeline experience.
Experience with NoSQL (Redis preferred).
No stranger to playing hard and working harder while treating others with respect and dignity.

Our Advantage
If you're asking yourself ""what are the perks of working with us?"" Don't worry. We've got you covered.
We are a Best Places to Work recipient—because we understand the meaning of work hard, play hard!
You'll get some skin in the game with employee equity.
We stand behind and celebrate our core values.
There's transparent communication from the top down.
You'll have a collaborative, smart, and forward-thinking team to share ideas with.
You'll have a direct, meaningful impact as we scale.
You'll experience a culture filled with opportunities to connect in-person and virtually.
We have a casual dress code.
We offer hybrid and remote work schedules.
And we've got you covered in all the most important benefits: health, 401k match, wellness, disability, employee discounts, time away—and more!

Our Commitment to You

Be yourself. Always.
We want you to apply even if you do not meet every requirement. We are committed to building an inclusive, varied culture that welcomes, promotes, supports, and celebrates the diverse backgrounds of our employees. It is what drives innovation, ignites creativity, and ultimately gives us a competitive advantage.
We want you to be you — because how boring would life be if we were all the same?

About Us
Create Membership Plans that Patients and Providers Love
As everyone knows, dental health is critical to overall health. Unfortunately, dental insurance is too complicated, too confusing, and too expensive for dentists and patients alike. As a result, 40% of US consumers do not have dental coverage, 50% of US consumers do not visit a dentist each year, and dentists continue to struggle with practice success while managing complicated insurance plans with low reimbursement fees, coverage limits and claims denials.

Company Overview
Our mission is to make professional oral care accessible to everyone with a membership model that patients and providers love.
We are doing something about this. We connect dentists directly with patients to eliminate the inefficiency, cost, and hassle of workarounds. Using our cloud-based platform, dentists easily design, implement, and grow a successful membership plan with their own dental care plans, offering them directly to patients. The result is affordable, comprehensive dental coverage that works for dental practices and enables patients to get the professional oral care they need.
As the established leaders in the dental membership space, Kleer and Membersy support a combined footprint of over 20,000 dentists and millions of patients across all 50 states, and cover the entire spectrum of dental practices, from independent solo practices to the largest DSOs in the country.
Kleer and Membersy came together in 2024 to provide an unmatched dental membership solution and experience. Leveraging their complementary strengths, industry expertise, and scale, Kleer and Membersy will create significant value for DSOs, independent dental practices, and their patients by expanding access to care for all uninsured and underinsured Americans, including more than 76 million adults without dental insurance.
Equal Opportunity Employer
We are an Equal Opportunity Employer that does not discriminate on the basis of actual or perceived race, color, creed, religion, national origin, ancestry, citizenship status, age, sex or gender (including pregnancy, childbirth and pregnancy-related conditions), gender identity or expression (including transgender status), sexual orientation, marital status, military service and veteran status, physical or mental disability, genetic information, or any other characteristic protected by applicable federal, state or local laws and ordinances.

Abilities required
These physical demands are representative of the physical requirements necessary for an employee to successfully perform the essential functions of the job. Reasonable accommodation can be provided to enable people with disabilities to perform the described essential functions of the job.
While performing the responsibilities of the job, the employee is required to talk and listen. The employee is often required to sit and use their hands and fingers, to handle or feel. The employee is occasionally required to stand, walk, and reach with arms and hands. Vision abilities required by this job include close vision, including intensive computer usage.",N/A,https://www.indeed.com/viewjob?jk=510613a971882e6c,False,vue developer
Full Stack Developer,Ryzen Solutions,Remote,remote,2025-06-19,Indeed,"Job Overview
We are seeking a skilled Full Stack Developer to join our dynamic team. In this role, you will be responsible for designing, developing, and maintaining both the front-end and back-end components of our web applications. The ideal candidate will have a strong understanding of software development principles and a passion for creating efficient and scalable solutions. You will work closely with cross-functional teams in an Agile environment to deliver high-quality software that meets our clients' needs.
Responsibilities
Develop and maintain web applications using modern frameworks and technologies.
Collaborate with UX/UI designers to implement user-friendly interfaces.
Write clean, maintainable, and efficient code for both front-end and back-end systems.
Conduct code reviews to ensure best practices and high-quality standards are met.
Troubleshoot and debug applications to optimize performance.
Participate in Agile ceremonies such as sprint planning, daily stand-ups, and retrospectives.
Integrate data storage solutions such as MySQL into applications.
Work with RESTful APIs to connect front-end components with back-end services.
Stay updated with emerging technologies and industry trends to continuously improve development processes.
Skills
Proficiency in software development methodologies, particularly Agile.
Strong knowledge of programming languages including PHP Node.JS Framework Vue.js, angular, React.js
Experience with MySQL database management and query optimization.
Familiarity with RESTful service architecture for seamless application integration.
Understanding of Quantum engineering principles is a plus but not required.
Ability to work collaboratively in a team-oriented environment while managing individual tasks effectively.
Strong problem-solving skills and attention to detail.
Job Type: Contract
Pay: $50.00 - $70.00 per hour
Benefits:
401(k)
Dental insurance
Health insurance
Vision insurance
Schedule:
Monday to Friday
Work Location: Remote",N/A,https://www.indeed.com/viewjob?jk=6d69fcc67f376a9e,False,vue developer
Front-End Web Developer,Corporate Tools,"Remote in Austin, TX",remote,2025-06-19,Indeed,"Overview:
Corporate Tools is hiring a Front-End Web Developer to help build, optimize, and maintain our web applications. This role is a full-time, remote position. We are looking for someone with strong Front-End Development expertise, the ability to drive UI/UX execution, and a commitment to delivering high-quality, user-focused applications. You will contribute to our core codebase, documentation, and Front-End architecture, ensuring usability, accessibility, and performance.
You’ll need to be able to operate in a WordPress-heavy environment. This will include PHP, SCSS, JS, maybe a little Vue (but we are okay with React too), as well as some other front-end frameworks. The ideal candidate won’t be afraid to jump in and figure things out.. while being guided by a great team of developers when you get stuck. You’ll be the type that hates the standard themes that come from a site-builder tool and instead like crafting your own themes from scratch. If this sounds like your cup of Joe (or Mike) then we want to speak with you!
Wage:
$90,000-$95,000/Year DOE
Benefits:
100% employer-paid medical, dental and vision for employees
Annual review with raise option
22 days Paid Time Off accrued annually, and 4 holidays
After 3 years, PTO increases to 29 days. Employees transition to flexible time off after 5 years with the company—not accrued, not capped, take time off when you want
The 4 holidays are: New Year’s Day, Fourth of July, Thanksgiving, and Christmas Day
Paid Maternity and Paternity Leave
Up to 5% company matching 401(k) with no vesting period
Quarterly allowance
Use to make your remote work set up more comfortable, for continuing education classes, a plant for your desk, coffee for your coworker, a massage for yourself... really, whatever
Open concept office with friendly coworkers
Creative environment where you can make a difference
No dumb benefits like free dog walking on the weekends that snobby hipster places have to make you feel cool, but mathematically won't cost the company much money because you won't use it
Trail Mix Bar
- oh yeah
Responsibilities:
Develop, launch, and maintain websites of varying sizes, ensuring scalability, performance, and usability.
Ability to drive UI/UX planning and execution, making design decisions when guidance is limited.
Adhere to high Frontend development standards, prioritizing accessibility, responsiveness, and maintainability.
Troubleshoot technical issues and bugs, ensuring smooth and efficient site performance.
Contribute to documentation and core codebase, improving internal processes and best practices.
Collaborate with developers, designers, and technical writers to produce high-quality web products.
Maintain clear and open communication, supporting company goals and fostering a collaborative team culture.
Requirements:
At least 2-3 years of experience in a professional, web development environment.
Strong Front-End development experience with WordPress (PHP), JavaScript, HTML/SCSS, and Git.
Experience with Vue or React.
Ability to lead UI/UX execution without direct guidance from design teams.
Experience with scalable Frontend architecture and performance optimization.
Familiarity with Confluence and Jira for documentation and project tracking.
Strong problem-solving, communication, and teamwork skills.
High level of integrity, professionalism, and accountability.
Front-End Web Developer
Remote | Spokane | Austin | SLC",N/A,https://www.indeed.com/viewjob?jk=c5763fa6fd1e3566,False,vue developer
.Net Full Stack Developer,I20 Technologies,Remote,remote,2025-06-19,Indeed,"We’re looking for a skilled .Net Full Stack Developer with strong problem-solving abilities, solid technical experience, and a passion for improving systems within the healthcare and insurance domain.
Key Responsibilities:
Analyze complex systems and business processes
Design and implement scalable solutions
Collaborate across IT teams to drive results
Communicate effectively with technical and non-technical stakeholders
Required Skills:
General:
Strong analytical and systems thinking
Solution design expertise
Curiosity and engagement with business needs
Excellent verbal and written communication
Ability to navigate IT teams and processes
Domain Experience:
Healthcare and Insurance industry exposure
Technical Expertise:
Back End:
C# (6–10), ASP.Net Core 6, Entity Framework Core 6
Web API, SQL, OpenXml 2.x
Unit testing frameworks (nUnit, xUnit, MsTest, SpecFlow)
Front End:
JavaScript, TypeScript
Vue.js 2/3 (or similar frameworks)
Job Type: Full-time
Pay: Up to $125,000.00 per year
Schedule:
8 hour shift
Work Location: Remote",N/A,https://www.indeed.com/viewjob?jk=0e176eabca7efc4e,False,vue developer
Senior Cybersecurity Architect/Lead: Ransomware Resilience,Fortuna BMC,"Remote in Dallas, TX",remote,2025-06-19,Indeed,"We are seeking a highly experienced and credentialed Senior Cybersecurity Architect & Program Lead to drive implementation of a Zero Trust architecture and the development of a Ransomware Response and Mitigation Policy. This role requires deep, hands-on technical expertise, strategic program leadership, and utility-sector experience to safeguard complex IT, OT, and hybrid environments. This role will serve as a key advisor to executive leadership and ensure alignment with leading cybersecurity frameworks, regulatory mandates, and mission-critical operational goals.
**This role fills a need by a department within the City of Los Angeles. This 5-year contract will be awarded late summer, with a mid-Q4 estimated start date.
Work Schedule: Full time, standard business hours, Pacific Time Zone
WORKSITE: Remote or Hybrid available (Los Angeles, CA)
PAY RATE: $90/hour
WHAT WE OFFER:
Paid sick leave based on state regulations after 90 days of employment
Medical, dental, and vision are offered after a waiting period (60% paid by Fortuna)
Free TeleMedicine and Mental Health for all employees and their families
Additional volunteer options such as Group Life Insurance, Accidental Insurance, Critical Care, Short Term Disability
WHAT YOU'LL DO:
Architect and lead enterprise-wide Zero Trust implementation, including identity-based access control, micro-segmentation, and real-time security monitoring across IT and OT systems.
Design and implement a comprehensive ransomware mitigation and incident response policy, aligned with NIST and CISA frameworks, addressing prevention, detection, containment, and recovery.
Conduct enterprise cyber posture, program, and vulnerability assessments and translate findings into actionable roadmaps, policies, and executive briefings.
Lead and execute penetration testing, forensic analysis, and remediation activities for critical infrastructure environments.
Provide hands-on leadership in risk management, compliance documentation, and stakeholder engagement including training, mentoring, and technical workshops.
Generate detailed deliverables including security roadmaps, strategic plans, project charters, incident reports, training documentation, and monthly status summaries per LADWP guidelines.
Act as the primary point of contact with executive stakeholders, manage risks, issues, and change initiatives throughout the engagement lifecycle.
WHAT YOU'LL BRING:
Minimum of 8 years of experience in cybersecurity architecture, vulnerability management, incident response, and program leadership, particularly within the utility industry and public sector.
Advanced degree(s) (e.g., MS in Cybersecurity, Information Assurance, or related discipline); multiple degrees or postgraduate certifications highly desirable.
Relevant and current cybersecurity certifications required, aligned with core technologies (examples: CISSP, CISM, GIAC, OSCP, CEH, GICSP, GCFA, GCIA, Azure/AWS security certifications).
Demonstrated expertise with technologies and frameworks commonly used in utility and SCADA environments (e.g., NIST CSF, ISO 27001, SIEM, IAM, firewalls, network segmentation, AD, endpoint detection, OT/ICS protocols).
Strong leadership, communication, and documentation skills, with the ability to interface effectively with executive management, legal/compliance, and technical teams.
Proven ability to produce high-quality strategic deliverables under strict deadlines and in compliance with public sector reporting and procurement standards.
Fortuna operates as a staffing agency that sources screens and presents potential candidates for employment opportunities on behalf of our clients.
Fortuna was founded in 2012 by practicing professionals with more than 50 combined years of experience. Our headquarters is in McClellan, California with offices in Los Angeles and New York, and satellite offices in the Philippines and Israel. Fortuna is an active member of multiple California service agreements, including the CMAS, ITMSA (Tier 2), and CalPERS SpringFed Pool, as well as multiple municipalities and large corporation vendor pools
Career Site: www.gofortuna.com.",N/A,https://www.indeed.com/viewjob?jk=2654aeeb2f06d27f,False,technical lead
Technical Lead,Oddball,Remote,remote,2025-06-19,Indeed,"Oddball believes that the best products are built when companies understand and value the things they are working on. We value learning and growth and the ability to make a big impact at a small company. We believe that we can make big changes happen and improve the daily lives of millions of people by bringing quality software to the federal space.
We are hiring a Technical Lead to work on a pivotal Federal program that is making a positive impact on millions of Americans' daily lives.
What you'll be doing:
Oddball is hiring an experienced Technical Lead to lead, shape, and grow one of our largest engineering teams. In this role, the Technical Lead will lead a multidisciplinary team of engineers, designers, product managers, and others to drive and deliver high-quality products to our federal partners. This Technical Lead will manage, mentor, guide, and mold our team drawing on their experience delivering and creating quality products.
What you’ll bring:
5+ years' experience in software development/web application development
2+ years' experience leading multi-disciplinary teams of designers and developers
Experience utilizing Microsoft Dynamics 365 CRM
Strong experience with Python
Ability to successfully breakdown technical items in discussions with the business user
Strong verbal and written communication skills directed at both technical and non-technical audiences
Capable of taking direction from senior leadership and translating into concrete next steps and actions
Comfortable handling multiple ongoing engagements and parallel work streams
Requirements:
Must be a US Citizen and able to work domestically
Must be able to attain low-level security clearance
Education:
Bachelor’s degree
Benefits:
Fully remote
Annual stipend
Comprehensive Benefits Package
Company Match 401(k) plan
Flexible PTO, Paid Holidays
Equal Opportunity Employer/Protected Veterans/Individuals with Disabilities:
Oddball is an Equal Opportunity Employer and does not discriminate against applicants based on race, religion, color, disability, medical condition, legally protected genetic information, national origin, gender, sexual orientation, marital status, gender identity or expression, sex (including pregnancy, childbirth or related medical conditions), age, veteran status or other legally protected characteristics. Any applicant with a mental or physical disability who requires an accommodation during the application process should contact an Oddball HR representative to request such an accommodation by emailing hr@Oddball.io
The contractor will not discharge or in any other manner discriminate against employees or applicants because they have inquired about, discussed, or disclosed their own pay or the pay of another employee or applicant. However, employees who have access to the compensation information of other employees or applicants as a part of their essential job functions cannot disclose the pay of other employees or applicants to individuals who do not otherwise have access to compensation information, unless the disclosure is (a) in response to a formal complaint or charge, (b) in furtherance of an investigation, proceeding, hearing, or action, including an investigation conducted by the employer, or (c) consistent with the contractor’s legal duty to furnish information. 41 CFR 60-1.35(c)
Compensation:
At Oddball, it’s important each employee is compensated competitively and fairly. In alignment with state legal requirements. A range for the included position is listed below. Be advised, actual offer details are determined by job category, job location, and candidate skill level.
United States Wage Range: $110,000 – $160,000
Job Type: Full-time
Pay: $120,000.00 - $160,000.00 per year
Benefits:
401(k)
401(k) matching
Dental insurance
Flexible schedule
Flexible spending account
Health insurance
Health savings account
Life insurance
Paid time off
Parental leave
Professional development assistance
Referral program
Retirement plan
Vision insurance
Schedule:
Monday to Friday
Work Location: Remote",N/A,https://www.indeed.com/viewjob?jk=2c682e9d5566f0cc,False,technical lead
IT Project Manager and Technical Lead - 100% Remote,"BooksTime, Inc.",Remote,remote,2025-06-19,Indeed,"This is a remote position.
Do you love:

Figuring out tricky problems?
Finding ways to improve processes?
Endless learning opportunities?
If so, this is the opportunity for you!

BooksTime is looking for a creative, resourceful IT and Security Specialist to join our growing team.

This role offers:

Flexible hours
100% remote work
Friendly & supportive colleagues
Significant opportunities for advancement
This position could be a great fit for a highly ambitious individual early in their career.




Who We Are:

BooksTime is an ambitious, innovative accounting & bookkeeping startup with teams in 5 countries. BooksTime was founded in 2016 and we've been continually growing since. For more information, check out our website: bookstime.com.



Why Join BooksTime?

Make history. Our startup is still fairly small, but we have big plans to disrupt the accounting industry. This is a great opportunity to get in early at a startup that, we believe, is on its way to becoming an industry leader.
Do work that matters. The projects you will be working on will be critical to the success of the company, our mission to modernize the accounting industry, the daily work of your colleagues and the hundreds of small businesses we serve.
Grow with the company. As our company continues to grow, there will be many opportunities to take on new responsibilities and grow professionally.
Professional development. You'll get access to various cybersecurity certification courses as part of this role.
Constant Improvement. One of our core values at BooksTime is Constant Improvement. We are always pushing to do better, from thinking of new ways to ""wow"" our clients to discovering opportunities to make internal processes more efficient. Our goal is to become the #1 bookkeeping firm in the country - and our relentless focus on Constant Improvement is what will get us there. Every member of our team plays a role, and you will have an especially big role to play in this position. We can't wait to hear your ideas about how we can do better. If you're looking for a role that gives you ample opportunity to make a big impact - you've found it!




What You'll Do:

As BooksTime has grown, so have our IT needs. Therefore, we’re looking to expand our IT department, which currently includes 3 full-time staff.

The role includes 3 main functions:

(A) Support & Routine Operations, i.e. responding to helpdesk support tickets from other employees, managing staff access and accounts in company systems when team members are onboarded or offboarded, and more. Our staff use over 20 different apps and systems and require a wide range of support.

(B) Technical Project Management, i.e. working on initiatives to improve our IT systems. This includes automation projects, internal software development, efforts to improve efficiency and cost-effectiveness, and finding ways to increase the user-friendliness of our internal systems.

(C) Security Assurance, i.e. enhancing security measures to protect our company, staff and clients, monitoring for threats and leading responses to them, staying abreast of the latest in cybersecurity technology, improving policies & procedures, providing training to our staff, and more.

The exact scope of the role will be shaped around the strengths of the person we hire. You might focus on one of the 3 functions above more than the others, depending on where you have the most experience.


Supervisory Role:

This role is suitable for an early-career candidate. However, more experienced candidates would be eligible for a more advanced version of this role, which would involve supervising other IT staff and leading larger, more complex initiatives.

Whether you’re in the supervisory role or not, we really value your ideas and input on everything that we do.






Benefits
Salary Range: Highly dependent on knowledge level, education and location.

For less experienced candidates, the range is approx. $20 to $30 per hour.
For more experienced candidates, especially those that would join in a supervisory role, higher amounts may be discussed.
Additional bonuses are possible based on performance.

Benefits Include:

Flexible schedule;
Work from home (we are big believers in remote work!);
Health insurance reimbursement plan (a QSEHRA plan);
Professional development assistance;
Simple IRA with employer matching after 2 years;
Flexible Paid Time Off (PTO) starting at 20 days for full-time employees.





Other Details:

Time Zones - IMPORTANT: You will need availability each weekday around 9-11am Eastern Time. The rest of your schedule can be more flexible.

Full-Time/Part-Time: We prefer folks who will start part-time and transition to full-time after at least 1 month. However, it may be possible to start full-time from the beginning.


Keywords: IT, Information Technology, Technical Support, Helpdesk, Troubleshooting, InfoSec, Information Security, Cyber, Cybersecurity, Cyber Security, IT Project Manager, Tech Lead, Support, Security Clearance.",N/A,https://www.indeed.com/viewjob?jk=a41bf56cbd7fceaf,False,technical lead
Technical Lead,"Amyx, Inc.","Remote in Washington, DC 20001",remote,2025-06-19,Indeed,"Overview:
Amyx is seeking to hire a Technical Lead to support our Department of Homeland Security, ICE contract in the Washington DC area.
Responsibilities:
A Technical Lead is required with a minimum of eight (8) years of progressive experience in creating engaging learning activities and compelling course content that enhances retention and transfer, visualize instructional graphics, the user interface and the finished product, and developing and delivering technical solutions to end-users.
Qualifications:
A Technical Lead is required with a minimum of eight (8) years of progressive experience in creating engaging learning activities and compelling course content that enhances retention and transfer, visualize instructional graphics, the user interface and the finished product, and developing and delivering technical solutions to end-users.

Current DHS Suitability Clearance and TS

Benefits include:
Medical, Dental, and Vision Plans (PPO & HSA options available)
Flexible Spending Accounts (Health Care & Dependent Care FSA)
Health Savings Account (HSA)
401(k) with matching contributions
Roth
Qualified Transportation Expense with matching contributions
Short Term Disability
Long Term Disability
Life and Accidental Death & Dismemberment
Basic & Voluntary Life Insurance
Wellness Program
PTO
11 Holidays
Professional Development Reimbursement

Please contact talent@amyx.com with any questions!

Amyx is proud to be an Equal Opportunity Employer. All qualified candidates will be considered without regard to race, color, religion, national origin, age, disability, sexual orientation, gender identity, status as a protected veteran, or any other characteristic protected by law. Amyx is a VEVRAA federal contractor and we request priority referral of veterans.

Physical Demands

Employee needs to be able to sit at a workstation for extended periods; use hand(s) to handle or feel objects, tools, or controls; reach with hands and arms; talk and hear. Most positions require ability to work on desktop or laptop computer for extended periods of time reading, reviewing/analyzing information, and providing recommendations, summaries and/or reports in written format. Must be able to effectively communicate with others verbally and in writing. Employee may be required to occasionally lift and/or move moderate amounts of weight, typically less than 20 pounds. Regular and predictable attendance is essential.",N/A,https://www.indeed.com/viewjob?jk=b38dda0bfa239fde,False,technical lead
Technical Lead,"Hallmark Health Care Solutions, Inc",Remote,remote,2025-06-19,Indeed,"About Hallmark Health Care Solutions (HHCS)

At Hallmark Health Care Solutions, the two aspects — what we do and how we do it — are tightly interwoven. In our products and our people alike, we put a relentless focus on truth, trust, transparency, respect and service.
Hallmark Health Care Solutions is led by passionate experts with an average of 20+ years’ experience in IT, nursing, process engineering, finance, and healthcare. We are committed to strengthening communities by producing technologies, support services, and thought leadership that tangibly improve patient care and community health outcomes.
Our Einstein II product team is looking for a Technical Lead who will be responsible for the design, development, and operation of application interfaces, data flows, and APIs, utilizing both vendors delivered services and internal API management tools. You’ll be part of a cross-functional team that’s responsible for the full software development life cycle, from conception to deployment.
The successful candidate will combine analytical ability, technical skills, and project management principles to lead application development and data integration projects. This will include selecting the appropriate integration approach and applying sound technical management and development skills throughout the delivery lifecycle to produce high quality solutions.

Responsibilities:
Design and lead the development of complex service oriented, integration heavy, multi-tenant distributed Saas application.
Deliver the required systems integration solutions for a new and existing business solution and platform change, ensuring continuity and security of the systems, data, and business services.
Help define the integration and dataflow architecture and evaluate vendor web services and API capabilities. Identify gaps in available integration services and work on remediation strategies to ensure stability as the underlying platform technologies continue to evolve
Collaborate with support teams to resolve production incidents and proactively seek opportunities to develop preventative measures to avoid recurrence
Defining an over-arching enterprise architecture which integrates multiple vendor workstreams across a range of target platforms in a manner, to allow the initiation, flow, processing and management of data flows in a secure and reliable manner
Analysis of specific requirements and production of suitable specifications
Derivation and documentation (e.g. data models, configurations, and setup) of effective, highly scalable and class-leading Microsoft based applications, data and system integration solution architectures
Working with other technical and business stakeholder teams to ensure high quality outcomes in the areas of technical fit, resilience, security, compliance and efficiency across relevant solution
Ensuring that the solutions can be delivered, deployed and operated in a highly repeatable and predictable manner through interaction and collaboration with DevOps and environment specialists
Leading, managing and mentoring the team members to produce required designs, implementations and solution outcomes
Write technical documentation

Requirements:
A minimum of 7 years of experience successfully delivering high performing application solutions that meet scope, cost, and date parameters
A minimum of 5 years of experience in software development using .NET Core, C#, Angular, web services, SOAP, JSON, REST, APIs, XML, automated testing frameworks, and orchestration tools
Working experience in Saas multi-tenant product development
Experience with Azure Services is required
Expertise in comparing integration approaches and assessing their relative strengths and limitations in terms of meeting business goals
Experience working with relational and non-relational databases
Analytical and problem-solving skills with a commitment to customer service
Ability to work effectively independently and as part of a team
Flexibility to balance competing initiatives, multi-task between project development and customer support, and adapt to changing business and technical requirements
Experience working in and contributing to a team-oriented, collaborative environment that values positive, collegial relationships among co-workers
Great attention to detail
Organizational skills
Degree in Computer Science, Statistics or relevant field

Salary range: base salary range $145k-160k, annual bonus target 5%
Work Location
Remote in Central or Northeastern New Jersey, Atlanta, Georgia or Dallas, Texas

Benefits:
Health insurance
Dental insurance
Vision insurance
Unlimited paid time off
HSA company contributions
401k

Hallmark Health Care Solutions, Inc is an Equal Opportunity Employer. All employment decisions are based on business needs, job requirements and individual qualifications, without regard to race, color, religion or belief, national, social or ethnic origin, sex, age, physical, mental or sensory disability, sexual orientation, gender identity and/or expression, marital, civil union or domestic partnership status, past or present military service, family medical history or genetic information, family or parental status, or any other status protected by the laws or regulations in the locations where we operate. Hallmark Health Care Solutions reserves the right to amend the job description, duties or qualifications based on company needs.",N/A,https://www.indeed.com/viewjob?jk=f0d38b361684ebbc,False,technical lead
RPA Senior Technical Lead - UI Path,Intone Networks,Remote,remote,2025-06-19,Indeed,"RPA Senior Technical Lead - UI Path Remote Cary, NC",N/A,https://www.indeed.com/viewjob?jk=4b53bf8e0f96d998,False,technical lead
Engineering Manager,"Blue 360 Media, LLC",Remote,remote,2025-06-19,Indeed,"About Blue360 Media
Blue 360 Media is a fast-growing provider of law enforcement manuals and code books through a robust e-commerce platform and mobile application. We combine publishing with modern technology to bring critical resources to officers in the field. Our systems are built on Salesforce, AWS, and a mix of modern front-end and mobile frameworks.
The Opportunity
We’re looking for a pragmatic, hands-on Engineering Manager to take ownership of our software development team and technical architecture. You’ll guide internal developers, manage contractor relationships, and roll up your sleeves to continuously optimize our AWS infrastructure, improve development workflows, and modernize our application stack. This role is ideal for a senior engineer who enjoys mentoring others, improving team practices, and making architectural decisions — without giving up coding entirely.
What You'll Do
Manage and mentor a small (5–6) internal team (API/backend, frontend, mobile, dashboard)
Oversee day-to-day development operations across our web platform, admin dashboard, mobile app, and AWS-based services
Work closely with our Head of Product to translate requirements into sound technical plans
Work closely with our CEO to make resourcing and strategic decisions about the company
Own architectural decision-making and lead pragmatic refactors across systems
Collaborate with contractors, including AWS support partners and legacy system maintainers
Drive improved security practices across the codebase and infrastructure
Improve deployment processes and dev tooling as needed
Write code to set standards and patterns for the team across all systems, and as needed for high-value or high-complexity problems
You Should Have
7+ years of software development experience, including backend and cloud services
2+ years leading or managing developers (can be informal leadership)
Strong knowledge of AWS (especially Lambda, API Gateway, SAM, and IAM)
Familiarity with React and/or React Native in production environments
Familiarity with Salesforce or integrating third-party systems with it
A track record of improving security and reducing tech debt in legacy environments
Clear, empathetic communication and a bias toward practical solutions
Nice to Have
Experience in e-commerce systems or digital publishing
Prior work with law enforcement or government-facing products
Salesforce admin or scripting exposure (even if not deep)
Why Join Us
You’ll have real ownership, the ability to make decisions that matter, and a highly collaborative environment. This is a chance to stabilize and grow a technology platform that serves a mission-driven customer base, while working with a smart, innovative cross-functional team that appreciates practical solutions over buzzwords.
Bonus Opportunities
Blue 360 Media pays annual bonuses based on company performance. These bonuses are not limited, and this role will have direct impact on the company's performance.
Job Type: Full-time
Pay: $130,000.00 - $150,000.00 per year
Benefits:
401(k)
401(k) matching
Dental insurance
Health insurance
Life insurance
Paid time off
Vision insurance
Schedule:
8 hour shift
Day shift
Experience:
Javascript: 5 years (Preferred)
AWS: 3 years (Preferred)
IT management: 2 years (Preferred)
React: 2 years (Preferred)
Work Location: Remote",N/A,https://www.indeed.com/viewjob?jk=dd3e2297b4008e94,False,engineering manager
Software Engineering Manager,Emergent Software,"Remote in Colorado Springs, CO",remote,2025-06-19,Indeed,"** This is an opportunity to lead our team of top-notch software engineers working closely together on interesting projects for our clients. This position is fully remote (indefinitely). **
Emergent Software is seeking a relational, team-focused, and results-driven Software Engineering Manager to lead and support our exceptional software engineering team. We are looking for a candidate who excels in problem-solving, honest communication, and team building. Your primary responsibility will be to align, engage, and develop the team, ensuring the successful delivery of high-quality custom software solutions.
The Software Engineering Manager will lead a team of engineers with the goals of:
Continuously growing in capabilities and learning from each other
Delivering high-quality and high-value custom software applications
Establishing trust and long-term relationships with our clients
Highlights & Benefits of working at Emergent Software
Work closely with other talented engineers and team members. Our vetting process means you can count on your team members to know what they are talking about.
Work from home or work remotely from anywhere you want
Flexible work schedule meaning you can work regular hours or choose weekends and evenings
Work-life balance is essential and highly valued at Emergent Software.
Work on interesting projects solving complex business problems with custom software.
100 hours per year to focus on your professional development. We invest in your growth!
Profit sharing bonus means as we’re successful, you’re successful
Excellent benefits package including medical insurance, dental, vision, 401(k) matching, FSA, disability, life insurance, and paid parental leave
Primary Duties
Cultivate a culture of technical and leadership growth, knowledge sharing, high-quality standards, and strong client relationships.
Manage HR aspects, including 1:1s, consistent feedback, performance reviews, goal setting, benefits management, and conflict resolution.
Allocate team members to projects, maximizing skill alignment, growth goals, and productivity.
Build and foster cohesive project teams, promoting peer mentorship and collaboration.
Function as an escalation point to resolve project issues and unblock work.
Actively participate in the sales process by engaging with prospective clients through direct meetings and/or by providing guidance and coaching during team-led sales calls.
Balance your team's priorities between client work, personal growth, and internal initiatives.
Collaborate with recruiters and potential candidates to create job openings and evaluate candidates.
Serve as a product owner for internal tools built and maintained by your team.
Communicate company values, news, and initiatives effectively.
Relay developers' feedback and concerns to executive leadership.
Required Qualifications
Proven experience leading a team of developers in roles such as scrum master, project manager, product owner, technical lead, manager, or equivalent.
Demonstrated expertise in team building, coaching, and performance management.
Excellent problem-solving, decision-making, and organizational skills.
Strong knowledge of software development methodologies and best practices.
A high-level understanding of Emergent Software's Development Stack (C#, .NET, SQL Server, Azure, React, JavaScript, HTML, CSS).
Exceptional communication and interpersonal skills, with a proven record of building strong relationships.
Confidence in leading meetings and speaking in front of virtual groups.
Nice to Have Experience
Experience writing code as a professional software engineer
Experience in technology consulting or building custom applications for external clients
Our Vetting Process
At Emergent Software, we work hard to find the best software engineers capable of developing high quality software for our clients. If you think you’re one of those, please understand that the effort put into this by people like yourself helps us be successful in surrounding you with other top-notch engineers. Here are the steps of our vetting process for this position:
Application (5 minutes)
Online Assessment (40-50 minutes)
Initial Phone Interview (30-45 minutes)
Technology Knowledge Assessment Interview (30-40 minutes)
Leadership Interview (60-90 minutes)
Job Offer!
Benefits Package Details
Medical Insurance: up to 80% of your monthly medical premium (HSA options available)
HSA Contribution: up to $144/month
Dental & Vision Insurance: up to 50% of your monthly dental and vision premium costs
401(k) plan: company match up to 4% of salary
Profit sharing bonus: up to 20% of salary paid annually
Employee referral & customer referral bonuses
Flex Spending Account (FSA) for Dependent Care & Healthcare Costs
Dependent Care FSA Contribution: $90/month
Short Term Disability: $500/week for 12 weeks
Long Term Disability: up to $6,000/month
Group term life and AD&D insurance: $50k
PTO, standard holidays, 2 floating holidays
Paid parental leave: 2 weeks
Staff development program: 100 hours/year plus training costs
About Emergent Software
Emergent Software is a fast-growing software development, cloud consulting, and data engineering company serving clients across the country. We are regularly adding to our team of talented software engineers, cloud architects, data engineers, UX designers, technical product owners and more who can help us deliver high quality services for our clients.
We are a remote-first company
Since our inception, we've embraced a remote-friendly culture, promoting work flexibility beyond the norm. When the pandemic struck in 2020, our transition to fully remote work was seamless—just a matter of cleaning out the fridge. Recognizing an opportunity, we adopted a remote-first approach and began hiring talent from anywhere. We continue to offer our signature Minnesota-nice, Midwest-friendly attitude, ensuring everyone feels valued, whether or not they're familiar with the skyway system.
Your career grows with us
Working with talented engineers on interesting projects creates an engaging environment for software development enthusiasts. By working directly with our experienced team, participating in our staff development program, and solving complex problems across a variety of projects, you’ll find numerous opportunities for long-term career growth.
At Emergent Software, your ideas will be heard, you will grow exponentially as a master of your craft, and you will enjoy working other dedicated team members to deliver software solutions for our clients.
Check out what others say
Visit our Glassdoor page to discover how employees enjoy our remote working structure, flexible hours, profit sharing program, and more!
Job Type: Full-time
Pay: $143,892.00 - $176,671.00 per year
Benefits:
401(k)
401(k) 4% Match
401(k) matching
AD&D insurance
Dental insurance
Dependent health insurance coverage
Disability insurance
Flexible schedule
Flexible spending account
Health insurance
Health savings account
Life insurance
Lunch & learns
Paid holidays
Paid parental leave
Paid time off
Parental leave
Partner benefits
Professional development assistance
Retirement plan
Vision insurance
Work from home
Compensation Package:
Bonus opportunities
Overtime pay
Performance bonus
Profit sharing
Quarterly bonus
Schedule:
8 hour shift
Choose your own hours
Monday to Friday
Work Location: Remote",N/A,https://www.indeed.com/viewjob?jk=45e039c25becf87d,False,engineering manager
Software Engineering Manager,Emergent Software,Remote,remote,2025-06-19,Indeed,"** This is an opportunity to lead our team of top-notch software engineers working closely together on interesting projects for our clients. This position is fully remote (indefinitely). **
Emergent Software is seeking a relational, team-focused, and results-driven Software Engineering Manager to lead and support our exceptional software engineering team. We are looking for a candidate who excels in problem-solving, honest communication, and team building. Your primary responsibility will be to align, engage, and develop the team, ensuring the successful delivery of high-quality custom software solutions.
The Software Engineering Manager will lead a team of engineers with the goals of:
Continuously growing in capabilities and learning from each other
Delivering high-quality and high-value custom software applications
Establishing trust and long-term relationships with our clients
Highlights & Benefits of working at Emergent Software
Work closely with other talented engineers and team members. Our vetting process means you can count on your team members to know what they are talking about.
Work from home or work remotely from anywhere you want
Flexible work schedule meaning you can work regular hours or choose weekends and evenings
Work-life balance is essential and highly valued at Emergent Software.
Work on interesting projects solving complex business problems with custom software.
100 hours per year to focus on your professional development. We invest in your growth!
Profit sharing bonus means as we’re successful, you’re successful
Excellent benefits package including medical insurance, dental, vision, 401(k) matching, FSA, disability, life insurance, and paid parental leave
Primary Duties
Cultivate a culture of technical and leadership growth, knowledge sharing, high-quality standards, and strong client relationships.
Manage HR aspects, including 1:1s, consistent feedback, performance reviews, goal setting, benefits management, and conflict resolution.
Allocate team members to projects, maximizing skill alignment, growth goals, and productivity.
Build and foster cohesive project teams, promoting peer mentorship and collaboration.
Function as an escalation point to resolve project issues and unblock work.
Actively participate in the sales process by engaging with prospective clients through direct meetings and/or by providing guidance and coaching during team-led sales calls.
Balance your team's priorities between client work, personal growth, and internal initiatives.
Collaborate with recruiters and potential candidates to create job openings and evaluate candidates.
Serve as a product owner for internal tools built and maintained by your team.
Communicate company values, news, and initiatives effectively.
Relay developers' feedback and concerns to executive leadership.
Required Qualifications
Proven experience leading a team of developers in roles such as scrum master, project manager, product owner, technical lead, manager, or equivalent.
Demonstrated expertise in team building, coaching, and performance management.
Excellent problem-solving, decision-making, and organizational skills.
Strong knowledge of software development methodologies and best practices.
A high-level understanding of Emergent Software's Development Stack (C#, .NET, SQL Server, Azure, React, JavaScript, HTML, CSS).
Exceptional communication and interpersonal skills, with a proven record of building strong relationships.
Confidence in leading meetings and speaking in front of virtual groups.
Nice to Have Experience
Experience writing code as a professional software engineer
Experience in technology consulting or building custom applications for external clients
Our Vetting Process
At Emergent Software, we work hard to find the best software engineers capable of developing high quality software for our clients. If you think you’re one of those, please understand that the effort put into this by people like yourself helps us be successful in surrounding you with other top-notch engineers. Here are the steps of our vetting process for this position:
Application (5 minutes)
Online Assessment (40-50 minutes)
Initial Phone Interview (30-45 minutes)
Technology Knowledge Assessment Interview (30-40 minutes)
Leadership Interview (60-90 minutes)
Job Offer!
Benefits Package Details
Medical Insurance: up to 80% of your monthly medical premium (HSA options available)
HSA Contribution: up to $144/month
Dental & Vision Insurance: up to 50% of your monthly dental and vision premium costs
401(k) plan: company match up to 4% of salary
Profit sharing bonus: up to 20% of salary paid annually
Employee referral & customer referral bonuses
Flex Spending Account (FSA) for Dependent Care & Healthcare Costs
Dependent Care FSA Contribution: $90/month
Short Term Disability: $500/week for 12 weeks
Long Term Disability: up to $6,000/month
Group term life and AD&D insurance: $50k
PTO, standard holidays, 2 floating holidays
Paid parental leave: 2 weeks
Staff development program: 100 hours/year plus training costs
About Emergent Software
Emergent Software is a fast-growing software development, cloud consulting, and data engineering company serving clients across the country. We are regularly adding to our team of talented software engineers, cloud architects, data engineers, UX designers, technical product owners and more who can help us deliver high quality services for our clients.
We are a remote-first company
Since our inception, we've embraced a remote-friendly culture, promoting work flexibility beyond the norm. When the pandemic struck in 2020, our transition to fully remote work was seamless—just a matter of cleaning out the fridge. Recognizing an opportunity, we adopted a remote-first approach and began hiring talent from anywhere. We continue to offer our signature Minnesota-nice, Midwest-friendly attitude, ensuring everyone feels valued, whether or not they're familiar with the skyway system.
Your career grows with us
Working with talented engineers on interesting projects creates an engaging environment for software development enthusiasts. By working directly with our experienced team, participating in our staff development program, and solving complex problems across a variety of projects, you’ll find numerous opportunities for long-term career growth.
At Emergent Software, your ideas will be heard, you will grow exponentially as a master of your craft, and you will enjoy working other dedicated team members to deliver software solutions for our clients.
Check out what others say
Visit our Glassdoor page to discover how employees enjoy our remote working structure, flexible hours, profit sharing program, and more!
Job Type: Full-time
Pay: $143,892.00 - $176,671.00 per year
Benefits:
401(k)
401(k) 4% Match
401(k) matching
AD&D insurance
Dental insurance
Dependent health insurance coverage
Disability insurance
Flexible schedule
Flexible spending account
Health insurance
Health savings account
Life insurance
Lunch & learns
Paid holidays
Paid parental leave
Paid time off
Parental leave
Partner benefits
Professional development assistance
Retirement plan
Vision insurance
Work from home
Compensation Package:
Bonus opportunities
Overtime pay
Performance bonus
Profit sharing
Quarterly bonus
Schedule:
8 hour shift
Choose your own hours
Monday to Friday
Work Location: Remote",N/A,https://www.indeed.com/viewjob?jk=be683208784feeb2,False,engineering manager
"Software Engineering Manager I, Originations",Credit Acceptance,Remote,remote,2025-06-19,Indeed,"Credit Acceptance is proud to be an award-winning company with local and national workplace recognition in multiple categories! Our world-class culture is shaped by dedicated Team Members who share a drive to succeed as professionals and together as a company. A great product, amazing people and our stable financial history have made us one of the largest used car finance companies nationally.
Our Engineering and Analytics Team Members utilize the latest technology to develop, monitor, and maintain complex practices that help optimize our success. Our Team Members value being challenged, are encouraged to express their ideas, and have the flexibility to enjoy work life balance. We build intrinsic value by partnering with all functions of our business to support their success and make strategic business decisions. We focus on professional development and continuous improvement while enjoying a casual work environment and Great Place to Work culture!
Outcomes and Activities:
This position will work from home; occasional planned travel to an assigned Southfield, Michigan office location may be required. However, this position is permitted to work at a Southfield, Michigan office location if requested by the team member
Leads and mentors team members on essential agile and product mindset tenets including early learning, self-organized teams, cross functionality, customer obsession, outcome focused, incremental delivery and test driven.
Participates in work planning processes to ensure the most important work is aligned to the appropriate team, that work is broken down enough that outcomes can be delivered incrementally.
Leads and mentors cross functional team members on building world class products that deliver customer delight and business value
Collaborates with others to design solutions to meet requirements for initiatives involving multiple team applications as well as applications owned by other teams.
Through mentoring and review, takes responsibility for adherence to code, documentation and testing standards.
Develops and tracks delivery metrics while monitoring technical health of the product, informs progress toward delivery goals, and provides support appropriately when needed.
Builds effective teams by ensuring you have the right people and setting clear expectations
Monitors and evaluates team performance and continuously coach and mentor team members
Sets up your team for operational success by having a sound understanding on the system ecosystem, architecture, technologies and system domains and how these are used to achieve business outcomes.
Is an active participant in on-call escalation and incident management
Competencies: The following items detail how you will be successful in this role.
Development: Develops solutions using standards and best practices of the applications language. Writes code that implements the design that is testable, extensible, efficient and maintainable.
Impact Analysis: Understand the rationale behind and how changes impact the enterprise and/or applications and across the technical ecosystem.
Solution Design: Ability to translate high level requirements to create and implement designs that meet the needs of the customer, are technically sound, maintainable and cost effective. Ability to identify missing or ambiguous requirements. Ability to design at both high and low levels of abstraction, understand complex requirements and translate into understandable solutions. Ability to accurately estimate based on requirements.
Technical Domain: Have an understanding of the technical domain, including the application architecture, design and data of the application they support and systems to which it interfaces.

Requirements:
Bachelor’s Degree or equivalent experience.
Minimum of 3 years’ experience leading engineering teams, including some experience with conflict resolution, setting and enforcing performance expectations, mentoring and career guidance
Working experience in technical leadership, capable of providing mentorship, cross-functional project execution, collaborating on and executing technical vision and strategy
Experience with managing, coaching and providing guidance to junior developers and engineers.
5 years of relevant senior level engineering experience
Some experience working with Agile and DevOps practices such as test driven, incremental releases, continuous integration, and deployment pipeline automation.
Experience in microservices design strategies and implementation including migration planning, service granularity, interservice communication, traceability, orchestration, and failure isolation
Experience with Cloud migrations and working in a mixed on-prem / cloud environment (container orchestration, security, serverless)
Preferred Experience:
2 years’ experience of leading initiatives in a Java ecosystem
Track record of identifying opportunities to improve outcomes via new tools and approaches, evaluating and measuring candidate solutions, and successfully advocating for their adoption
Experience applying appropriate levels of transactional and race condition-resilient approaches, including database locking, distributed transactions (XA), SAGA pattern
Ability to describe and design decoupled system transaction models that are resilient to upstream and downstream outages with appropriate recovery models
Experience implementing and operationalizing rules engines
Knowledge and Skills:
Ability to communicate complex technical information (both verbal and written) to all levels, including senior leadership
Ability to solve problems at the source by offering simple, working solutions
Responds promptly and effectively to resolve incidents, tasks, and projects
Demonstrated ability and motivation to teach others
Ability to gain trust of others and builds solid relationships across and vertically throughout the organization
Effectively prioritize and execute tasks in a high-pressure environment
Target Compensation: A competitive base salary range from $128,382 - $188,294. This position is eligible for an annual variable bonus of cash and equity, between 10%-20%.
INDENGMP
#zip
#LI-Remote
Benefits
Excellent benefits package that includes 401(K) match, adoption assistance, parental leave, tuition reimbursement, comprehensive medical/ dental/vision and many nonstandard benefits that make us a Great Place to Work
Our Company Values:
To be successful in this role, Team Members need to be:
Positive by maintaining resiliency and focusing on solutions
Respectful by collaborating and actively listening
Insightful by cultivating innovation, accumulating business and role specific knowledge, demonstrating self-awareness and making quality decisions
Direct by effectively communicating and conveying courage
Earnest by taking accountability, applying feedback and effectively planning and priority setting
To create an environment where people do their best work, we focus on the dimensions of Organizational Health. All leaders must:
Identify the Right People by recognizing top talent
Set Clear Expectations by managing change and directing others
Train team members and focus on developing talent
Performance Manage by ensuring accountability and driving results
Create the Right Environment by establishing trust and managing conflict
Maintain the Right Number of team members needed to build an effective team
Expectations:
Remain compliant with our policies processes and legal guidelines
All other duties as assigned
Attendance as required by department
Advice !
We understand that your career search may look different than others. Our hiring team wants to make sure that this would be a fit not just for us, but for you long term. If you are actively looking or starting to explore new opportunities, send us your application!
P.S .
We have great details around our stats, success, history and more. We’re proud of our culture and are happy to share why – let’s talk!
Required degrees must have been earned at institutions of Higher Education which are accredited by the Council for Higher Education Accreditation or equivalent.
Credit Acceptance is dedicated to providing a safe and inclusive working environment for all. As part of our Culture of Compliance, we are proud to be an Equal Opportunity Employer and value our culturally diverse workforce. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment regardless of the person’s age, race, color, religion, sex, gender, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, veteran or disability status, criminal history, or any other legally protected characteristic.
California Residents: Please click here for the California Consumer Privacy Act (CCPA) notice regarding the personal information Credit Acceptance may collect from you.",N/A,https://www.indeed.com/viewjob?jk=6ce6b3382d4941d8,False,engineering manager
Engineering Manager,Everyday Speech,"Remote in Boston, MA 02110",remote,2025-06-19,Indeed,"Everyday Speech is a no-prep digital curriculum designed to accelerate the acquisition and generalization of social, behavioral, and communication skills for PK-12 learners of diverse ability levels. The MTSS-aligned curriculum combines evidence-based video modeling, interactive web games, and digital and printable worksheets to make it easy for special educators, speech-language pathologists, and other student support services specialists to support every student and every tier. Everyday Speech is trusted by 55,000 educators across 5,000 districts for one-on-one interventions, small groups, and whole-class lessons that engage students and help build resiliency.

Everyday Speech is right for you if:
You care about making a positive impact.
End each day knowing that your work had a direct impact on the well-being of millions of students across the world. Project success means more than just shipping features - it means improving the lives of students and educators.
You value being a part of a company that takes care of its team.
Not only do we have extremely happy team members, we also have incredible perks. Participate in our health/wellness and retirement benefit offerings, and between having every other Friday off (3-day weekends!) and our flexible PTO plan, that elusive work-life balance is an actual thing here.
You want to work for a true, remote-only company.
We’ve never had an office and never will. Our team is spread across 9 countries and 4 continents. We take remote work seriously and know how to support a distributed team. We give you the flexibility to work in a way that’s best for you, but still have high standards and accountability.
You want to join a startup that is growing rapidly *and* sustainably.
We have launched new products, maintained NPS scores of 70+, maintained eNPS (internal, employee score) of 90+, rapidly grown our team, and exponentially increased our user base, all over the last few years. Yet, as a fully bootstrapped company, our growth is organic and sustainable. Our focus is delivering value to students and educators, not paying back investors.

As a key member of our Engineering Department, the Engineering Manager will support and grow a high-performing group of engineers while leading delivery across two cross-functional pods. You’ll coach and inspire mid-to-senior level engineers to partner closely with Product and Design, enabling your teams to build scalable, user-focused solutions that empower educators and drive meaningful student outcomes.
This is a people-first role that balances coaching and delivery. You’ll nurture a culture where engineers are connected to the why behind their work, supported in their growth, challenged to improve, and inspired to own outcomes that matter. Your teams won’t just ship tickets—they’ll build momentum around a shared mission, with clarity, accountability, and purpose.
The ideal candidate is someone who is values aligned. They
Start with empathy so they can create a culture of direct, candid feedback between engineers and across the pod, so the team is operating with high standards and trust in each other.
Ruthlessly prioritize and focus the team on what’s most important for us to achieve our goals and what’s most likely to make the greatest impact on the students and educators we serve.
Create momentum through a mix of foreseeing the delivery obstacles ahead, learning from past mistakes, and experimenting with new ways of working to drive greater progress in future sprints.
Are fearlessly objective and love digging into the data behind our engineering operations, product usage, and delivery progress, so they can challenge the status quo operations to make the team and the product every day.
Exercise agency by solving problems and creating systems and processes that no one asked them to, and by empowering each engineer to do the same in their day-to-day work.
Are driven to grow by embracing challenges and taking risks as an individual and a cross-functional team, and creating a safe-to-fail culture where everyone can grow the most.
Your work will have a significant impact on our product’s functionality and user experience, helping educators everywhere teach the skills necessary for students to succeed.
In this role, you will:
Lead with a growth mindset and an owner’s attitude. We build this software, we run it, and we own it end-to-end.
Manage two pods (approx. 5–7 engineers total), helping your teams stay connected, motivated, and focused on meaningful impact.
Create the conditions for high-performing teams by fostering clarity, trust, and psychological safety.
Facilitate team ceremonies, help sequence engineering work in partnership with Product, and support the consistent delivery of high-quality software.
Coach and develop engineers by creating regular opportunities for feedback, growth, and goal-setting, supporting them as they stretch, take risks, and reach the next level in their careers.
Collaborate with product managers, designers, and tech leads to scope and sequence work that aligns with OKRs.
Act decisively when needed—proactively removing blockers, adjusting team focus, or escalating tradeoffs.
Use data, retrospectives, and candid feedback to improve how we work, grounding decisions in evidence, not assumptions.
Contribute to hiring, onboarding, and performance management for your engineers.

What We’re Looking For
In addition to values alignment…
Curiosity: we’re a team of lifelong learners trying to be better every day.
4+ years of engineering management experience, including directly managing multiple pods or cross-functional teams.
8+ years of software development experience in product-focused engineering organizations.
Demonstrated success coaching mid-to-senior engineers and building strong performance and growth systems.
Experience managing in a remote-first environment, including async planning and distributed collaboration.
Excellent communication and interpersonal skills, especially across functions and time zones.
Experience leading in ambiguous environments, including driving improvements and bringing others along.


Bonus points for experience in:
EdTech, especially K-12 or curriculum development tools
SaaS, B2B, or enterprise product development
Product Engineering culture and agile product teams
Familiarity with our specific stack (Angular, NestJS, Postgres, AWS)

In the first 3 months, you will:
Build strong relationships through 1:1s and team practices.
Learn how our product teams operate and where delivery friction exists.
Take full ownership of sprint planning, standups, and retros for two pods.
Begin coaching engineers and supporting career development conversations.
Identify at least one system, ritual, or process to improve and lead a change initiative.
In the long term, you will:
Grow healthy, high-performing teams that deliver reliable, high-impact software.
Drive initiative planning by clarifying scope, supporting estimation, sequencing work, and aligning staffing across pods.
Establish shared delivery practices and team norms that reduce friction, increase clarity, and help your teams move with confidence.
Monitor progress across pods and collaborate with Product and Design as priorities shift or timelines evolve.
Partner with tech leads to raise the bar on architecture, quality, and performance.
Coach emerging engineering leaders and help shape the systems that support hiring, onboarding, and performance development across the team.
Continuously shape our engineering culture to reflect our values of empathy, agency, objectivity, momentum, and a relentless drive to grow.
Keep teams connected to the mission—helping engineers understand not just what they’re building, but why it matters to educators and students.

Salary: $170,000 USD Annually
Note: We are only able to consider US-based candidates for this role

Benefits
Cigna Health Insurance – 100% premium coverage for team members & dependents
Dental & Vision Coverage – 100% premium coverage for team members & dependents
3% Employer-Match on 401(k) – Helping you grow your retirement savings
$50K Life Insurance / AD&D – Financial protection for you & your loved ones
Flexible PTO Plan – Take time off when you need it
Separate Sick Leave Policy – Dedicated time off for when you're unwell
16 Weeks of Paid Parental Leave – Support for growing families
Home Office Reimbursements – Get the setup you need to work comfortably
Book & Learning Stipend – Invest in your personal & professional growth
Meaningful Employee Experience Initiatives – Optional employee panel participation
Every Other Friday Off After 90 Days! – More time to recharge!

See this presentation to learn more about our work values and what it’s like to be part of our team!",N/A,https://www.indeed.com/viewjob?jk=b7cf608ffb8f8581,False,engineering manager
Engineering Manager,"Pearl, Inc.",Remote,remote,2025-06-19,Indeed,"About Pearl
Pearl is shaping the future of dentistry with a suite of AI solutions developed to establish higher standards of quality and care for patients worldwide. Since 2019, our team has engineered FDA-cleared computer vision capabilities for interpretation of dental imagery — industry-leading capabilities which clinicians, practice owners, labs and insurers use to elevate the efficiency, accuracy and consistency of dental care around the world.

Who We’re Looking For
We’re looking for an engineering manager with experience leading technical teams and running the SDLC for multiple teams. The ideal candidate will have 5+ years of experience as an individual contributor in software development and an additional 3+ years of experience in engineering management. Candidates should be data-driven, agile-friendly, and prepared to take on the challenges of supporting a high-growth startup.
Participate in system design discussions, review system design and provide feedback
Evaluate and update design principles and make sure they are adhered to
Understand implications of adopting new technologies and provide support to leadership in new technology selection.
Facilitate effective communication within the engineering team
Coordinate communication with other Engineering teams
Present project updates to engineering leadership
Independently resolve conflicts and maintain a culture of collaboration
Ability to communicate company priorities and high level strategy to your engineering team
Act as first source of escalation for issues for your direct reports
Contribute in manager level discussions about team culture and organization
Guide and mentor direct reports and set goals and expectations
Identify and address skill development opportunities for the team
Own team expansion and resource allocation within your team
Manage team timelines and deliverables
Ensure compliance with engineering processes and standards
Collaborate with other teams for successful project execution
What You’ll Need to Succeed
5+ years of experience in software development
3+ years of experience in engineering management
5+ years of experience with AWS (or proven track record with competing cloud offering)
Proficiency with agile development
Proficient with Node.js and React
Proficient in System Design and Microservice Architecture
Proven track record of successfully management of engineering teams
Excellent communication skills, both technical and non-technical
Proven experience adopting new technologies while maintaining growth
What We Offer
Competitive Benefit and Compensation Offerings
Ongoing Training and Development Opportunities
Unaccrued, Flexible PTO
Remote Work*
Note: This position is open to remote candidates in the following states or those willing to relocate: AZ, CA, CO, CT, FL, GA, ID, IL, IN, MA, NC, NJ, NY, OK, OR, PA, SC, TX, UT, VA, WA, WI",N/A,https://www.indeed.com/viewjob?jk=04b2462c360c7a41,False,engineering manager
"Engineering Manager, Questionnaire Automation",Vanta,Remote,remote,2025-06-19,Indeed,"Location
Remote U.S.
Employment Type
Full time
Location Type
Remote
Department
Engineering
Compensation
Cash Range $207K – $244K • Offers Equity • This role is also eligible for medical benefits, 401(k) plan, and other company perk programs.

At Vanta, our mission is to secure the internet and protect consumer data. We believe that security should be monitored and verified continuously, and we empower companies to practice better security and prove it with ease. Vanta has a kind and talented team, and while some have prior security experience, many have been successful at Vanta without it.
The Vanta Questionnaire Automation team is developing a next generation, AI powered solution that allows organizations to automatically answer security questionnaires. This product solves an incredibly large pain point for any company that sells software and the team is heavily focused on expanding workflow automation to make the end to end process of security reviews as zero touch as possible.
As an Engineering Manager, you’ll be responsible for setting strategy, for leading your team to deliver results consistently and sustainably, for growing and developing talented engineers, and for cultivating a healthy, results-driven culture on your team.
Vanta’s business and team are growing quickly, and it’s essential that we lay the foundation for a successful organization. You’ll leverage your past experience and play a crucial role in laying the groundwork for a successful engineering organization, contributing to developing foundational processes that enable our entire team to scale — onboarding, interview loops, career frameworks, execution processes, and more.
Our business has found incredible product-market fit and has monetized effectively since the day we signed our first customer. We’re growing at a blistering pace, which presents career-defining opportunities for engineers to accelerate their growth and to contribute to a rapidly-scaling company.

Vanta has a kind and talented team, and while some have prior security experience, many have been successful at Vanta without it. We’d love for you to join us!
Visit our Vanta Engineering Blog to learn more about what our team is working on!
What you’ll do as an Engineering Manager at Vanta:
Drive significant impact for our customers and business by leading your team to deliver results consistently and sustainably.
Build a best-in-class engineering team. Coach, mentor and create an environment where your team can do their best work and deliver for the business.
Set direction and guide technical strategy, ensuring that your team is delivering long-term value aligned with Vanta’s business priorities.
Work closely with Vanta’s customers and customer-facing teammates to build and ship high-value products and infrastructure.
Play an integral role in laying the foundation for Vanta’s engineering culture.
How to be successful in this role:
2+ years of professional experience in a full-time engineering leadership role managing teams of 6-8+ engineers.
Strong decision maker who effectively balances ambiguity, available data, speed, and quality.
Experience managing and upleveling senior individual contributors.
Proven track record of guiding product and long term technical strategy.
Have participated in developing or driving engineering-wide initiatives (recruiting processes, career frameworks, etc) in a prior role.
What you can expect as a Vantan:
Industry-competitive compensation
100% covered medical, dental, and vision benefits with dependents coverage
16 weeks fully-paid parental Leave for all new parents
Health & wellness and remote workplace stipends
Family planning benefits through Carrot Fertility
401(k) matching
Flexible work hours and location
Open PTO policy
11 paid holidays in the US
Offices in SF, NYC, London, Dublin, and Sydney
To provide greater transparency to candidates, we share base pay ranges for all US-based job postings regardless of state. We set standard base pay ranges for all roles based on function, level, and country location, benchmarked against similar-stage growth companies. Final offer amounts are determined by multiple factors and may vary based on candidate location, skills, depth of work experience, and relevant licenses/credentials.
#LI-remote
At Vanta, we are committed to hiring diverse talent of different backgrounds and as such, it is important to us to provide an inclusive work environment for all. We do not discriminate on the basis of race, gender identity, age, religion, sexual orientation, veteran or disability status, or any other protected class. As an equal opportunity employer, we encourage and welcome people of all backgrounds to apply.
About Vanta
We started in 2018, in the wake of several high-profile data breaches. Online security was only becoming more important, but we knew firsthand how hard it could be for fast-growing companies to invest the time and manpower it takes to build a solid security foundation. Vanta was inspired by a vision to restore trust in internet businesses by enabling companies to improve and prove their security.From our early days automating security monitoring for compliance standards like SOC 2, HIPAA and ISO 27001 to creating the world's leading Trust Management Platform, our vision remains unchanged.
Now more than ever, making security continuous—not just a point-in-time check— is essential. Thousands of companies rely on Vanta to build, maintain and demonstrate their trust— all in a way that's real-time and transparent.",N/A,https://www.indeed.com/viewjob?jk=eb3a24e81a5cd8f5,False,engineering manager
Engineering Manager,EquipmentShare,"Remote in Columbia, MO",remote,2025-06-19,Indeed,"EquipmentShare is Hiring an Engineering Manager
At EquipmentShare , we believe it’s more than just a job, we invest in our people and encourage you to choose the best path for your career. It’s truly about you, your future and where you want to go.
People sometimes refer to the role as a Development or Engineering Manager - we don't get too caught up on titles at EquipmentShare , we care about finding the right people with the passion for empowering engineers to build great product experiences.
Main tech stack includes: AWS, Kubernetes, Python, PostgreSQL, DynamoDB, Kafka, Kinesis, React, Node.js, Typescript and GraphQL
Salary range: $140k-$165k. Factors including past experience and location may affect final compensation rate.
What you'll be doing
Our Engineering teams are focussed on building great products and technology, developing experiences and feature capabilities integral to our next generation T3 Platform .
We are focused on domain driven design, organized into agile cross-functional teams composed of Engineering , Product and Design .
You'll have the scope to coach and develop our capability. We like to leave things better than we found them and to improve how we deliver as a team.
We'll be there to support you as you become familiar with our teams, product domains, tech stack and processes - generally how we all work together.
As an Engineering Manager, you will
Coach one or more domain teams of software engineers ( 5-10+ per domain) who are dispersed across the United States and United Kingdom, in addition to partners in global locations.
Partner with distributed Product Managers and Designers on the creation of new functionality for current and future customer needs and the elimination of technical debt.
Own the delivery outcomes on product commitments and represent delivery on business reviews with shared insight from our teams.
Guide continuous evolution of software development and delivery processes. Facilitate the building of tools and best practices to make it easier for engineers to accomplish their goals.
Contribute on platform direction, support roadmap and delivery planning iterations, and solicit feedback loops to support our team’s success.
Develop opportunities to experiment and innovate, foster research, prototyping and evaluation of new capabilities to improve the platform experience (relative to investments and scale).
Mentor career growth and development of our engineers, guide their goals and performance review life-cycle with coaching for success.
Support our growth and hiring plans (internal and external), collaborate on interviews and candidate engagement, foster diversity and inclusivity in our approach.
Who you are
You’ll have a solid grasp of the application of technology at scale , and are accustomed to partnering with Product and Design teams to get stuff done. Most importantly, you’ll foster collaboration for shared outcomes.
You get servant leadership - fostering an inclusive culture where everyone can be their best selves, nurturing the growth and craft within others.
You know when to do the right thing — balancing the desire to deliver business outcomes with the responsibility for quality and scalable solutions.
You are passionate and curious — inspiring others to develop engaging Product experiences and encourage creativity to improve what we do and how we deliver.
You cultivate trust — partnering with others to set a clear direction, giving people what they need to be successful, and getting out of their way.
You take the initiative — owning results and shared outcomes , you also value learning and growing together as a team.
You take a hypothesis-driven approach — knowing how to source, create and leverage data to inform decision making and prioritization, using data to drive how we improve.
So, what is important to us?
We’re looking for a servant leader with a growth mindset who enjoys guiding software engineers with diverse technical backgrounds and experiences .
Demonstrable experience leading Engineering teams — it’s not about the number of years, but more about the type of exposure in developing high-performing teams .
A track record in building and deploying production scale platforms — you partner with distributed Product and Design teams to deliver engaging product experiences.
Proven success in growing and developing others — having coached engineers on developing their craft and supporting their career progression.
Self-directed and motivated — you are open-minded and resilient, embrace change and iterate rapidly.
Strong delivery capability — you collaborate to get stuff done, are comfortable navigating conflicting priorities and deadlines and develop shared delivery roadmaps.
Understanding of system and enterprise architecture concepts — you get how components fit together and impact one another, you have sound exposure in and a solid grasp of software development (familiarity with Cloud Native, Continuous Delivery, Developer Velocity, Development Methodologies, DevOps concepts, etc.).
What we will offer you
We can promise that every day will be a little different with new ideas, challenges and rewards.
We’ve been growing as a team and we are not finished just yet, there is plenty of opportunity to shape how we deliver together .
Our mission is to enable the construction industry with tools that unlock substantial increases to productivity. Together with our team and customers, we are building the future of construction.
T3 is the only cloud-based operating system that brings together construction workflows and data from constantly moving elements in one place
Competitive base salary
Unlimited PTO
Remote first
True work/life balance
Medical, Dental, Vision and Life Insurance coverage
401(k) + match
Opportunities for career and professional development with conferences, events, seminars and continued education
On-site fitness center at the Home Office in Columbia, Missouri, complete with weightlifting machines, cardio equipment, group fitness space, racquetball courts, a climbing wall, and much more
Volunteering and local charity support that help you nurture and grow the communities you call home through our Giving Back initiative
Stocked breakroom and full kitchen with breakfast and lunch provided daily by our chef and kitchen crew at the Home Office in Columbia, Missouri
We embrace diversity in all of its forms and foster an inclusive environment for all people to do their best work with us.
We're an equal opportunity employer. All applicants will be considered for employment without attention to ethnicity, religion, sexual orientation, gender identity, family or parental status, national origin, veteran, neurodiversity status or disability status.
All appointments will be made on merit.

#LI-Remote
#LI-Remote",N/A,https://www.indeed.com/viewjob?jk=e80b4f318d6336ec,False,engineering manager
"Engineering Manager, DashPass Platform",DoorDash USA,"Remote in Seattle, WA",remote,2025-06-19,Indeed,"About the Team
At DoorDash, we're revolutionizing the way people experience food delivery. One of the main reasons users leave our platform is the perception of high prices. Our team's mission is to re-engage and retain millions of consumers by creating a more affordable experience that naturally guides them toward DashPass. We're tackling one of the company's top priorities—offering competitive pricing while supporting long-term growth and customer satisfaction. This is a high-impact, high-visibility role where your work will help redefine the future of food delivery for millions and contribute to our journey as an industry leader.
About the Role
The DashPass Platform team works closely with Product, Analytics, and Strategy & Operations, operating at the intersection of product engineering, platform development, and machine learning to solve key business challenges through advanced technical solutions. As the Engineering Manager of the DashPass Platform team, you will lead a team of backend engineers, shaping both the technical vision and execution. Your primary focus will be on delivering scalable and reliable platform solutions that support multiple DoorDash initiatives, including DashPass, Wolt+, HBO Max, and others.
You will drive the development of systems that seamlessly integrate with machine learning models to optimize personalized offers. Your close alignment with business stakeholders will empower you to make strategic decisions that maximize impact and make DoorDash more affordable for customers.
Additionally, you will play a key role in enabling other businesses within DoorDash to thrive by scaling platform capabilities and simplifying subscription management workflows.
You're excited about this opportunity because you will…
Lead a talented team of engineers to build new industry leading technologies
Partner with cross-functional stakeholders to define the roadmap and vision for the team and deliver immense impact
Build an outstanding team by coaching engineers, empowering engineers through delegation and applying your technical expertise to hold your team to the highest engineering standards
Scale the team by recruiting, retaining and developing highly talented engineers across different disciplines
Inspire the team with your technical vision and create the alignment necessary to execute on it
Provide technical guidance and roll up your sleeves with hands-on contributions when necessary
Scale the team by developing internal talents and attracting top talents
We're excited about you because…
B.S., M.S., or Ph.D. in Computer Science or equivalent
7+ years of industry experience
Minimum of 2 years of management experience, ideally managing platform teams
Strong hands-on experience with working with non-technical stakeholders, cross-team collaboration, and building scalable products in a fast-paced environment
Ability to handle ambiguity and work with product and business partners to collect non-technical requirements to design and build scalable experience solutions.
Ability to guide and grow an excellent engineering team in a rapidly changing business environment
Why You'll Love Working at DoorDash
We are leaders - Leadership is not limited to our management team. It's something everyone at DoorDash embraces and embodies.
We are doers - We believe the only way to predict the future is to build it. Creating solutions that will lead our company and our industry is what we do
- on every project, every day.
We are learning - We're not afraid to dig in and uncover the truth, even if it's scary or inconvenient. Everyone here is continually learning on the job, no matter if we've been in a role for one year or one minute.
We are all DoorDash - The magic of DoorDash is our people, together making our inspiring goals attainable and driving us to greater heights.
You grow here faster than other places because we move and grow fast. You practice muscles like leading through chaos, ruthless prioritization, crisis management.

Notice to Applicants for Jobs Located in NYC or Remote Jobs Associated With Office in NYC Only
We use Covey as part of our hiring and/or promotional process for jobs in NYC and certain features may qualify it as an AEDT in NYC. As part of the hiring and/or promotion process, we provide Covey with job requirements and candidate submitted applications. We began using Covey Scout for Inbound from August 21, 2023, through December 21, 2023, and resumed using Covey Scout for Inbound again on June 29, 2024.
The Covey tool has been reviewed by an independent auditor. Results of the audit may be viewed here: Covey
About DoorDash
At DoorDash, our mission to empower local economies shapes how our team members move quickly, learn, and reiterate in order to make impactful decisions that display empathy for our range of users—from Dashers to merchant partners to consumers. We are a technology and logistics company that started with door-to-door delivery, and we are looking for team members who can help us go from a company that is known for delivering food to a company that people turn to for any and all goods.

DoorDash is growing rapidly and changing constantly, which gives our team members the opportunity to share their unique perspectives, solve new challenges, and own their careers. We're committed to supporting employees' happiness, healthiness, and overall well-being by providing comprehensive benefits and perks including premium healthcare, wellness expense reimbursement, paid parental leave and more.
Our Commitment to Diversity and Inclusion
We're committed to growing and empowering a more inclusive community within our company, industry, and cities. That's why we hire and cultivate diverse teams of people from all backgrounds, experiences, and perspectives. We believe that true innovation happens when everyone has room at the table and the tools, resources, and opportunity to excel.
Statement of Non-Discrimination: In keeping with our beliefs and goals, no employee or applicant will face discrimination or harassment based on: race, color, ancestry, national origin, religion, age, gender, marital/domestic partner status, sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, disability status, or veteran status. Above and beyond discrimination and harassment based on ""protected categories,"" we also strive to prevent other subtler forms of inappropriate behavior (i.e., stereotyping) from ever gaining a foothold in our office. Whether blatant or hidden, barriers to success have no place at DoorDash. We value a diverse workforce – people who identify as women, non-binary or gender non-conforming, LGBTQIA+, American Indian or Native Alaskan, Black or African American, Hispanic or Latinx, Native Hawaiian or Other Pacific Islander, differently-abled, caretakers and parents, and veterans are strongly encouraged to apply. Thank you to the Level Playing Field Institute for this statement of non-discrimination.
Pursuant to the San Francisco Fair Chance Ordinance, Los Angeles Fair Chance Initiative for Hiring Ordinance, and any other state or local hiring regulations, we will consider for employment any qualified applicant, including those with arrest and conviction records, in a manner consistent with the applicable regulation.
If you need any accommodations, please inform your recruiting contact upon initial connection.",N/A,https://www.indeed.com/viewjob?jk=3eba38edc0f4eaf8,False,engineering manager
Engineering Manager,Qualia,"Remote in San Francisco, CA",remote,2025-06-19,Indeed,"At Qualia, we've built the leading B2B real estate technology that transforms the home buying and selling experience into a simple, secure, and enjoyable process. Our SMB and Enterprise products bring together users from across the real estate ecosystem-homebuyers and sellers, lenders, title and escrow agents, and real estate agents-onto a single shared digital closing platform, providing greater clarity and transparency to real estate transactions. Today, through our business customers across the country, millions of consumers use Qualia to close on homes every year.
WHAT YOU'LL WORK ON
We are hiring an entrepreneurial Engineering Manager interested in being a part of our rapidly growing engineering team. Our engineers are conscientious hackers who like teamwork but are also comfortable with independent projects. Our engineering team releases new software every week, moves at a fast pace, and works directly with our design and customer-facing teams to imagine and build the new experiences our customers love. Because of that, you'll get a rewarding variety of projects to work on.
As an Engineering Manager, you've been in the industry for a while and have a proven track record of success. You are comfortable leading complex, high-liability projects. You have experience making key architectural decisions and performing the research to back up those decisions. You've dealt with the consequences of your mistakes, and you know how to fight fires if necessary. You enjoy mentoring and providing support. You've thrived in different environments and realize that each team is unique.
YOUR DAY TO DAY
You will lead one of our core engineering teams, which is key to Qualia's continued growth
YOUR BACKGROUND THAT LIKELY MAKES YOU A MATCH
3-5 years of experience as a full-stack engineer on a customer-facing product, 2+ years leading an engineering team for a product that has significant impact on the company's growth
Strong hands-on technical leadership, people management, project management, and communication skills
Keen product sense, attention to detail, and passion for the impact of the software you build
Background in enterprise software and fintech preferred
We are a remote-first development organization that values flexibility in how our teams work. In addition to supporting fully remote roles, we have offices in Austin and San Francisco, with a hybrid option available for those who live near an office and prefer in-person collaboration.
This role has a base annual salary of $210,000-$240,000 plus a competitive equity and benefits package. (Salary to be determined by relevant experience, location, knowledge, and skills of the applicant, internal equity, and alignment with market data.)
THE TECH STACK YOU'LL USE
Javascript / NodeJS
Semantic UI
MongoDB
Microservice architecture / Kubernetes
AWS
WHY QUALIA
Our flat company structure empowers engineers to make product decisions
We have a collaborative culture where engineers mentor each other
Qualia is made up of incredibly bright, mission-driven coworkers who are passionate about using technology to solve real-world problems-and we're growing quickly. In order to continue building an engaging and dynamic organization, we're committed to giving everyone the support they need to do great work.
Our benefits package is designed to allow our team members to be their best selves, both in and out of the workplace. In addition to comprehensive health plans, a 401k program, and commuter benefits, we prioritize family and personal well-being through professional development, parental leave, and a flexible time off policy. Qualia offers a robust online onboarding program to train new hires, biweekly all hands meetings, and a variety of internal virtual events to keep employees connected.
We believe diverse perspectives and backgrounds are critical to building great technology, and our goal is to cultivate an environment where people feel equally valued and respected. Qualia is proud to be an equal-opportunity workplace, and we welcome applicants from all backgrounds regardless of race, color, ancestry, religion, gender identity or expression, sexual orientation, marital status, age, citizenship, socioeconomic status, disability, or veteran status.
#LI-Remote",N/A,https://www.indeed.com/viewjob?jk=a5b0f0b9101f1e3a,False,engineering manager
Software Engineering Manager,OpenBorder,Remote,remote,2025-06-19,Indeed,"As an Engineering Manager at OpenBorder, you’ll lead a team of engineers building the systems that enable e-commerce brands to scale globally. You’ll be responsible for people management, delivery, and technical quality across multiple projects. This role balances technical oversight with team development, and is ideal for someone who’s passionate about building both products and people.

What You’ll Do
Manage and support a team of engineers through regular feedback and career development
Drive project delivery and ensure high engineering standards
Collaborate with product, design, and other teams to prioritize and plan work
Contribute to architectural discussions and technical decision-making
Create a culture of accountability, quality, and growth
Operate across our stack: Java, MongoDB, PostgreSQL, TypeScript, Next.js, Nest.js, AWS, GCP
Requirements
What We’re Looking For
Experience managing and scaling high-performing engineering teams
Strong technical background in backend or full-stack systems
Ability to balance delivery, quality, and team health
Excellent communication and collaboration skills
Experience working in distributed environments
Benefits
Fully Remote role (US or Canada only)
Eastern Time working hours
Health Care Plan (Medical, Dental & Vision)
Retirement Plan (401k, IRA)
Life Insurance (Basic, Voluntary & AD&D)
Paid Time Off (Vacation, Sick & Public Holidays)
Family Leave (Maternity, Paternity)
Short Term & Long Term Disability
Equity",N/A,https://www.indeed.com/viewjob?jk=6dab52aa29609c2e,False,engineering manager
Engineering Manager,CertifID,Remote,remote,2025-06-19,Indeed,"Cybercrime is rising, reaching record highs in 2024. According to the FBI's IC3 report total losses exceeded $16 billion. With investment fraud and BEC scams at the forefront, the message is clear: the real estate sector remains a lucrative target for cybercriminals. At CertifID, we take this threat seriously and provide a secure platform that verifies the identities of parties involved in transactions, authenticates wire transfer instructions, and detects potential fraud attempts. Our technology is designed to mitigate risks and ensure that every transaction is conducted with confidence and peace of mind.

We know we couldn’t take on this challenge without our incredible team. We have been recognized as one of the Best Startups to Work for in Austin, made the Inc. 5000 list, and won Best Culture by Purpose Jobs two years in a row. We are guided by our core values and our vision of a world without wire fraud. We offer a dynamic work environment where you can contribute to meaningful impact and be part of a team dedicated to enhancing security and fighting fraud.

The Engineering Manager at CertifID will push the boundaries of innovation and further our people-first values by directing the activities of one of our Software Engineering teams. This role is for a former engineer who loves expanding their reach by leading a high-performing team of engineers. The candidate should be experienced in building back-end systems at scale.

How you will make your impact:
Foster a culture of psychological safety, innovation, and continuous improvement.
Deeply learn our business to successfully collaborate with other groups across the company to ensure our systems are secure, resilient, and deployed with guaranteed reliability.
Lead and manage a team of software engineers, providing mentorship and guidance.
Oversee the design, development, and deployment of software applications.
Drive collaboration with cross-functional teams to define project requirements and deliverables.
Ensure the team adheres to best practices in software development, including code reviews, testing, and documentation.
- Drive continuous improvement in software development processes and practices.- Manage engineering team commitments and resources to ensure successful project delivery.
Foster a culture of innovation, collaboration, and continuous learning within the team.
Stay up-to-date with the latest industry trends and technologies to ensure our software solutions remain competitive

Experience:
Bachelor’s degree in Engineering, Computer Science, or a related field (or equivalent experience).
Although not a strict requirement, candidates for this position will usually have 5+ years of experience in Software Engineering and team management
Experience in a named role as a people leader.
Strong technical background
Excellent leadership, communication, and interpersonal skills.
Experience with current development methodologies and project management tools.
Strong organizational skills and attention to detail. Strong collaboration and communication skills, valuing teamwork and effective knowledge sharing with technical and non-technical team members.
Exceptional analytical and strategic thinking abilities, with a knack for problem-solving and optimizing
Bring a sense of ownership, demonstrate craftsmanship, enjoy collaboration, and have the drive to make an impact.
Accountable to self and others, establishes trust through consistent and transparent actions.
Proven track record as a lifelong learner, staying ahead of technological advancements and embracing new methodologies.

Not sure if you check all the boxes? Apply anyway! We know that great talent comes in many forms, and we value potential just as much as experience. If you're excited about this role and believe you can grow into it, we’d love to hear from you. We’re looking for people who are eager to learn, adapt, and solve challenges—so if that sounds like you, don’t let a checklist hold you back!

What we offer:
Health, dental, and vision Insurance (including a $0 option), 401k with matching, and no waiting period
EquityWellness reimbursement of $300/year
Life insurance
Parental leave
Flexible vacation
12 company-paid holidays
No work on your birthday
An award-winning culture
Competitive pay. We aim to meet or lead the market and use Carta Total Compensation to benchmark our roles. Starting salary for this position will be shared during the first screening call.

Change doesn't happen overnight, and the same goes for us here at CertifID. We PROGRESS collectively and individually as we grow, abiding by our core values. Protect the Customer, Raise the Bar, Operate with Urgency, Grow with Grit, Ride the Wave, Enthusiasm Spreads, Stay Connected, Send It.",N/A,https://www.indeed.com/viewjob?jk=86826ea38d412de3,False,engineering manager
Engineering Manager - Remote,Open Exchange Inc,"Remote in Boston, MA 02109",remote,2025-06-19,Indeed,"About the Role:
We are looking for a highly skilled Engineering Manager to lead software product development across multiple geographically dispersed teams. This role demands strong technical expertise, exceptional leadership abilities, and experience managing distributed teams to drive high-quality software delivery and align engineering efforts with business goals.
Key Responsibilities:
Lead and mentor software engineering teams across various locations, promoting collaboration and innovation.
Oversee the end-to-end development lifecycle of software products, ensuring timely delivery and high quality.
Collaborate with product managers, designers, and other stakeholders to define requirements and set priorities.
Optimize engineering processes by implementing best practices and agile methodologies.
Provide technical direction and architectural guidance for scalable, efficient solutions.
Monitor team performance, conduct regular evaluations, and support individual career growth.
Identify and mitigate risks to ensure smooth and successful project execution.
Communicate effectively with internal and external stakeholders to ensure alignment on objectives.
Manage resource planning, hiring, and onboarding to support team productivity and growth.
Required Qualifications:
Bachelor’s or Master’s degree in Computer Science, Software Engineering, or a related field.
5+ years of experience in software engineering, with at least 2 years in a leadership role.
Proven experience managing offshore or distributed development teams.
Strong understanding of modern software development practices, cloud platforms, and technology stacks.
Excellent communication and interpersonal skills.
Hands-on experience with agile development methodologies.
Ability to manage and prioritize multiple projects simultaneously.
Strong problem-solving and decision-making skills.
Preferred Qualifications:
Experience with DevOps practices, CI/CD pipelines, and cloud-based architectures.
Familiarity with challenges in global software development and effective solutions.
Understanding of compliance and security best practices in distributed team environments.",N/A,https://www.indeed.com/viewjob?jk=cc27334ed4d132e2,False,engineering manager
"Engineering Manager, Password Manager",1Password,Remote,remote,2025-06-19,Indeed,"Location
Remote (United States | Canada)
Employment Type
Full time
Department
Technology

About 1Password
At 1Password, we’re building the foundation for a safe, productive digital future. Our mission is to unleash employee productivity without compromising security by ensuring every identity is authentic, every application sign-in is secure, and every device is trusted. We innovated the market-leading enterprise password manager and pioneered Extended Access Management, a new cybersecurity category built for the way people and AI agents work today. As one of the most loved brands in cybersecurity, we take a human-centric approach in everything from product strategy to user experience. Over 165,000 businesses and millions of people trust us to provide seamless, secure access to their most critical information.
If you're excited about the opportunity to contribute to the digital safety of millions, to work alongside a team of curious, driven individuals, and to solve hard problems in a fast-paced, dynamic environment, then we want to hear from you. Come join us and help shape a safer, simpler digital future.

We are continuing to grow our leadership team, and currently are hiring an Engineering Manager for our Password Manager team. As Engineering Manager for one of our user-facing Password Manager teams, you will lead and empower one of our most prominent development teams at 1Password. Reporting to the Head of Password Manager Development, you will help craft our vision and make it a reality through creative engineering and identifying required solutions to hard problems. You will be responsible for tactical execution by the team, helping to coordinate activities such as cycle planning, design reviews, and project planning. You will also be responsible for hiring and coaching world-class talent for your team.
An ever-increasing number of individuals, families, and businesses are using 1Password every day, and 1Password needs to scale accordingly. Come help us make it easier than ever for those people to get started!

This is a remote opportunity within Canada and the US.
What we're looking for:
At least 3 years experience in a role where you were responsible for managing a team of software engineers and everything that comes with it.
You have significant hands-on development experience (preferably in the app space) and have engineered your way out of many complex, unscoped problems. Having lived the life of a senior developer before, you leverage your own experience to coach and train up the developers on your team.
You have successfully coordinated and delivered large scale projects before that touched multiple areas of the business, product, or underlying architecture.
The ability to create and maintain a positive, healthy team environment in which everyone is supported, encouraged, and meaningfully challenged to do great work. You motivate and inspire others. After meeting with you, people get back to their job with more energy. You are a force of positivity and lift people up when they need it.
You enjoy having the freedom and responsibility to make final decisions on most everything for your team. Handling tough problems gives you energy and you can make the hard decisions even when there isn’t much information to go on.
You are someone who is ready to roll up their sleeves and get to work themselves on technical challenges.
You are capable of driving the delivery of projects, and creating roadmaps for future work.
Bonus for:
Experience managing remote and distributed teams.
User experience/design background
Experience in the SaaS B2B space
What you can expect:
Manage engineers and develop engineering leads. Foster an environment of innovation, execution, and collaboration.
Work to scope and plan key deliverables for projects and initiatives with the team.
Drive execution with an emphasis on iterations and deliverables, quality, velocity, and communication.
Provide technical leadership to developers both in your team and across the engineering organization.
Grow a team of strong engineers to create an inclusive workplace.
Continue scaling a highly specialized engineering team by working with a team of Engineering Managers to continuously refine hiring, onboarding, and development processes.
Even if you don't tick all these boxes, we want to hear from you. We understand that everyone's experiences are unique.
The most important thing you can bring to this job is the drive to dive in, get the work done, and fix root causes instead of treating symptoms. We believe in continuous learning and support professional development on the job with a budget to back it up. If you bring a desire to do the right thing for our customers, a sense of ownership over the product you work on, and a focus on shipping quality code, we want to hear from you.
“The Password Manager group is responsible for everything our users think of as ‘1Password’. We focus on making it easy for every user to integrate 1Password into their daily lives; we fight for the user, solving hard problems in creative ways in an unrelenting pursuit of ease of use for everyone who crosses our virtual threshold.” – Michael Fey, Head of Password Manager Development
USA-based roles only: The annual base salary for this role is between $190,000 USD and $258,000 USD, plus immediate participation in 1Password's benefits program (health, dental, 401k and many others), utilization of our generous paid time off, an equity grant and, where applicable, participation in our incentive programs.
Canada-based roles only: The annual base salary for this role is between $172,000 CAD and $232,000 CAD, plus immediate participation in 1Password’s generous benefits program (health, dental, RRSP and many others), utilization of our generous paid time off, an equity grant and, where applicable, participation in our incentive programs.
At 1Password, we approach each individual's compensation with a promise of fair market value and internal equity commensurate with experience and specific skill set.
Our culture
At 1Password, we prioritize collaboration, clear and transparent communication, receptiveness to feedback, and alignment with our core values: keep it simple, lead with honesty, and put people first.
You’ll be part of a team that challenges the status quo, and is excited to experiment and iterate in search of the best solution. That said, 1Password is not for everyone. Our work is demanding, we strive for excellence, and the pace is fast. We need people who are keen to take on challenging problems, who seek feedback to grow, and who are driven to make an impact. If you're looking for a place where you can settle into a comfortable routine, this might not be the right fit for you. We’re looking for individuals who are proven experts in their fields, as well as those who are highly adaptable, can thrive in ambiguity and through change, are curious, and above all deliver results.
We are committed to leveraging cutting-edge technology—including AI—to achieve our mission. We also understand that thinking critically about AI in its current forms will help us create better solutions for our customers and ourselves with its future forms, which will help us continue to close the gap between security and privacy and achieve our mission. We want team members at all levels to take the approach of actively learning AI best practices, identifying opportunities to apply AI in meaningful ways, and driving innovative solutions in their daily work. Embracing the future of AI isn't just encouraged at 1Password—it's an essential part of how we will be successful at 1Password.
Our approach to remote work
We believe in the power of remote work, but recognize that in-person connection is important to help us achieve our mission. While we are a remote-first company, travel for in-person engagement is a part of most roles. Frequency will depend on role and responsibilities, and may include, but is not limited to: annual department-wide offsites, team meetings, and customer/industry events.
What we offer
We believe in working hard, and rewarding that hard work through our benefits. While not an exhaustive list, here is a glance at what we currently offer:
Health and wellbeing
Maternity and parental leave top-up programs
Generous PTO policy
Four company-wide wellness days
Growth and future
Company equity for all full-time employees
Retirement matching program
Free 1Password account
Community
Paid volunteer days
Employee-led inclusion and belonging programs and ERGs
Peer-to-peer recognition through Bonusly
You belong here.
1Password is proud to be an equal opportunity employer. We are committed to fostering an inclusive, diverse and equitable workplace that is built on trust, support and respect. We welcome all individuals and do not discriminate on the basis of gender identity and expression, race, ethnicity, disability, sexual orientation, colour, religion, creed, gender, national origin, age, marital status, pregnancy, sex, citizenship, education, languages spoken or veteran status. Be yourself, find your people and share the things you love.
Accommodation is available upon request at any point during our recruitment process. If you require an accommodation, please speak to your talent acquisition partner or email us at nextbit@agilebits.com and we’ll work to meet your needs.
Remote work is a part of our DNA. Given that our company was founded remotely in 2005, we can safely say we're experts at building remote culture. That said, remote work at 1Password does mean working from your home country. If you've got questions or concerns about this, your talent partner would be happy to address them with you.
Successful applicants will be required to complete a background check that may consist of prior employment verification, reference checks, education confirmation, criminal background, publicly available social media, credit history, or other information, as permitted by local law.
1Password uses artificial intelligence (AI) and machine learning (ML) technologies, including natural language processing and predictive analytics, to assist in the initial screening of employment applications and improve our recruitment process. See here for the latest third party bias audit information. If you prefer not to have your application assessed using AI/ML features, you may opt out by completing this form. For additional information see our Candidate Privacy Notice.",N/A,https://www.indeed.com/viewjob?jk=153410945f26bca9,False,engineering manager
Cohesity Engineer/Architect,CDW,Remote,remote,2025-06-19,Indeed,"Cohesity Engineer/Architect
Location: Remote
Contract Duration: 6 months, can extend
Pay Rate: $80-85/hr.
Full-time, benefits
****In need of someone who has deep architecture knowledge as well as hands-on experience with Cohesity*****
Design, implement, knows how to run Cohesity environment day to day, as they rolled off VMWare and move to Cohesity.
Expert in recovery
Someone who can help with process, look at what is built and get each of backups into production environment
Job Description: We are seeking a skilled and experienced Cohesity Engineer/Architect to join our team. The ideal candidate will be responsible for designing, implementing, and managing our Cohesity environment on a day-to-day basis as we transition from VMware to Cohesity. This role requires an expert in recovery processes and someone who can help streamline our backup processes and ensure they are effectively integrated into our production environment.
Key Responsibilities:
Design and implement Cohesity solutions to meet business requirements.
Manage and maintain the Cohesity environment on a daily basis.
Collaborate with the team to transition from VMware to Cohesity.
Provide expert-level support for recovery processes.
Work closely with the team in India to ensure seamless operations.
Assist in developing and refining backup processes.
Ensure all backups are successfully integrated into the production environment.
Job Types: Full-time, Contract
Pay: $80.00 - $85.00 per hour
Expected hours: 40 per week
Benefits:
Dental insurance
Health insurance
Referral program
Vision insurance
Compensation Package:
Hourly pay
Schedule:
8 hour shift
Day shift
Monday to Friday
Application Question(s):
Do you have deep architecture knowledge as well as hands-on experience with Cohesity?
Are you open to working a remote 6 month contract position (with possible extensions)?
Experience:
Cohesity: 5 years (Preferred)
Work Location: Remote",N/A,https://www.indeed.com/viewjob?jk=47b21f35f799e029,False,architect
CIAM Architect (Fulltime),PRO IT Inc.,Remote,remote,2025-06-19,Indeed,"CIAM products like CA SiteMinder, PingFederate, PingAccess, Okta, ForgeRock, Entra ID.
Job Type: Full-time
Pay: $140,000.00 - $160,000.00 per year
Benefits:
401(k)
401(k) matching
Dental insurance
Health insurance
Life insurance
Paid time off
Vision insurance
Schedule:
8 hour shift
Monday to Friday
Work Location: Remote",N/A,https://www.indeed.com/viewjob?jk=637202d84fc6ed9e,False,architect
Senior Solution Architect,PS3G Inc.,Remote,remote,2025-06-19,Indeed,"Description:
�Act as a liaison between business and technology. �Oversee the systems solution and ensures that the solution aligns with business goals and processes.�Responsible for the design, implementation, security, and performance of the software. �Lead in designing, specifying and selecting information system solutions, considering functionality, data, security, integration, infrastructure and performance.�Focuses on establishing the best technology solution to meet a specific business need in their area of expertise. �Formulate a design plan that factors technology investments and risks while providing value to the company by improving business processes and eliminating unnecessary complexities. �Plans the technical requirements to transition a design into a working solution. �Ensure that the design is installed, configured and documented correctly. �Assists in recognizing and mitigating any risks to existing business processes or to the solution's overall success.Qualifications:�Advanced Technical degree in Computer Science, Engineering, or related field required.�Able to work with multiple computing platforms.�Experience managing a project from start to finish.
Leading large-scale UKG Pro WFM implementations and providing strategic direction to ensure successful implementation and optimization. Experience as a solution architect for UKG Pro WFM / Dimensions Implementation
Proven track record in providing comprehensive end-to-end implementation solutions from inception to completion, involving requirements gathering, system design, configuration, testing, deployment, staggered rollout and hypercare.
Experience in defining system architecture, , ensuring alignment to business needs and driving technical excellence through this implementation
Expert in UKG Pro WFM modules, including Timekeeper, Accruals, Scheduling, Forecasting, Dell Boomi, and Device Manager. Skilled in customizing these modules to meet specific client needs and improve operational efficiency. Experience in integrating these modules with other enterprise systems to streamline processes and ensure data accuracy.
Deep expertise in UKG Pro WFM, systems integrations and WFM best practices.
Lead the technical configuration of Time tracking, Advanced Scheduling & forecasting, accruals, Analytics & Reports, Dell Boomi Integration, Device Configuration, Mobile configuration and compliance,
Lead the Configuration and Troubleshooting for following modules in UKG Pro - Timekeeper/ Accruals/ Leave/ Attendance/ Attestation/ Advanced Scheduler/ Activities
Lead the design of integrations using Dell Boomi and other integration platforms aligning to the best practices and customer priorities.
Knowledge of product configuration, creating work rules, pay rules, break rules, exception rule etc. Support changes to existing configurations and build new as need basis.
Design and deliver high quality solutions through system configuration that meets overall business requirements.
.•
WHAT YOU BRING TO THE TABLE… (MUST HAVE)
Bachelor's degree in computer science, information-technology, engineering, system analysis or a related study, or equivalent experience.
Knowledge of various aspects of a technology architecture like network, security, and integration. In integration, experience in the use of API integration and web services a must.
5+ years of experience building Workday integrations with Workday Studio, EIB, and Core Connectors.
Proven experience with Dell Boomi platform.
Strong understanding of REST/SOAP APIs, data mapping, and integration concepts.
5+ years of experience developing target state architecture for UKG WorkForce Management and Payroll solution
Prior working experience in developing integration between UKG WorkForce Management solutions and other HRIS systems (i.e., Workday)
Knowledge on integration with multiple platforms like WFM, Workday SAP, Financial systems, skills systems like Aveva, DataLake, etc…
Experience with XML, JSON, and SQL.
Ability to work effectively in a team environment and cross-functional teams
IF WOULD BE GREAT IF YOU HAVE… (NICE TO HAVE)
UKG Pro WFM certifications (highly preferred)
Experience working as a solution architect for Kronos WFC
A self-starter and can deliver and be adaptable in understanding functional and technical requirements.
Excellent analytical and problem-solving skills.
Must have a learner attitude with minimum supervision.
Good written & oral communication skills & strong team player
Strong communication and presentation skills, with the ability to effectively manage customer expectations
Job Type: Contract
Pay: $70.00 per hour
Schedule:
8 hour shift
Application Question(s):
This is a C2C position. Do you have a corporation?
Experience:
Dell Boomi: 4 years (Required)
Kronos: 4 years (Required)
Work Location: Remote",N/A,https://www.indeed.com/viewjob?jk=7535e71f334b23d4,False,architect
Senior Data Architect,Emergent Software,"Remote in Provo, UT",remote,2025-06-19,Indeed,"** This is an opportunity to join our dynamic team of data engineering professionals working to design and implement database projects for our clients. This position is fully remote (indefinitely). **
Emergent Software is seeking a Senior Data Architect who is analytical, passionate, and detail oriented and enjoys designing & building cloud-based data solutions to solve business problems. A qualified candidate has significant experience developing data warehouses and analytical database solutions in Microsoft Azure. This 100% remote position is for self-starters with excellent communication skills, work ethic, and the ability to manage work across numerous clients and priorities.
Highlights & Benefits of working at Emergent Software
Work closely with other talented database professionals & software engineers. Our vetting process means you can count on your team members to know what they are talking about.
Work from home or work remotely from anywhere
Flexible work schedule meaning you can work regular hours or whenever you work best
Work-life balance is essential and highly valued at Emergent Software. If you choose to work more than 40 hours, you’ll be compensated for the extra work!
Work on interesting projects solving complex business problems with custom software.
100 hours per year to focus on your professional development. We invest in your growth!
Profit sharing bonus means as we’re successful, you’re successful
Excellent benefits package including medical insurance, dental, vision, 401(k) matching, FSA, disability, life insurance, and paid parental leave
Azure Data Architect Required Experience
10+ years of database development & architecture experience
5+ years of experience with Azure database projects
Ability to discuss potential data solutions with clients in the pre-sales process
Data warehouse design using medallion architecture and/or snowflake methodologies
Building data solutions in Microsoft Fabric
ETL development using Azure Data Factory
Building analytics solutions using Power BI
Nice to Have Experience
Snowflake
Databricks
Other BI platforms
Relational database design
Stored procedures & queries for OLTP systems
Performance tuning databases and long running queries
Our Vetting Process
At Emergent Software, we work hard to find the best team members capable of contributing high quality work. If you think you’re one of those, please understand that the effort put into this by people like yourself helps us be successful in surrounding you with other top performers. Here are the steps of our vetting process for this position:
Application (5 minutes)
Online Assessment (30-40 minutes)
Initial Phone Interview (30-45 minutes)
Data Architect Challenge (45-60 minutes)
Technical Interview (60-90 minutes)
Final Interview (45-60 minutes)
Job Offer!
Benefits Package Details
Medical Insurance: up to 80% of your monthly medical premium (HSA options available)
HSA Contribution: up to $144/month
Dental & Vision Insurance: up to 50% of your monthly dental and vision premium costs
401(k) plan: company match up to 4% of salary
Profit sharing bonus: up to 15% of salary paid quarterly
Extra compensation: get paid extra for work over 40 hours/week
Employee referral & customer referral bonuses
Flex Spending Account (FSA) for Dependent Care & Healthcare Costs
Dependent Care FSA Contribution: $90/month
Short Term Disability: $500/week for 12 weeks
Long Term Disability: up to $6,000/month
Group term life and AD&D insurance: $50k
PTO, standard holidays, 2 floating holidays
Paid parental leave: 2 weeks
Staff development program: 100 hours/year plus training costs
About Emergent Software
Emergent Software is a fast-growing software development, cloud consulting, and data engineering company serving clients across the country. We are regularly adding to our team of talented software engineers, cloud architects, data engineers, UX designers, technical product owners and more who can help us deliver high quality services for our clients.
We are a remote-first company
Since our inception, we've embraced a remote-friendly culture, promoting work flexibility beyond the norm. When the pandemic struck in 2020, our transition to fully remote work was seamless—just a matter of cleaning out the fridge. Recognizing an opportunity, we adopted a remote-first approach and began hiring talent from anywhere. We continue to offer our signature Minnesota-nice, Midwest-friendly attitude, ensuring everyone feels valued, whether or not they're familiar with the skyway system.
Your career grows with us
Working with talented engineers on interesting projects creates an engaging environment for software development enthusiasts. By working directly with our experienced team, participating in our staff development program, and solving complex problems across a variety of projects, you’ll find numerous opportunities for long-term career growth.
At Emergent Software, your ideas will be heard, you will grow exponentially as a master of your craft, and you will enjoy working other dedicated team members to deliver software solutions for our clients.
Check out what others say
Visit our Glassdoor page to discover how employees enjoy our remote working structure, flexible hours, profit sharing program, and more!
Job Type: Full-time
Pay: $150,000.00 - $185,000.00 per year
Benefits:
401(k)
401(k) matching
Dental insurance
Flexible schedule
Flexible spending account
Health insurance
Health savings account
Life insurance
Paid time off
Parental leave
Professional development assistance
Retirement plan
Vision insurance
Schedule:
8 hour shift
Choose your own hours
Monday to Friday
Overtime
Work Location: Remote",N/A,https://www.indeed.com/viewjob?jk=6a390e227c440485,False,architect
Acquia Cloud Senior Architect - REMOTE,NTT DATA,"Remote in New York, NY 10261",remote,2025-06-19,Indeed,"Req ID: 327931

NTT DATA strives to hire exceptional, innovative and passionate individuals who want to grow with us. If you want to be part of an inclusive, adaptable, and forward-thinking organization, apply now.

We are currently seeking a Acquia Cloud Senior Architect - REMOTE to join our team in New York, New York (US-NY), United States (US).

Day to Day Responsibilities:
Provide oversite and guidance in the design, delivery, and ongoing management of enterprise tier sites
Collaborate with business and technical teams to align digital solutions and operational goals.
Lead the implementation of pathway to production addressing automation, security, observability, compliance, resiliency, and recovery.
Conduct regular audits of such solutions.
Mentor teams, as necessary.

Basic Qualifications:
7+ years building, leading and architecting Drupal applications
3+ years with Acquia cloud platform
3+ years proficiency with PHP, DevSecOps, and related topics as it relates to Drupal on Acquia

Other Preferred Skills:
Strong understanding digital compliance requirements.
Experience implementing SEO optimization strategies using tools like Prerender.
Familiarity with privacy and consent management platforms such as OneTrust.
Experience integrating event tracking and analytics platforms like Freshpaint or Segment.
Experience with security testing tools (e.g., OWASP ZAP, Burp Suite, Acquia Shield).
Knowledge of threat modeling, incident response, and data encryption standards.
Experience designing redundant cloud architectures using Acquia Cloud, AWS, or similar platforms.
Familiarity with HAProxy, CloudFront, Route 53, or other tools for traffic routing and failover.
Hands-on experience with Akamai Edge, Kona Site Defender, or similar CDN/WAF platforms.
Docker, Kubernetes, AWS
Acquia certified Drupal architect

Where required by law, NTT DATA provides a reasonable range of compensation for specific roles. The starting pay range for this remote role is $104,558 - $242,031. This range reflects the minimum and maximum target compensation for the position across all US locations. Actual compensation will depend on a number of factors, including the candidate's actual work location, relevant experience, technical skills, and other qualifications.

INDHCLSMC

About NTT DATA

NTT DATA is a $30 billion trusted global innovator of business and technology services. We serve 75% of the Fortune Global 100 and are committed to helping clients innovate, optimize and transform for long term success. As a Global Top Employer, we have diverse experts in more than 50 countries and a robust partner ecosystem of established and start-up companies. Our services include business and technology consulting, data and artificial intelligence, industry solutions, as well as the development, implementation and management of applications, infrastructure and connectivity. We are one of the leading providers of digital and AI infrastructure in the world. NTT DATA is a part of NTT Group, which invests over $3.6 billion each year in R&D to help organizations and society move confidently and sustainably into the digital future. Visit us at us.nttdata.com

NTT DATA endeavors to make https://us.nttdata.com accessible to any and all users. If you would like to contact us regarding the accessibility of our website or need assistance completing the application process, please contact us at https://us.nttdata.com/en/contact-us. This contact information is for accommodation requests only and cannot be used to inquire about the status of applications. NTT DATA is an equal opportunity employer. Qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, disability or protected veteran status. For our EEO Policy Statement, please click here. If you'd like more information on your EEO rights under the law, please click here. For Pay Transparency information, please click here.",N/A,https://www.indeed.com/viewjob?jk=b5b91152ec4e29b6,False,architect
Principal Enterprise Solutions Architect Strategic Pursuits (RapidScale),Cox Communications,Remote in Maryland,remote,2025-06-19,Indeed,"At RapidScale, exceptional technology is powered by exceptional people. As a growing leader in secure, reliable managed cloud solutions, we help SMBs and enterprises alike simplify IT and unleash innovation. With a broad portfolio spanning AWS, Azure and Google to a full set of Private Cloud and Cybersecurity solutions, RapidScale helps companies turn technology into their biggest competitive advantage. As part of the Cox family of companies, we offer best-in-class benefits, a commitment to work-life balance, and an award-winning workplace experience.

Are you a high-impact cloud architect who thrives on designing complex solutions and guiding executive decision-makers toward transformative outcomes? As a Principal Enterprise Architect - Strategic Pursuits, you'll be a critical member of our new strategic big deal team, working alongside elite account executives to land RapidScale's most significant enterprise opportunities. You'll shape solution strategies for multi-cloud, modernization, and managed services engagements-bringing technical depth, business acumen, and executive presence to every pursuit.

What You'll Do

As the senior solutioning voice in the pursuit, you'll drive the architectural vision, design innovative solutions that align to customer outcomes, and serve as a trusted advisor to executive stakeholders throughout the sales cycle.

Key Responsibilities:
Architect Enterprise-Scale Solutions: Lead the solutioning of complex, multi-tower managed cloud services across AWS, Azure, Google Cloud, Private Cloud, and Cybersecurity. Translate customer business objectives into scalable, secure, and cost-effective architectures.
Pursuit Strategy & Technical Leadership: Partner with strategic account executives to qualify and pursue net-new enterprise logos. Shape deal strategy, participate in executive briefings, and own the solution architecture narrative.
Executive Advisory & Influence: Guide C-level stakeholders (CIOs, CTOs, CISOs) through modernization decisions, risk tradeoffs, and transformation roadmaps. Establish RapidScale as a long-term strategic partner.
Collaborative Solution Development: Work cross-functionally with delivery, product, finance, and legal teams to build and position compelling, feasible, and differentiated solutions. Contribute to proposals, pricing strategy, and SOW creation.
Cloud Partner Collaboration: Engage directly with hyperscalers (AWS, Azure, Google Cloud) and leverage joint programs, incentives, and technical resources to strengthen solution value and co-sell outcomes.
Innovation & IP Development: Contribute to reusable solution assets, reference architectures, and pursuit playbooks. Stay ahead of cloud trends and advise internal teams on market shifts and customer priorities.
Pre-Sales Engineering Leadership: Mentor and guide less senior solution engineers and architects across strategic pursuits, helping to elevate the team's technical credibility and consulting capability.

Minimum Qualifications
Experience & Education: Bachelor's degree and 10+ years of progressive experience in enterprise IT architecture, solution engineering, or technical pre-sales. The right candidate could also have a different combination, such as a master's degree and 8 years' experience; a Ph.D. and 5 years' experience or 14+ years' experience.
Cloud Expertise: Advanced knowledge of cloud platforms (AWS, Azure, Google Cloud), hybrid environments, security models, and enterprise architectures. Active cloud certifications (e.g., AWS Solutions Architect - Professional, Azure Solutions Architect Expert, GCP Cloud Architect) strongly preferred.
Multi-Cloud: Experience across Private Cloud and Public Cloud environments, with a strong track record of helping close complex hybrid multi-cloud enterprise deals in large-scale organizations.
Strategic Deal Experience: Demonstrated success influencing and winning large, complex deals ($10M-$50M+ TCV) as part of a pursuit team. Experience working with global enterprise customers ($500M-$5B+ revenue).
Executive Presence: Proven ability to engage, present to, and build trust with C-suite stakeholders on both technical and business issues.
Solutioning Skills: Expertise in designing managed services solutions that span AI/ML, cloud infrastructure, app modernization, networking, storage, DevOps, security, and compliance.
Travel: Willingness to travel up to 35-40% for executive meetings, workshops, and industry events.

Preferred Qualifications
Familiarity with enterprise AI/ML workloads and how organizations are leveraging generative AI, large language models, and data platforms to transform operations and drive innovation.
Experience working within or selling through hyperscaler partner ecosystems.
Familiarity with key verticals such as Healthcare, Financial Services, SaaS, or Retail.
Experience within a Managed Service Provider (MSP), global systems integrator, or cloud consulting organization.
Strong written communication skills and experience contributing to RFPs, proposals, and customer-facing presentations.

USD 144,900.00 - 241,500.00 per year

Compensation:

Compensation includes a base salary of $144,900.00 - $241,500.00. The base salary may vary within the anticipated base pay range based on factors such as the ultimate location of the position and the selected candidate's knowledge, skills, and abilities. Position may be eligible for additional compensation that may include an incentive program.

Benefits:

The Company offers eligible employees the flexibility to take as much vacation with pay as they deem consistent with their duties, the company's needs, and its obligations; seven paid holidays throughout the calendar year; and up to 160 hours of paid wellness annually for their own wellness or that of family members. Employees are also eligible for additional paid time off in the form of bereavement leave, time off to vote, jury duty leave, volunteer time off, military leave, and parental leave.

Applicants must currently be authorized to work in the United States for any employer without current or future sponsorship.

In California, we will consider non-driving candidates who use alternate means of transportation in accordance with applicable law.

Application Deadline:",N/A,https://www.indeed.com/viewjob?jk=36837ca2cae3a7ed,False,architect
Hiring licensed Professional Engineers (PE) and Registered Architects (RA) - USA,Sargon Engineering,Remote,remote,2025-06-19,Indeed,"We are a US-based engineering and engineering management firm currently hiring engineers for remote positions. We are seeking licensed Professional Engineers (PE) in civil/structural, MEP engineering, mechanical engineering, electrical engineering, plumbing engineering, fire protection engineering, and licensed Architects (RA) with PE and/or RA license credentials in one or more states. If interested, please send us your resume.
Job Types: Part-time, Contract, Temporary
Pay: $40.00 - $50.00 per hour
Work Location: Remote",N/A,https://www.indeed.com/viewjob?jk=87d634c798b9fd64,False,architect
Gateway API Architect,Kalamuna,Remote,remote,2025-06-19,Indeed,"Kalamuna seeks a part-time contractor up to 15-25 hours/week to enhance and support our Tyk.io Gateway API architecture, which is developed using Go and JavaScript. This role involves strategic updates and feature development for our transportation client, as well as upgrades for internal tooling, documentation, and training. This is a remote position with flexible hours with an expectation to meet internal and external deadlines and deliver to specifications within the estimated time.
This role reports to the Director of Technology.
If you’re a recruiter or agency, please don’t contact us.
Responsibilities
Write scalable, robust, testable, efficient, clear, and idiomatic code
Translate software requirements into stable, working, high-performance software.
Ability to research and follow best practices for platforms and frameworks
Ability to refactor code for maintainability and extensibility
Perform upgrades to:
the infrastructure of API Gateway
internal tooling — local Docker environment setup
CI/CD upgrades
Document all of the developed solutions and enhancements
Train internal and external personnel
Requirements and Qualifications
Experience developing GO packages that are scalable and maintainable
Familiar with Golang Plugins
GoLang API development experience
Experience writing clear technical documentation that is easy to follow
Able to audit and find pitfalls in someone else’s code
Experience with CI/CD, namely GitHub actions
Experience setting up or understanding advanced, local Docker-based development environments is a must (preferably Lando)
Demonstrable ability to communicate clearly and effectively with various stakeholders
Nice to have
Has experience with Tyk.io platform or closely comparable open source API gateway platform
Experience with unit testing & test-driven development
Deep understanding of JavaScript tests

Working With Us
People are at the of everything we do.
Kalamuna is driven by a civic spirit to help socially impactful institutions, nonprofits, and governments better communicate with constituents and do right by the people they serve. We bring digital communications to life for organizations as varied as Fair Trade USA, the American Foundation for the Blind, the Environmental Defence Fund, the Smithsonian, UC Berkeley, Stanford, and the Fine Arts Museums of San Francisco.
Kalamuna’s mission is to empower our clients with the research, strategy, design, and technology that will transform their organizations to better serve the needs of their audiences and communities. Kalamuna aligns itself in this manner to make each of our client’s missions our mission. We seek to be impactful, not only for our clients and partners but for the social good of our communities.
We’re committed to your excellence and continued development; we’re in this together. Kalamuna offers many benefits, including paid holidays, PTO, paid bereavement leave, parental leave, health insurance, long and short-term disability, a continued learning & travel stipend, an equipment fund, and retirement funds with 3% match. We offer flexibility in work hours and accommodations. When pandemic-free, we organize company-wide gatherings like team building workshops, conferencing, and additional fun.
We’re looking for individuals with a broad range of interests and experiences to be their authentic selves. Your story, your passion is what interests us most. Meet some of our team at https://youtu.be/K1rtt6oKGEs.
Commitment to Diversity
Kalamuna is committed to eradicating institutional discrimination and bias and to uplifting the lived experiences of all underrepresented communities.
As such, Kalamuna welcomes applications from all backgrounds, particularly from people of color; women; LGBTQ2S+ people; immigrants or refugees; people who are differently-abled; and people from low- or moderate-income backgrounds. Kalamuna is an equal opportunity, affirmative action employer and does not discriminate in its employment decisions on the basis of race, creed, color, ethnicity, national origin, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender expression, age, height, weight, disability status, veteran status, military obligations, marital status and policy party affiliation, or on any other basis that complies with applicable laws.
If you’re a recruiter or agency, please don’t contact us. No exceptions.
x3sXAkoKr5",N/A,https://www.indeed.com/viewjob?jk=b42bf6926d94ddce,False,architect
Data Insights Architect,Patient Access Network Foundation,"Remote in Washington, DC 20005",remote,2025-06-19,Indeed,"A career at the PAN Foundation is an opportunity for you to make a direct impact on the lives of thousands of patients and their families every year. Together, we’re an unstoppable team of dedicated patient champions who work tirelessly toward our vision of a nation where no one goes without treatment due to cost. Join our team and become part of an organization providing life-changing support today!
Position overview
The Data Insights Architect is a key member of the PAN Foundation’s Data Analytics team reporting to the Senior Director of Business Intelligence & Data Analytics. The incumbent will be responsible for architecting, implementing, and scaling data solutions that power the organization's reporting, analytics, and decision-making capabilities to meet the overarching business goals.
The Data Insights Architect brings deep technical expertise in Snowflake, Tableau, Salesforce and data architecture, along with a strong ability to deliver automated, standardized, and high-quality data outputs in an agile working environment.
Working closely with business units and IT leadership, the Data Insights Architect will play a critical role in building a data-driven culture and transforming raw data into clear, actionable insights that align with strategic priorities.
Core Responsibilities
Design, develop, and maintain scalable data architecture and reporting solutions using Snowflake and Tableau.
Produce high-quality, validated, and well-documented data outputs that support executive and operational decision-making.
Conduct regular data quality assessments, troubleshoot discrepancies, and guide corrective actions in collaboration with data owners
Technical/Functional Duties
Automate recurring data processes and pipelines to increase efficiency, reduce manual reporting, and improve data accuracy.
Implement data governance policies and data validation to improve data accuracy and consistency and reliability.
Maintain documentation of data logic, architecture designs, and reporting workflows for scalability and knowledge sharing.
Strategic/Planning Responsibilities
Drive reporting standardization efforts across departments by implementing enterprise-wide data definitions and metric governance.
Partner with the Senior Director and other IT teams to evolve the Enterprise Data Warehouse and ensure alignment with long-term data strategy.
Stay current on industry trends and emerging tools in data architecture and visualization to inform continuous improvement.
Strategic/Planning Responsibilities
Collaborate with business stakeholders to gather and analyze requirements, data flows, data structures and iterate on solutions in an agile development cycle.
Supervisory/Leadership Duties
Lead initiatives to improve data literacy, self-service reporting, and BI adoption across the organization.
Provide technical leadership and mentoring to analysts and developers on best practices in data modeling, visualization, and automation.
We are currently accepting applications from AL, AZ, DC, FL, GA, IN, LA, MD, MI, MO, NC, SC, TN, TX, VA, and WI.
Education
Bachelor’s Degree Required, in Data Science, Computer Science, Information Systems, or a related field preferred or equivalent experience required. Master’s Degree preferred.
Work experience
5+ years of experience in business intelligence, data engineering, or analytics roles, preferably within IT at Non-Profit or Healthcare organizations.
Skills
Advanced expertise in Snowflake and Tableau (including dashboard development, data blending, and performance optimization).
Strong product knowledge of Salesforce is required
Strong command of SQL, including complex queries, CTEs, and performance tuning.
Proven experience in designing and implementing automated reporting and ETL/ELT workflows.
Familiarity with agile methodologies, sprint planning, and iterative delivery.
Understanding of enterprise data warehousing concepts, data governance, and metadata management.
Excellent communication skills with the ability to explain complex technical concepts to non-technical stakeholders.
Experience in healthcare, nonprofit, or related domains is a plus.
Knowledge of scripting or statistical tools such as Python, R, or SAS is a plus.
Travel
None at this time
We are an equal opportunity employer, and all qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, disability status, protected veteran status, or any other characteristic protected by law.
PAN recognizes that caring for our team is the most vital component to our long-term success. That’s why we offer a competitive benefits package for all eligible employees—including medical, dental, and vision insurance, a 401k with employer match, and generous paid time off — and are dedicated to fostering a diverse team and equitable work environment for all. Join our team and become part of an organization providing life-changing support today!
Benefits
Medical, dental, and vision insurance.
Generous paid time off (PTO): including annual preventative health screening, annual mental health days, and 12 observed annual paid holidays.
401k with employer match up to 4%.
Flexible Spending Accounts (medical & dependent care).
Health Savings Account (HSA) with High Deductible Medical Plan.
Voluntary Benefits (Supplemental Life Insurance, Critical Illness, Accident Insurance, Accidental Death and Dismemberment (AD&D) & Pet Insurance and discounts).
Employer Paid Benefits (Basic Life Insurance, Short-Term and Long-Term Disability, AD&D).
Employee Assistance Program (EAP).
Additional perks
100% remote work.
Work-life balance with set core organizational hours from 9:00 am to 5:30 pm EST.
Tuition and professional development reimbursement.
New employee referral bonuses up to $1,000.
PAN’s Core Organizational Values are Dignity, Excellence, Integrity, and Intention.
About the PAN Foundation
As an independent, national 501(c)(3) organization, the PAN Foundation’s mission is to accelerate access to affordable, equitable healthcare through financial assistance, advocacy, and education.
Through our charitable assistance programs, advocacy efforts, and education initiatives, we remove barriers to treatment, champion policies that expand access to care, and help improve health outcomes for thousands of people each year—across a broad range of health conditions.
Compliance Commitment
PAN is dedicated to conducting its business ethically and in full compliance with all applicable federal and state laws and regulations, its Advisory Opinion from the Office of Inspector General (OIG), the PAN Code of Conduct (“Code”), and internal policies and procedures (collectively, “Compliance”).
All employees are expected to:
Follow all Compliance standards in their daily work.
Read, understand, and adhere to the Code of Conduct and related policies.
Complete required Compliance and ethics training.
Promptly report any Compliance concerns to a supervisor, management, Human Resources, the Compliance Office, or the Integrity Line.
We are an equal opportunity employer, and all qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, disability status, protected veteran status, or any other characteristic protected by law.",N/A,https://www.indeed.com/viewjob?jk=86fe03829cae9591,False,architect
Frontend Architect,Steer,"Remote in Boston, MA",remote,2025-06-19,Indeed,"Steer offers a suite of software tools for today's automotive repair shop. We combine a mix of software tools that a repair shop needs to run a highly profitable shop, in one user-friendly, cost-effective platform. Through the Steer CRM suite, we allow the shop owner to get back to focusing on what matters, and to stop worrying about marketing and customer retention.
Steer began as an online directory for drivers to find a local mechanic. Fast forward to today, Steer has launched a complete Customer Relationship Management (CRM) marketing suite, complete with text messaging, email automation, direct mail integration, reputation management, appointment reminders, declined/recommended services, and many other features. We are always innovating and we are proud to be a leader in the automotive repair industry. In August 2024 Steer acquired AutoOps - the leader in modern, intelligent, and fully integrated scheduling software for auto repair shops. AutoOps allows customers to smoothly schedule through a shop's website and Google Business Profile.

About the Role
We're looking for a hands-on, code-first Frontend Architect to lead the evolution of our user interfaces and frontend infrastructure. You will play a pivotal role in shaping the technical direction of our platform's frontend - ensuring scalability, performance, and maintainability. This role combines hands-on technical leadership with the opportunity to mentor fellow engineers and shape best practices that promote high-quality code and continuous improvement. If you're passionate about building exceptional user experiences with modern web technologies and enjoy collaborating in a dynamic environment, this is the perfect opportunity for you.

This role can be remote out of the East Coast (US) or hybrid in Waltham, MA.

You Will:
Technical Leadership: Define and drive the frontend architectural vision and strategy for Steer's products.
Code Quality & Standards: Establish and enforce frontend coding standards, best practices, and guidelines to ensure high-quality, consistent, and maintainable code across the team.
Collaboration & Mentorship: Work closely with product managers, designers, and backend engineers to translate requirements into robust frontend solutions. Mentor and educate other frontend engineers on new technologies, architectural patterns, and best practices.
Design System: Champion scalable and reusable frontend components and libraries that bridge between the design system and customer experience.


You Have

Must Have:
7+ years of professional frontend development experience, with at least 2+ years in a technical leadership or architectural role.
Deep understanding and hands-on experience with React JS and the React ecosystem.
Solid grasp of HTML5, CSS3 (including preprocessors like Sass/LESS), and core JavaScript (ES6+) / Typescript.
Proven experience designing and implementing scalable and maintainable frontend architectures (e.g., component-based architecture, state management patterns, module federation, micro-frontends).
Proficiency with frontend build tools (Webpack, Vite, Parcel), package managers (npm, yarn), version control (Git), and testing frameworks (Jest, Cypress, Playwright).
Excellent communication and English fluency, with a proven ability to collaborate effectively with cross-functional teams and mentor other engineers.
Nice to Have:
SaaS experience.
Familiarity with backend technologies (e.g., Node.js, Python, Ruby).
Understanding of UI/UX design principles.
Experience with CI/CD pipelines and deployment methodologies.

Interview Process
Initial Screen (30 min)
Hiring Manager Interview (45 min)
Technical Interview (45 min)
Leadership Interview (30 min) + Career Journey Interview (60 min)
Product/Design Interview (45 min)
Reference Checks

We Offer:
100% employer paid medical insurance
Flexible PTO with 15 days minimum
FSA and HSA options
Generous Parental Leave
401k
Learning Stipend
WFH Equipment
Chance to work with the latest technology
A collaborative and innovative work culture
Opportunities for career growth and development

Why Join Steer?

At Steer, we align our mission of transforming the auto repair experience for shop owners and their customers with your passion for growth, innovation, and excellence.
Here, you'll find opportunities to expand your skills, take on career-shaping challenges, and contribute to the future of the auto repair industry, all while enjoying comprehensive benefits and flexible work arrangements to support your well-being.
Join Steer to be part of a forward-thinking, flexible, and collaborative culture where you are empowered to do meaningful and impactful work.




We value diversity and believe that forming teams in which everyone can be their authentic self is key to our success. We welcome applications from those with diverse backgrounds and industries.
Our hiring process looks beyond just credentials. The school you went to at 18 doesn't define your potential to thrive and enrich our culture. Even if you don't meet every requirement, we invite you to apply.",N/A,https://www.indeed.com/viewjob?jk=60703c9c677c06e2,False,architect
Solutions Architect (contract),KPMG,Remote,remote,2025-06-19,Indeed,"KPMG is working through its partnership with MBO Partners and is currently seeking a remote contractor in the United States.

KPMG Assignment Select is geared toward independent professionals interested in temporary or project-based . Our team is comprised of highly trained third-party professional individuals who are in the right place, at the right time, with the right skillset.

Responsibilities:
Collaborate with clients, business analysts, and development teams to understand business requirements and translate them into technical solutions.
Design and develop end-to-end architecture for complex software systems, ensuring scalability, reliability, and security.
Evaluate and select appropriate technologies, frameworks, and tools to meet project requirements.
Create architectural blueprints, diagrams, and documentation to communicate the solution design to stakeholders.
Assist development teams throughout the software development lifecycle.
Conduct regular code reviews and provide technical guidance to ensure adherence to architectural standards.
Identify and mitigate technical risks and issues, ensuring timely resolution.
Stay up-to-date with industry trends and emerging technologies, providing recommendations for continuous improvement.
Act with integrity, professionalism, and personal responsibility to uphold the firm’s respectful and courteous work environment.
Qualifications:
Bachelor's degree in Computer Science, Engineering, or a related field (Master's degree preferred).
Proven experience as a Solution Architect or similar role, with a strong background in software development.
In-depth knowledge of software architecture principles, design patterns, and best practices.
Proficiency in multiple programming languages and frameworks, such as Java, .NET, Python, or JavaScript.
Experience with cloud platforms (e.g., AWS, Azure, Google Cloud) and microservices architecture.

Must be authorized to work in the U.S. without the need for employment-based visa sponsorship now or in the future. KPMG LLP will not sponsor applicants for U.S. work visa status for this opportunity (no sponsorship is available for H-1B, L-1, TN, O-1, E-3, H-1B1, F-1, J-1, OPT, CPT or any other employment-based visa)

KPMG complies with all local/state regulations in regard to displaying pay rate ranges. The pay rate range(s) displayed is/are specifically for those contracted who will perform work in or reside in the location(s) listed below, if selected for the role. Pay is determined based on a variety of factors including market data, ranges, applicant's skills and prior relevant experience, certain degrees and certifications (e.g. JD, technology), and specific location, for example. Additionally, applicants may be required to apply and become employed by a service provider utilized by KPMG, and final pay rate(s) and/or eligibility for additional benefits may be determined by such provider.

KPMG and MBO Partners are equal opportunity employers/contractors. All qualified applicants are considered without regard to race, color, creed, religion, age, sex/gender, national origin, ancestry, citizenship status, marital status, sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, disability, physical or mental handicap unrelated to ability, pregnancy, veteran status, unfavorable discharge from military service, genetic information, or other legally protected status.

Los Angeles County applicants: Material job duties for this position are listed above. Criminal history may have a direct, adverse, and negative relationship with some of the material job duties of this position. These include the duties and responsibilities listed above, as well as the abilities to adhere to company policies, exercise sound judgment, effectively manage stress and work safely and respectfully with others, exhibit trustworthiness, and safeguard business operations and company reputation. Pursuant to the California Fair Chance Act, Los Angeles County Fair Chance Ordinance for Employers, Fair Chance Initiative for Hiring Ordinance, and San Francisco Fair Chance Ordinance, we will consider for employment qualified applicants with arrest and conviction records.

Pay Rate Range

Min Pay Rate
Max Pay Rate
Currency
Unit

80
110
USD
hourly",N/A,https://www.indeed.com/viewjob?jk=39ec20261182b8d7,False,architect
SQL Architect/Developer,"Distributed Solutions, Inc.",Remote,remote,2025-06-19,Indeed,"Distributed Solutions, Inc. (DSI) is a fast-growing company seeking highly motivated SQL Architect/Developer to build and implement functional software solutions that thrive in a fast-paced, agile environment, including the ability to engage in open and animated peer review sessions, able to change direction quickly, and an eagerness to learn new technologies.
All DSI development staff have full exposure to DSI's platform (AEON), which allows our employees to learn and work across multiple functional areas, including UI/UX, business layer, database design, and application architecture.
The selected candidate can be located locally in Reston, VA, or remotely.

SQL Architect/Developer Responsibilities
Designing, developing, and maintaining databases
Writing complex SQL queries for data retrieval and manipulation
Optimizing database performance and ensuring data integrity
Database integration with Entity Framework code base
Troubleshooting and resolving database-related issues
Collaborating with cross-functional teams to gather requirements and implement solutions.
Creating and maintaining database documentation
Implementing and maintaining database security measures
SQL Architect/developer Qualifications
To excel as an SQL Architect/developer, candidates should possess a combination of relevant education, technical skills, and experience. Qualifications for this position typically include:
Bachelor’s degree in computer science, Engineering, Software Engineering, or related field.
Expert knowledge of SQL and database concepts
Familiarity with performance tuning and query optimization
Knowledge of data modeling and database design principles
Entity Framework development experience
Soft Skills:
Problem-solving competencies
Attention to detail and strong analytical thinking
Ability to work effectively in a fast-paced environment, both independently and as part of a team
Excellent communication and collaboration skills
Hard Skills:
5-7 years of experience with SQL Server design and programming, including stored procedure development
Working understanding of SQL, SSL Certificates, and Single Sign-configurations
Experience with Entity Framework
Experience with Windows Environment and Visual Studio
Experience with .NET, C#, SaaS, and Scrum / Agile methodologies
Good verbal / written communication with all levels of management
Able to multitask and manage time efficiently
Ability to work independently and in a team
Deep understanding of database design principles
Knowledge of extract, transformation, and load (ETL) processes
Experience with data modeling
Proficiency in writing complex queries
Track record of optimizing database performance
DSI is a leading provider of knowledge-driven software solutions and subject matter consulting services that address the needs of acquisition professionals. We offer a fun, casual, collaborative working environment for individuals interested in conquering technology barriers, learning by doing, and taking pride in developing superior software manufactured in the USA.
Distributed Solutions, Inc. is an equal opportunity employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, sexual orientation, gender identity, disability, or protected veteran status.
0iEVPrB7Bm",N/A,https://www.indeed.com/viewjob?jk=50c9aa1985e392b7,False,architect
Agentic Technical Architect,Atrium AI,Remote,remote,2025-06-19,Indeed,"Unlock yourself. Take your career to the next level.
At Atrium, we live and deliver at the intersection of industry strategy, intelligent platforms, and data science, empowering our customers to maximize the power of their data to solve their most complex challenges. We have a unique understanding of the role data plays in the world today and serve as market leaders of intelligent solutions. Our data-driven, industry-specific approach to business transformation for our customers places us uniquely in the market.
Who are you?
You are smart, collaborative, and take ownership to get things done. You love to learn and are intellectually curious in business and technology tools, platforms, and languages. You are energized by solving complex problems and bored when you don’t have something to do. You love working in teams and are passionate about pulling your weight to make sure the team succeeds.
What will you be doing at Atrium?
In this role, you will join the best and brightest in the industry to skillfully push the boundaries of what’s possible by uncovering predictive insights. You will work with customers to make smarter decisions through innovative problem-solving using AI, Analytics, and systems of intelligence. You will partner to advise, implement, and optimize solutions through industry expertise, leading cloud platforms, and data science.
As an Agentic Architect, you will drive the development and implementation of our Agentic AI initiatives. In this role, you will be a key player in designing, building, and scaling intelligent agents that deliver tangible business value. You will lead a team of talented engineers, providing technical guidance and architectural oversight and fostering a culture of innovation.
The ideal candidate should possess a strong understanding of Agentic AI principles, hands-on experience building practical agent applications, and a passion for pushing the boundaries of AI technology.
In this role, you will:
Design and implement scalable and robust architectures for Agentic AI systems
Define and enforce best practices for agent development, deployment, and monitoring
Provide technical leadership and mentorship to a team of engineers
Lead technical design and code reviews
Collaborate with product managers and stakeholders to define project scope and requirements
Develop and implement agent-based solutions for real-world applications
Utilise frameworks and tools such as Google Vertex AI, LangChain, or Anthropic Claude to build and deploy agents
Experiment with and evaluate different agent architectures, techniques, and models
Troubleshoot and resolve complex technical issues related to agent performance and reliability
Hands-on creation of tools that help in agent creation and management
Stay up-to-date with the latest advancements in Agentic AI and related fields
Evaluate and recommend new technologies and tools to enhance our agent capabilities
Conduct research and experimentation to explore novel applications of Agentic AI
Document and share knowledge and best practices within the team and organisation
Foster a collaborative and supportive team environment
Communicate effectively with both technical and non-technical stakeholders
Drive continuous improvement in the team's processes and workflows
In this role, you will have:
8+ Years of professional experience in software development with a focus on AI/ML
Minimum of 1 year of hands-on experience building and deploying Agentic AI applications
Strong understanding of Agentic AI concepts, including planning, reasoning, and execution
Experience with Google Vertex AI, Anthropic Claude or LangChain is required
Experience with cloud platforms, specifically GCP
Strong proficiency and hands-on experience in Python
Experience with AI/ML frameworks and libraries (e.g., TensorFlow, PyTorch)
Strong problem-solving and analytical skills
Excellent communication and collaboration skills
Ability to lead and mentor a team of engineers
Experience with natural language processing (NLP) and large language models (LLMs)
Experience with reinforcement learning
Experience with developing and deploying AI-powered APIs
Experience with Vector Databases
Experience bringing a product to market, ideally an agent or agentic solution
Master's or Bachelor's degree in Computer Science, Artificial Intelligence, or a related field
Next Steps:
Our recruitment process is highly personalised. Some candidates complete the hiring process in one week, others may take longer, as it’s important we find the right position for you. It's all about timing and can be a journey as we continue to learn about one another. We want to get to know you and encourage you to be selective - after all, deciding to join a company is a big decision!
At Atrium, we believe a diverse workforce allows us to match our growth ambitions and drive inclusion across the business. We are an equal opportunity employer, and all qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment.",N/A,https://www.indeed.com/viewjob?jk=9886098feb93ce41,False,architect
Architect 1,"SSOE, Inc.","Remote in Hillsboro, OR 97124",remote,2025-06-19,Indeed,"Overview:
You don't have to be an employee long before you understand the SSOE difference. It goes back to our history of reinventing ourselves for new markets, serious rates of growth year after year, and being ahead of the curve in technology. Those are the achievements of a company that rewards talent and effort in ways that mean the most to the individual.

When you work at SSOE, you work with the best and you're a part of something bigger than yourself. And providing the best possible workplace for our employees gives us a competitive advantage - helping us attract and retain top talent and drive better business results.
Responsibilities:
The following duties are typical of the position, but are not all encompassing. Responsibilities include those required to deliver quality service on schedule and within budget in a team environment.
Completes entry level assignments designed to develop professional work knowledge and abilities.
Applies academic knowledge and training in the use of various building materials and systems.
Works under the direction of a project architect; receives specific and detailed instruction as to required tasks and results.
Performs elementary architectural assignments and generally works from designs of others, compiles data, performs simple design studies and evaluations, estimates quantity take-offs, and assists in preparation of cost estimates with increasing responsibility based on performance.
Drafts own and others designs into completed working drawings.
May be assisted by a CADD designer but usually assumes no responsibility for direction of others.
Travel required.
Valid driver's license required. May be waived for international assignments.
Qualifications:
Bachelor of Architecture Degree or Master of Architecture Degree required
License track preferred
With little or no practical working experience.
Exceptions may be based upon equivalencies.
Pay range: $55,139 - $69,582.",N/A,https://www.indeed.com/viewjob?jk=f565e0ceeed8a7cf,False,architect
Solution Architect,Logicalis,Remote,remote,2025-06-19,Indeed,"Job Description
Summary
Provides pre-sales technical engineering support to Account Executives and clients as integral part of full sales process. Focuses on technical solutions for mid-size and enterprise accounts and works closely with clients to determine how Logicalis solutions can best serve their needs.
Essential Duties and Responsibilities
Produces accurate designs and proposals for clients using Logicalis technologies, services, and methodologies.

Conducts assessments, studies, and/or surveys to obtain data; analyzes data to advise and recommend solutions.

Qualifies, from technical perspective, new business opportunities or requirements within existing and prospective clients to ensure alignment with target markets, portfolio, and delivery and lifecycle services capabilities.

Writes Statements of Work (SOWs) for Logicalis Professional Services.

Designs and configures complex solution components.

Proposes elements, configurations, and implementation details of solution.

Prepares for and conducts client proof of concepts.

Prepares and performs product demonstrations.

Broadens engagements with clients by promoting, defining, and positioning Logicalis services from entire portfolio as appropriate to client requirements.

Advises service delivery team to ensure successful implementation of solutions.

Helps clients understand solution benefits.

Interfaces with vendor and manufacturer teams.

Provides product and/or solution training for Logicalis Sales teams and clients.

Mentors Logicalis team members.

Participates in increasingly complex client projects.

Keeps abreast of latest solutions and services Logicalis offers.

Establishes relationships with clients by demonstrating strong listening skills.

Builds credibility and trust by delivering what has been promised within established timeframes.

Participates in regional and national events and regional team meetings.

Demonstrates and actively promotes an understanding and commitment to the mission of Logicalis through performing behaviors consistent with the organization's values.

Maintains a working knowledge of applicable Federal, State, and Local laws and regulations as well as policies and procedures of Logicalis in order to ensure adherence in a manner that reflects honest, ethical and professional behaviors.

Supports and conducts self in a manner consistent with customer service expectations.
Supervisory Responsibilities
This job has no supervisory responsibilities.
Qualifications
To be successful in this role, an individual must be able to perform in a satisfactory manner the functions listed below. The requirements listed are representative of the knowledge, skills, and/or abilities required. We will make reasonable accommodations to enable individuals with disabilities to perform these functions.
Education/Experience/Technical Requirements/Certifications
Education
Bachelor’s degree in computer science, business, management disciplines, or related field.
Experience / Technical Requirements
4 years in technical pre-sales role with experience in:

Subject matter expert in implementation planning, design and support of Cisco Unified Communications solutions.

Prefer experience with Microsoft Communications solutions along with its integration into Cisco Unified Communications solutions.

Designing Cisco Data Center switching, routing and campus wireless solutions would be a benefit

Designing Cisco Security, Voice / Video Solutions would be a benefit

Cisco Commerce tools (CCW) and other solution design tools.

Experience developing enterprise-wide solutions.

Experience combining products and services into technology solutions that meet client’s business needs.

Experience in business case development.

Consulting background focused on Cisco solutions.

Cisco technical background – particularly around Core Route/Switch technologies.

Proficient use of all Microsoft Office applications.
May consider an equivalent combination of education and experience.
Certifications
CCIE Certification in Collaboration is preferred or Cisco Certified Network Professional Collaboration (CCNP) with presales experience
Other Skills or Abilities
Excellent written and verbal skills; confidently and professionally interacts with external clients and internal teams.

Excellent time and prioritization management; multitasks to accommodate requests from multiple customers and Logicalis Account Executives.

Excellent problem solving, decision making, and analytical skills.

Ability to manage complex projects.

Ability to communicate technical concepts in clear, easy-to-follow manner.

Ability to translate client requirements into appropriate technology solutions that meet customer business needs.

Ability to act quickly to changing environments.

Ability to travel nationally to meet with clients.

Participates proactively in own career development.
Physical Demands
The physical demands described here are representative of those that must be met by an employee to successfully perform essential functions of this job. Reasonable accommodations may be made to enable individuals with disabilities to perform essential functions.
While performing duties of this Job, employee is constantly required to sit, talk, see, hear, and use hands and arms. Employees are frequently required to stand; move about, climb steps or balance and stoop, kneel, crouch, or crawl. Employees must occasionally lift and/or move up to 10 pounds.
The above statements describe the general nature and level of work being performed by individuals assigned to this classification. This is not intended to be an exhaustive list of all responsibilities/duties required of personnel so classified.
Salary Compensation Range: $99,000 to $134,000 plus commission.

Job Snapshot
Employee Type:
Full-Time
Location:
Work From Home
Job Type:
Other
Experience:
Not Specified
Date Posted:
6/19/2025",N/A,https://www.indeed.com/viewjob?jk=e9e7b04f205acd23,False,architect







Staff Software Engineer - AI Trainer,DataAnnotation,"Remote in Baltimore, MD",remote,2025-06-19,Indeed,"We are looking for proficient programmers to join our team to train our AI chatbots to code. You will work with the chatbots that we are building in order to measure their progress, as well as write and evaluate code.
To apply to this role, you will need to be proficient in either Python and/or JavaScript. Your role will require proficiency in at least one programming language/framework (JavaScript, TypeScript, Python, C, C#, C++, HTML/CSS, React, Go, Java, Kotlin, SQL, or Swift) in order to solve coding problems (think LeetCode, HackerRank, etc). For each coding problem, you must be able to explain how your solution solves the problem.
As part of the application process, you will be asked to complete an assessment. If you pass, you will gain access to projects. Based on the quality of your work, you will continue to receive projects regularly. We find our most successful candidates work between 5-20 hours per week, up to 40 hours.
Benefits:
This is a full-time or part-time REMOTE position
You’ll be able to choose which projects you want to work on
You can work on your own schedule
Projects are paid hourly, with bonuses on high-quality and high-volume work
Responsibilities:
Come up with diverse problems and solutions for a coding chatbot
Write high-quality answers and code snippets
Evaluate code quality produced by AI models for correctness and performance
Qualifications:
Fluency in English
Proficient in either Python and/or JavaScript
Detail-oriented
Excellent writing and grammar skills
A bachelor's degree (completed or in progress)
Note: Payment is made via PayPal. We will never ask for any money from you.
#INDUSSD
Job Type: Contract
Pay: From $40.00 per hour
Benefits:
Flexible schedule
Work Location: Remote",N/A,https://www.indeed.com/viewjob?jk=d10c42a73ca25066,False,software engineer
Software Engineer - AI Trainer,DataAnnotation,"Remote in Tysons Corner, VA",remote,2025-06-19,Indeed,"We are looking for proficient programmers to join our team to train our AI chatbots to code. You will work with the chatbots that we are building in order to measure their progress, as well as write and evaluate code.
To apply to this role, you will need to be proficient in either Python and/or JavaScript. Your role will require proficiency in at least one programming language/framework (JavaScript, TypeScript, Python, C, C#, C++, HTML/CSS, React, Go, Java, Kotlin, SQL, or Swift) in order to solve coding problems (think LeetCode, HackerRank, etc). For each coding problem, you must be able to explain how your solution solves the problem.
As part of the application process, you will be asked to complete an assessment. If you pass, you will gain access to projects. Based on the quality of your work, you will continue to receive projects regularly. We find our most successful candidates work between 5-20 hours per week, up to 40 hours.
Benefits:
This is a full-time or part-time REMOTE position
You’ll be able to choose which projects you want to work on
You can work on your own schedule
Projects are paid hourly, with bonuses on high-quality and high-volume work
Responsibilities:
Come up with diverse problems and solutions for a coding chatbot
Write high-quality answers and code snippets
Evaluate code quality produced by AI models for correctness and performance
Qualifications:
Fluency in English
Proficient in either Python and/or JavaScript
Detail-oriented
Excellent writing and grammar skills
A bachelor's degree (completed or in progress)
Note: Payment is made via PayPal. We will never ask for any money from you.
#INDUSSD
Job Type: Contract
Pay: From $40.00 per hour
Benefits:
Flexible schedule
Work Location: Remote",N/A,https://www.indeed.com/viewjob?jk=b7d7038d2f074274,False,software engineer
Staff Software Engineer - AI Trainer,DataAnnotation,Remote in Colorado,remote,2025-06-19,Indeed,"We are looking for proficient programmers to join our team to train our AI chatbots to code. You will work with the chatbots that we are building in order to measure their progress, as well as write and evaluate code.
To apply to this role, you will need to be proficient in either Python and/or JavaScript. Your role will require proficiency in at least one programming language/framework (JavaScript, TypeScript, Python, C, C#, C++, HTML/CSS, React, Go, Java, Kotlin, SQL, or Swift) in order to solve coding problems (think LeetCode, HackerRank, etc). For each coding problem, you must be able to explain how your solution solves the problem.
As part of the application process, you will be asked to complete an assessment. If you pass, you will gain access to projects. Based on the quality of your work, you will continue to receive projects regularly. We find our most successful candidates work between 5-20 hours per week, up to 40 hours.
Benefits:
This is a full-time or part-time REMOTE position
You’ll be able to choose which projects you want to work on
You can work on your own schedule
Projects are paid hourly, with bonuses on high-quality and high-volume work
Responsibilities:
Come up with diverse problems and solutions for a coding chatbot
Write high-quality answers and code snippets
Evaluate code quality produced by AI models for correctness and performance
Qualifications:
Fluency in English
Proficient in either Python and/or JavaScript
Detail-oriented
Excellent writing and grammar skills
A bachelor's degree (completed or in progress)
Note: Payment is made via PayPal. We will never ask for any money from you.
#INDUSSD
Job Type: Contract
Pay: From $40.00 per hour
Benefits:
Flexible schedule
Work Location: Remote",N/A,https://www.indeed.com/viewjob?jk=50bb60000291ad40,False,software engineer
Software Engineer,Blueprint Technologies,"Remote in Redmond, WA",remote,2025-06-19,Indeed,"Who is Blueprint?
We are a technology solutions firm headquartered in Bellevue, Washington, with a strong presence across the United States. Unified by a shared passion for solving complicated problems, our people are our greatest asset. We use technology as a tool to bridge the gap between strategy and execution, powered by the knowledge, skills, and expertise of our teams, who all have unique perspectives and years of experience across multiple industries. We're bold, smart, agile, and fun.
What does Blueprint do?
Blueprint helps organizations unlock value from existing assets by leveraging cutting-edge technology to create additional revenue streams and new lines of business. We connect strategy, business solutions, products, and services to transform and grow companies.
Why Blueprint?
At Blueprint, we believe in the power of possibility and are passionate about bringing it to life. Whether you join our bustling product division, our multifaceted services team or you want to grow your career in human resources, your ability to make an impact is amplified when you join one of our teams. You'll focus on solving unique business problems while gaining hands-on experience with the world's best technology. We believe in unique perspectives and build teams of people with diverse skillsets and backgrounds. At Blueprint, you'll have the opportunity to work with multiple clients and teams, such as data science and product development, all while learning, growing, and developing new solutions. We guarantee you won't find a better place to work and thrive than at Blueprint.
In this role:
As a Software Engineer, you will contribute to high-impact, large-scale initiatives across device supply chain, manufacturing, fulfillment, and services. You'll work in a dynamic operations technology team focused on optimizing and modernizing systems through cloud-native solutions and intelligent automation. This role emphasizes hands-on engineering, API development, Azure integration, and live site support — all critical to ensuring efficiency, scalability, and resilience in complex device operations.
Responsibilities:
Design, develop, test, and maintain scalable systems and applications in a cloud environment.
Modify and optimize existing databases and API systems for performance and reliability.
Collaborate with cross-functional teams to define project scope, timelines, and deliverables.
Write detailed logical and physical database descriptions and guide others in implementation.
Review technical requirements and project requests to assess feasibility, time, and cost.
Build, deploy, and manage RESTful APIs using C# and Azure-native tools.
Support production systems with proactive monitoring, troubleshooting, and incident resolution.
Integrate AI services (e.g., Azure Cognitive Services, Azure OpenAI) to enhance system capabilities.
Contribute to live site engineering practices, including telemetry, alerting, and system reliability strategies.
Required Qualifications:
Experience: Minimum of 8–10 years of software engineering experience.
Cloud Expertise: Strong hands-on knowledge of Microsoft Azure services, including:
Azure App Services
Azure Functions
Azure Storage
Azure Key Vault
Azure DevOps
Programming Skills: Advanced proficiency in C#, with a proven track record of developing and maintaining RESTful APIs.
Database & API Design: Experience with logical and physical database design and modification.
Systems Knowledge: Solid understanding of computer hardware and software fundamentals.
Full SDLC Understanding: Knowledge of the entire software development lifecycle, from requirements gathering to deployment and maintenance.
Live Production Support: Demonstrated experience supporting live systems, including root cause analysis and performance tuning.
Preferred Qualifications:
Experience with development tools such as SQL and Visual Basic.
Familiarity with prompt engineering and integration of Azure AI services into enterprise applications.
Ability to work independently in fast-paced environments.
Strong communication and interpersonal skills.
Mentoring capabilities to support junior engineers or team members.
Salary Range
Pay ranges vary based on multiple factors including, without limitation, skill sets, education, responsibilities, experience, and geographical market. The pay range for this position reflects geographic based ranges for Washington state: $120,000 to $130,000 USD/annually. The salary/wage and job title for this opening will be based on the selected candidate's qualifications and experience and may be outside this range.
Equal Opportunity Employer
Blueprint Technologies, LLC is an equal employment opportunity employer. Qualified applicants are considered without regard to race, color, age, disability, sex, gender identity or expression, orientation, veteran/military status, religion, national origin, ancestry, marital, or familial status, genetic information, citizenship, or any other status protected by law.
If you need assistance or a reasonable accommodation to complete the application process, please reach out to: recruiting@bpcs.com
Blueprint believe in the importance of a healthy and happy team, which is why our comprehensive benefits package includes:
Medical, dental, and vision coverage
Flexible Spending Account
401k program
Competitive PTO offerings
Parental Leave
Opportunities for professional growth and development",N/A,https://www.indeed.com/viewjob?jk=4b46c9bf3ffca92c,False,software engineer
Backend Software Engineer,Jorie AI,Remote,remote,2025-06-19,Indeed,"About Jorie:
Jorie AI, occupies a uniquely interconnected position at the center of the healthcare industry. An inseparable part of today's healthcare billing ecosystem, with leading edge technology that is driving transformation with AI infused Robotic Process Automation for end-to-end Revenue Cycle Management, providing practice and financial management services to the healthcare industry. Applied Intelligence, Better Insight, Accelerated Efficiencies with Jorie AI.

Our work environment:
Remote opportunities
Growth advancement opportunities
Flexible work environment (Work-life Balance)
Collaborative and friendly company culture

Great Benefits:
401(k) matching up to 4%
Medical
Dental
Vision
Long/Short Term Disability insurance
Life insurance $25,000 Paid by employer
PTO 2 weeks
10 and half Holidays

Job Title: Backend Software Engineer
Job Overview:
This role offers the opportunity to drive a technical vision and make a significant impact on a new product from day one. If you are passionate about building high-quality software and leading teams to success, we encourage you to apply.
We are seeking skilled Backend Software Engineers to join our development team, working closely with our Lead Full Stack Software Engineer. You will be responsible for designing, developing, and maintaining robust, scalable, and secure backend services for a new web application. This role focuses on building efficient server-side logic, integrating with databases, and developing RESTful APIs to power our frontend experiences. You will collaborate with front-end engineers, DevOps, and other stakeholders to deliver high-quality solutions that meet business and user needs.

Responsibilities:

Design, develop, and maintain backend services and APIs using Flask or Django and Python.
Build and optimize database models, queries, and stored procedures using MS SQL (or similar RDBMS).
Collaborate with frontend engineers to ensure seamless integration of backend services with user-facing components.
Write clean, efficient, and well-documented code, adhering to best practices for security, scalability, and maintainability.
Implement automated unit and integration tests to ensure code quality and reliability.
Participate in code reviews and provide constructive feedback to team members.
Optimize application performance, conduct load testing, and troubleshoot backend issues.
Contribute technical documentation for both internal and external stakeholders.
Work within Linux-based development environments and participate in deployment processes.
Stay up to date with emerging backend technologies and advocate for continuous improvement.

Requirements:
Must have Healthcare RCM Experience
Bachelor’s degree in Computer Science, Engineering, or a related field, or equivalent practical experience.
2+ years of professional experience in backend web development.
Proficiency in Python and Flask or Django for backend application development.
Strong experience with RESTful API design and implementation.
Solid understanding of relational databases, preferably MS SQL, including schema design and query optimization.
Familiarity with Linux-based development and deployment environments.
Experience with version control systems (e.g., Git).
Strong problem-solving skills and attention to detail.
Excellent communication and teamwork abilities.

Qualifications and Experience:
Experience with additional backend frameworks (e.g., FastAPI) or microservices architectures.
Knowledge of Healthcare and RCM operations.
Familiarity with cloud platforms such as Azure or AWS.
Knowledge of CI/CD pipelines and automated deployment practices.
Experience with performance monitoring and tuning backend systems.
Exposure to frontend technologies (HTML, CSS, JavaScript) is a plus.
Engineering degree preferred
Proficient in Microsoft Office Suite (Word, Excel, PowerPoint, Outlook).
Ability to think strategically and solve complex problems.
Ability to work independently and as part of a team.
Excellent communication and interpersonal skills.
Must be legally authorized to work in the USA. No Contractors, No C2C, No Visa Sponsorship.

Location & Hours:
Remote
Mon-Fri 8:00 AM to 4:30 PMCST
Flexible working hours may be required based on business

Join our growing team and help shape the user experience of a cutting-edge web application from the ground up. If you are passionate about frontend development and eager to work in a collaborative, innovative environment, we encourage you to apply.",N/A,https://www.indeed.com/viewjob?jk=c1dded01547c28bd,False,software engineer
Junior Software Engineer,CRIO,"Remote in Boston, MA",remote,2025-06-19,Indeed,"CRIO (Clinical Research IO) is a health tech company helping pharma, biotech, research sites, and academic research centers streamline regulatory workflows with one system and a single source of clinical data capture. Our modules allow sites to capture data electronically in real-time, providing data managers and monitors with enhanced transparency, and enabling remote monitoring by sponsors and CROs.
CRIO’s eSource and CTMS system is a leading, modern, enterprise platform built for clinical research sites. Since CRIO’s launch in 2016, CRIO has established the leading brand position in eSource and has won close to 50% of the emerging class of enterprise-grade site networks, many of whom are backed by institutional investors such as VC, PE and corporations. CRIO has achieved the attached metrics, all with little to no serious outbound sales or marketing.

Software Engineer
We are looking for a Junior Software Engineer who is eager to learn and grow in their career while contributing to a meaningful cause. An ideal candidate will understand the basics of software development and will be an enthusiastic self-starter, excited to work with experienced team members who can provide mentorship. Our software engineers are passionate about coding, problem-solving, and collaborating on exciting projects that make a real difference in the health tech space.

Responsibilities
Collaborate with senior engineers and team members on various projects.
Assist in developing cloud-based SaaS products and features.
Contribute to the design, implementation, and testing of software components.
Participate in code reviews and learn best practices in software development.
Troubleshoot and debug applications as needed.

Skills
Familiarity with programming languages such as Java, JavaScript, or Python.
Understanding of web technologies (HTML, CSS, JavaScript) and frameworks (React, Angular).
Experience with relational databases (like MySQL) is a plus.
Knowledge of containerization tools such as Docker is beneficial.

Other Skills/Experience
Strong desire to learn and adapt.
Good communication and teamwork skills.
Detail-oriented and a proactive approach to problem-solving.
A positive attitude and eagerness to contribute.
1-2 years Experience in Software Development
Experience with standard software development practices, with exposure to one or more tools such as Jira and/or Github
Bachelor’s Degree or comparable experience in computer science, engineering, or a related field required.

Nice to Have

Internship or project experience in software development.
Exposure to cloud platforms like Google Cloud Platform (GCP).
Experience in healthcare or life sciences domains is a plus.
(Please note that we do not currently provide visa sponsorship for this position. Candidates must possess the legal right to work in the United States without the need for sponsorship.)

Locations
Fully remote.

At CRIO, equality is a core tenet of our culture. We are committed to building an inclusive global team that represents a variety of backgrounds, perspectives, beliefs, and experiences. The more diverse we are, the richer our community and the broader our impact. Employment decisions are made on the basis of job-related criteria without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, disability, veteran status, or any other classification protected by applicable law.

The pay range for this role is:
80,000 - 100,000 USD per year(Remote (United States))",N/A,https://www.indeed.com/viewjob?jk=46686e4e2ec7380a,False,software engineer
Software Engineer,Gate3,"Remote in Elk Grove Village, IL 60007",remote,2025-06-19,Indeed,"Role Summary:
Responsible for delivering well-designed software components and contributing to the development of software solutions under moderate supervision. Apply strong technical skills to design, develop, test, and maintain software across modern and legacy platforms. Collaborate with team members and participate in architectural and design discussions to build reliable, maintainable products. This role offers opportunities to expand technical expertise and contribute to team success.
Key Responsibilities:
Design, develop, test and deploy software solutions
Lead code reviews to uphold engineering standards and provide constructive feedback; mentor junior engineers to foster technical growth and knowledge sharing
Collaborate with cross-functional teams to gather and implement project requirements
Maintain, refactor and enhance existing codebases, including legacy systems.
Contribute to architectural discussions and technical decision making; evaluate emerging technologies to support strategic growth
Follow and promote best practices in version control, testing and CI/CD pipelines
Diagnose and resolve complex technical issues, delivering robust, long-term solutions under tight deadlines
Drive continuous improvement across the engineering team by identifying opportunities for process optimization and efficient gains.
Minimum Requirements:
2-3 years of professional software development experience
Proficiency in multiple programming languages and frameworks
Solid understanding of version control systems, CI/CD practices, and testing methodologies
Experience with Modern Technologies (e.g., React, Node.js. Python, Go) and Legacy
Technologies (e.g. Net Framework, Java,)
Bachelor’s degree in Computer Science, Software Engineering or a related technical field, or equivalent practical experience.
Strong problem-solving skills and attention to detail.
Effective Communication and collaboration, including client interaction
Job Type: Full-time
Pay: $50,000.00 - $70,000.00 per year
Benefits:
401(k)
401(k) matching
Bereavement leave
Dental insurance
Flexible schedule
Flextime
Food provided
Health insurance
Internet reimbursement
Life insurance
On-site gym
Paid holidays
Paid sick time
Paid time off
Parental leave
Professional development assistance
Snacks provided
Vision insurance
Work from home
Schedule:
8 hour shift
Monday to Friday
Experience:
Software development: 4 years (Required)
Database development: 3 years (Required)
React: 3 years (Preferred)
Angular: 3 years (Preferred)
.NET: 3 years (Preferred)
Node.js: 3 years (Preferred)
Java: 3 years (Preferred)
Debugging: 3 years (Required)
Location:
Elk Grove Village, IL 60007 (Preferred)
Ability to Commute:
Elk Grove Village, IL 60007 (Required)
Work Location: Hybrid remote in Elk Grove Village, IL 60007",N/A,https://www.indeed.com/viewjob?jk=d40bc0cf164be638,False,software engineer
Software Engineer,Sparibis,"Remote in Washington, DC",remote,2025-06-19,Indeed,"Location: 100% remote

Years' Experience: 2+ years

Education: Bachelor's in computer science or software engineering related field

Work Authorization: United States Citizenship is required to be eligible to obtain a Secret security clearance

Clearance: Applicants must be able to obtain and maintain up to a Secret security clearance.

Key Skills:
Software develop experience using Java, JavaScript, Angular, HTML, CSS and other Object-Oriented Programming languages
Experience in CI/CD environment (ie. Docker, Ansible, Jenkins) and scripting languages (Python, Bash, Perl).
Azure Cloud experience preferred
Experience with Version Control Systems such as Git and/or Bitbucket
Responsibilities

Software development with Java, JavaScript, and various scripting languages
Design data models and web APIs and creation of software tasks from system requirements
Perform requirements analysis, design, development, unit, and integration testing of software, troubleshooting and debugging of the system
Immediate responsibilities will include enhancing and maintaining the existing system as well as design, development, and documentation of new features
Usage of Atlassian Tools for day to day tasks within the Scrum process
Implement web services, data persistence access features and external interfaces
Partner closely with front-end and database engineers to ensure features are developed holistically
Follow Agile software development methodology and team architecture standards.
Provide assistance in building CI/CD pipelines within Azure Cloud Environment
Qualifications

Bachelor degree in Computer Science, Software Engineering, or related technical field with software development experience
2+ years professional experience
Must be able to obtain a Secret Security Clearance.
Experience with developing user interfaces using CSS, HTML, JavaScript (jQuery, React)
Experience with design, development, enhancement, troubleshooting and debugging of web applications
Experience developing and integrating complex software systems through the full SDLC
Experience with Agile Scrum
Experience in CI/CD environment (ie. Docker, Jenkins, Ansible, Jenkins, Kubernetes) and scripting languages (Python, Bash, Powershell, Perl)
Experience with Version Control Systems such as Git and/or Bitbucket
Experience with other software technologies such as Nexus, Git, Artifactory, Gradle, Groovy, Gogo, IntelliJ IDEA, or Fortify not required but nice to have
Strong attention to detail
Strong written and verbal communication
About Sparibis

Sparibis LLC is a professional solution firm that Clients rely on to access the best talent to drive their business success.

Sparibis is an equal opportunity employer that values diversity at all levels. All individuals, regardless of personal characteristics, are encouraged to apply.",N/A,https://www.indeed.com/viewjob?jk=5277dfba70dd9936,False,software engineer
Software Engineer - AI Trainer,DataAnnotation,"Remote in Waltham, MA",remote,2025-06-19,Indeed,"We are looking for proficient programmers to join our team to train our AI chatbots to code. You will work with the chatbots that we are building in order to measure their progress, as well as write and evaluate code.
To apply to this role, you will need to be proficient in either Python and/or JavaScript. Your role will require proficiency in at least one programming language/framework (JavaScript, TypeScript, Python, C, C#, C++, HTML/CSS, React, Go, Java, Kotlin, SQL, or Swift) in order to solve coding problems (think LeetCode, HackerRank, etc). For each coding problem, you must be able to explain how your solution solves the problem.
As part of the application process, you will be asked to complete an assessment. If you pass, you will gain access to projects. Based on the quality of your work, you will continue to receive projects regularly. We find our most successful candidates work between 5-20 hours per week, up to 40 hours.
Benefits:
This is a full-time or part-time REMOTE position
You’ll be able to choose which projects you want to work on
You can work on your own schedule
Projects are paid hourly, with bonuses on high-quality and high-volume work
Responsibilities:
Come up with diverse problems and solutions for a coding chatbot
Write high-quality answers and code snippets
Evaluate code quality produced by AI models for correctness and performance
Qualifications:
Fluency in English
Proficient in either Python and/or JavaScript
Detail-oriented
Excellent writing and grammar skills
A bachelor's degree (completed or in progress)
Note: Payment is made via PayPal. We will never ask for any money from you.
#INDUSSD
Job Type: Contract
Pay: From $40.00 per hour
Benefits:
Flexible schedule
Work Location: Remote",N/A,https://www.indeed.com/viewjob?jk=4ca2348c7c5cc6bc,False,software engineer
Junior Backend Software Engineer,Deep Reef,Remote,remote,2025-06-19,Indeed,"Overview
We are seeking a motivated and detail-oriented Junior Software Engineer to join our dynamic development team here at Deep Reef. Based in Colorado, you will be able to perform this role fully remote. In this role, you will have the opportunity to work on exciting Warehouse Management, Enterprise Resource Planning and Ecommerce-related software projects, contribute to innovative solutions, and enhance your technical skills in a collaborative environment. As a Junior Software Engineer, you will assist in the design, development, and maintenance of software applications while gaining hands-on experience with various technologies.
Responsibilities
Collaborate with senior engineers to design and implement software solutions that meet project requirements.
Write clean, maintainable code using languages such as Go, Java, Python, and JavaScript (depending on the project).
Participate in code reviews to ensure code quality and adherence to best practices.
Assist in the development of database schemas and queries using SQL and MongoDB.
Support the integration of APIs and services using technologies like AWS.
Troubleshoot and resolve software defects and issues as they arise.
Document software designs, processes, and technical specifications for future reference.
Stay updated on emerging technologies and industry trends to continuously improve skills.
Qualifications
Familiarity with database management systems including SQL and MongoDB.
Understanding of web services and protocols (WCF, SSIS).
Experience with JSON/XML for data interchange is a plus.
Strong problem-solving skills and attention to detail.
Ability to work collaboratively within a team environment.
Excellent communication skills, both written and verbal.
A degree in Computer Science or a related field is preferred but not mandatory.
If you are passionate about software development and eager to learn in a supportive environment, we encourage you to apply for this exciting opportunity as a Junior Software Engineer.
Job Type: Full-time
Pay: $60,000.00 - $94,000.00 per year
Benefits:
Flexible schedule
Schedule:
Day shift
Work Location: Remote",N/A,https://www.indeed.com/viewjob?jk=8a83d91ae3287b4a,False,software engineer
Front End Software Engineer,"Plenful, Inc.","Remote in San Francisco, CA 94108",remote,2025-06-19,Indeed,"About Plenful
Plenful is a healthcare automation and AI technology platform that pairs automation alongside human task management to optimize the manual, administrative workflows that bog down healthcare today. We partner with innovative healthcare organizations to provide better operational outcomes, financial outcomes, and experiences for both patients and healthcare staff.

Our team is a strong blend of healthcare and technology experts with multiple exits under our belts. Our team comes from top companies such as Google, Shields Health Solutions, Goldman Sachs, and numerous enterprise startups. We’re patients too, and we’re passionate about advancing healthcare efficiency through software.

We are backed by exceptional healthcare and technology investors including Bessemer Venture Partners. Our HQ is in San Francisco and we are open to remote work. Learn more about us at Plenful.com.

Join our growing team!

About the role
We are hiring an exceptional Front End Software Engineer to play a key role in our team. At Plenful, we believe the Engineering-Product-Design (EPD) triangle is essential to our product’s success. As a Front End Software Engineer, you will have the opportunity to own critical features and drive engineering efforts as we scale our platform.

What you’ll do
Build features according to product requirements and designs
Conduct code reviews of other engineers’ work
Work cross-functionally with design and customer success to ensure work meets the needs of our customers and prospects
Write PRDs, design documents, and other proposals to share thought process with the team and drive the product forward.
What we’re looking for
3+ years of full-time B2B SaaS front end engineering experience
2+ years of professional experience in React and Typescript.
Strong communication skills and a passion for user-centered design.
Experience with Figma, Design Systems, Python, and modern API frameworks like FastAPI
Bachelors degree in Computer Science or related field

Plenful perks
Great benefits include unlimited PTO, health insurance, meal stipend, health & wellness stipend, team offsites, 401K matching, and stock options
Join an all-star team with direct access to executive leadership
Opportunities to further develop and refine your partnership acumen by partnering with our seasoned leaders",N/A,https://www.indeed.com/viewjob?jk=bb0f675f8e240152,False,software engineer
Software Engineer New,"Clarity Innovations, LLC",Remote,remote,2025-06-19,Indeed,"Clarity Innovations is a trusted national security partner, dedicated to safeguarding our nation’s interests and delivering innovative solutions that empower the Intelligence Community (IC) and Department of Defense (DoD) to transform data into actionable intelligence, ensuring mission success in an evolving world.
Our mission-first software and data engineering platform modernizes data operations, utilizing advanced workflows, CI/CD, and secure DevSecOps practices. We focus on challenges in Information Warfare, Cyber Operations, Operational Security, and Data Structuring, enabling end-to-end solutions that drive operational impact.
We are committed to delivering cutting-edge tools and capabilities that address the most complex national security challenges, empowering our partners to stay ahead of emerging threats and ensuring the success of their critical missions. At Clarity, we are people-focused and set on being a destination employer for top talent, offering an environment where innovation thrives, careers grow, and individuals are valued. Join us as we continue to lead innovation and tackle the most pressing challenges in national security.
Role
We are seeking an experienced Software Engineer to join our dynamic team at Clarity Innovations. In this role, you will play a pivotal part in developing innovative products and contributing to the success of our projects
The individual will be responsible for creating mobile and web MVP solutions, including designing front-end applications, implementing security standards, and updating software databases, all under the guidance of the assigned Product Owner. The individual MUST have strong experience in developing full-stack applications, with a particular focus on front-end development, building intuitive user interfaces, integrating with back-end services, and ensuring a seamless user experience across web applications. Additionally, the individual SHALL proactively recommend and implement improvements to existing software applications as needed.
Responsibilities
Develops, and tests software for Air Force-based products.
Develops both front-end and back-end of software MVPs, components, and tools that can be leveraged to create new mobile and web applications.
Collaborate in formulating strategies for rapid MVP development, ensuring efficient and scalable solutions that align with project goals and timelines
Will adhere to plans, road maps, software design strategies. Helps to design and develop software requirements for Air Force based products including the software architectures, APIs, frameworks, and libraries.
Analyzes and decomposes activities and requirements to software designs that are allocated across systems components/sub-components, classification system levels, etc.
Works with Product Managers, UX Designers and other engineers to help in composing cohesive and sound software designs that form the basis of scalable software solutions.
Helps to optimize software designs and architectures to deliver desired performance targets. Captures, develops, and reports reference architectures and documenting compliance standards.
Junior engineers SHALL be proficient in discussing future limitations and a forward-thinking approach in resolving roadblocks presented by current strategy
Stays informed on latest software architectures and trends from design patterns to DevSecOps and systems architecture patterns.
Aids in making technical decisions in order to integrate systems to the cloud
Optimizes software designs and architectures to deliver desired performance targets and devises tooling and methodologies to profile execution and capture performance metrics.
Implements and practices DevOps Enablement and helps more junior/less experienced developers to do same
Is a mentor to other engineers regarding troubleshooting techniques, design patterns, and testing strategies.
Requirements
Experience building modern front-end applications using frameworks like React.js, Node.js, and other JavaScript frameworks (e.g., Vue, Angular), or equivalent experience.
Experience integrating web applications with GraphQL and/or REST APIs
Be a hands-on engineer spending significant percentage of their time writing code or debugging tricky issues
Knowledge of professional software engineering practices for the full software development life cycle including coding standards, code reviews, source control management, build processes, testing, and operations
Proficiency in Computer Science fundamentals – object-oriented design, data structures, algorithm -design, problem solving, and complexity analysis.
Proficiency with JavaScript, Java, and preferably one more programming language (Python, etc.)
Proficiency with container technologies such as Docker or Kubernetes
MUST be eligible to obtain a minimum of a Secret clearance.
Required: Strong communication/general soft skills
Excellent time management and organizational skills
Proven ability to work effectively with remote development teams
Preferred Qualifications
Bachelor's degree in Computer Science, Computer Information Systems, or related field, or equivalent experience.
Familiarity with DevSecOps tools and processes such as Git, Concourse, GitLabCI, SonarQube, Fortify, and ThreadFix
Familiarity with SQL/NoSQL databases
Experience with Scrum, or other agile methodologies
Experience with Typescript
Experience with backend runtimes and frameworks like Node.js, Spring, Spring Boot, Django, Flask, etc.
Experience authoring experience in Javascript, Java, or other languages. (Unit tests, Integration tests, and Journey tests)
SHALL conduct themselves at all times in a professional and respectful manner
SHALL give and receive feedback in a respectful and professional manner
SHALL be a “team player” and contribute to “can-do” culture
SHALL be eager to learn and be mentored by more senior engineers
We are an equal-opportunity employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, disability or veteran status.
We are an equal opportunity employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, disability, or veteran status.",N/A,https://www.indeed.com/viewjob?jk=c7998871887ebd1d,False,software engineer
Software Engineer (Full Stack),"GAR Associates, LLC",Remote,remote,2025-06-19,Indeed,"Company Overview
GAR Associates, LLC is a real estate appraisal and consulting firm with over 63 years of experience with offices in both the Capital Region and Western parts of New York. Over the past 20 years, GAR has made significant investments in software engineering and applications related to the assessment and appraisal industry, both internal and public-facing. That investment includes building an experienced team of software engineers that are excited about using new technology to create state-of-the-art assets that continue to expand our business.
Summary
We are seeking a full-stack software engineer to join our team. In this role, you will work with a team of engineers to write code for both backend APIs and frontend user interfaces. You will implement web-based applications that are optimized for performance, scalability, testing, and supportability. We are looking for a candidate that has demonstrated a passion for learning new technology and working with a team toward a common goal.
Responsibilities
Design and develop scalable web applications using modern frameworks and technologies.
Implement RESTful APIs to facilitate seamless communication between front-end and back-end systems.
Set up and help maintain Azure cloud-resources including Kubernetes.
Maintain and optimize existing applications for performance and security.
Participate in code reviews to ensure code quality and adherence to best practices.
Stay updated with emerging technologies and industry trends to continuously improve development processes.
Requirements:
5+ years experience as a Full Stack Developer or similar role in software engineering.
Strong proficiency in React and Python programming languages.
Experience creating CICD flows and with Kubernetes in the Cloud
Experience in the following areas is a plus:
Cloud infrastructure (Azure or AWS)
Cloud deployment with Docker containers
Cloudflare / DNS
Restful API, FastAPI
Go Language
ESRI or Google Mapping
Logging/Telemetry
Unit testing
Security standards such as OAuth
Agile team process
If you're ready to take your career to the next level with an innovative team dedicated to excellence in software development, we invite you to apply today at GAR Associates. Your next big opportunity awaits!
Job Type: Full-time
Pay: $100,000.00 - $115,000.00 per year
Benefits:
401(k)
Dental insurance
Health insurance
Schedule:
Monday to Friday
Work Location: Remote",N/A,https://www.indeed.com/viewjob?jk=cabe00671425d9b3,False,software engineer
Software Engineer II - FrontEnd (Remote),First Citizens Bank,"Remote in Raleigh, NC",remote,2025-06-19,Indeed,"29094
100 East Tryon Road
Raleigh, North Carolina
SALES & SERVICE
Monday - Friday
06/18/2025

Job Description
Overview

This is a remote role that may only be hired in the following location(s): AZ, NC and TX

As a Software Engineer II, you will play a key role in developing and delivering robust and scalable software solutions that support our financial operations and enhance our customer experience. You will work within an agile team to design, develop, and maintain software components, ensuring they meet functional, non-functional, and compliance requirements. Your expertise in React and Node.js will be essential in building user-friendly and efficient interfaces and backend services. You should also have strong problem-solving skills, understand performance optimization, and be familiar with testing frameworks.


Responsibilities
Design, develop, and maintain user interface components and web applications using React.js
Write clean, efficient, well-documented, and maintainable code following best practices
Participate in all phases of the Agile development lifecycle, including sprint planning, daily stand-ups, and retrospectives
Collaborate with product managers, analysts, developers, testers, and other cross-functional teams to define and implement solutions
Apply knowledge of the Software Development Life Cycle (SDLC) toolchain to improve automation and efficiency
Analyze and solve technical problems, debugging and troubleshooting code issues
Identify and implement strategies to optimize application performance
Conduct unit testing, integration testing, and potentially contribute to automated testing frameworks
Participate in code reviews to ensure code quality and knowledge sharing
Create and maintain documentation for the codebase and its functionality
May mentor junior engineers and contribute to the team's technical growth

Qualifications

Bachelor's Degree and 2 years of experience in Application software programming OR High School Diploma or GED and 6 years of experience in Application software programming

Preferred Skills
Excellent ability to communicate technical information clearly and work effectively with cross-functional teams
In-depth understanding of JavaScript, including ES6+ features, Loopback, closures and asynchronous programming
Proven experience in building user interfaces with React.js
Familiarity with state management libraries like Redux or MobX
Understanding of the React component lifecycle and its best practices
Experience with testing frameworks like Jest or Mocha
Ability to interact with REST APIs and handle data fetching and manipulation
Proficient in using GITLAB for version control
Experience with Jira, Confluence and ORACLE Database systems
Strong analytical and problem-solving skills
Understanding of basic UI/UX design principles
Prior experience with regulated financial organization is a plus
Benefits are an integral part of total rewards and First Citizens Bank is committed to providing a competitive, thoughtfully designed and quality benefits program to meet the needs of our associates.

First Citizens Bank is an Equal Opportunity Employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race (including traits historically associated with race, such as hair texture and protective hairstyles), color, religion, national origin, sex, age, disability, protected veteran status, sexual orientation, gender identity, genetic information, military membership, application, or obligation, or any other legally protected status.

Section 19 of the Federal Deposit Insurance Act prohibits First Citizens Bank from employing individuals convicted of certain criminal offenses. Offers of employment will be contingent upon a satisfactory background check.

The Bank is committed to maintaining a safe workplace free from the influence of prohibited drugs and the misuse of alcohol and will not tolerate any prohibited drug use or alcohol misuse that jeopardizes the safety of associates, customers or others at the workplace, or threatens the Bank’s operations or competitiveness.
If you have a disability and need special assistance or accommodation to apply for employment at First Citizens Bank, please contact our Human Resources department at 888.716.7199 or email us at hrsc@firstcitizens.com.",N/A,https://www.indeed.com/viewjob?jk=57c8c82df0800e98,False,software engineer
